U better just pray Obama dont steal this by voter fraud. Therell be no more blackpanthers left fool. Dont wake a sleeping giant

this comparison shows it all. Romney's tax plan is the clear winner  (infographic)

I must say, I am amazed that Gov. Romney has done all of this campaigning without coffee, red bull or cigarettes.

When Obama wins tomorrow ima hit the meanest freestyle on YouTube

Romney will win Ohio Florida Wisconsin and possibly Iowa and Pennsylvania to help him become the 45th President #RomneyRyan2012

Tell me why Obama deserves 4 more years, if you can.

All political bullshit aside America will be #wickedscrewedbrah if that Masshole Romney somehow wins the election tomorrow.

Great final #Obama campaign event in Des Moines, IA tonight!  #p2

Obama and Romney, I'm sorry dears but you are up for elimination. Now it's time to lipsync, FOR YOUR LIFE.

I ain't voting for both of these nimrods. Everyone has come up to me and is like I know who your voting for.. Romney. No Bitch.

Betwen Obama and Romney stands the publc space. For the man from Chacago to recognize and sustain, for the man fron Boston, to destroy.

Almost 6 years ago I watched live on the internet as Obama announced his unlikely candidacy for President.  14

Win or lose, Barack Obama represents the future of American politics. Romney is a crass symbol of our troubled past. I voted for the future.

what are you saying about Ann Romney?

Msnbc calls american public foolish if voting for Romney.  Garbage.  Pure garbage on that network.

I swear if he says he's voting for Romney tomorrow I'm not talking to him anymore #truth #notsorry

Obama vs Romney: It's the Output Gap, Stupid

ur pretty fucked up to promote only Obama before the elections and NOT Romney, this is Unfair, let ppl decide don't brainwash them!

Obama's new doctrine leave all Americans behind! #TeaPartyVotes

if romney wins.. smh it will be world war 3 and 4 combined

Romney believes god lives on a star called Kolob #lol

That's counterproductive. Romney will cut federal spending by 20% as a share of gross domestic product, simultaneously reducing taxes by 20%

RT if romney win , i bet alot of ppl gone try to kill him just like when obama first became president crackers wanted him dea

Hopefully Clint Eastwood Is Nearby w/ A Chair For Mitt Romney, Following Tomorrow's RE-ELECTION Of President #Forward2012!

Yoo dis nigga 50 been wantin to send 8 shots at niggas since Romney came on at half time smh.. fuck wrong wit dis ni

Just watched President Obama's historic last campaign speech in Des Moines, Iowa. Simply electric. Fired Up! Ready to go! #Obama2012

A voter said If Mitt Romney saved my life, I still wouldn't vote for him. LMAO!!!

Mitt will win without Cynthia Nixon's vote. Deal with it/ Cynthia Nixon Says Sex And The City Gals Would NEVER Vote For Romney

Mitt Romney will lose his home state by a LANDSLIDE. The ppl who elected him Gov will overwhelmingly reject him for Prez

How I feel if you vote Obama or Romney tomorrow.

Fuck Obama  Romney Both these niqqas wack as a mf, neither of em gon do shit that they promise. RT i

Frankly, from what I've heard and read, Romney could easily set us back in many, many ways.

America decides today and Obama is the man for the job. This is beyond having a black brother's back- he is just IT!

not even playing, yall better pray for obama or this country's really gonna go down

I am both anticipating and dreading tomorrow. I know I'm preaching to the choir, but it is so important that everyone vote.  #vote #obama

oprah said months ago she wasnt going to publicly endorse Obama

When Obama win tomorrow I'm celebrating

actually if obama or romney win, this country is gonna end up getting fucked up either way.

Who's been sitting in the chair in the Oval office the past 200 days or so?  Not counting golf games or vacations, of course. #Romney

Me and my mommy will be at the poles soon as they open!!!:) #obama

If Romney wins, his education policies would make it damn near impossible for you to get student loans next year #Obama

sorry, I'm a small business. Obama care will mean I fire an employee in 2014, and still make less money

I remember last election when everybody talked shit about McCain but when Obama chose him as vice everybody started loving him.

I am voting tomorrow, I believe in Obama, #Forward

You know we lived in a fucked up time when people are actually choosing Romney over Obama. Its not even close.

Can't even begin to dive down my tl for Leno, Kimmel, Ellen, Mackies tall tale etc Too distracted by ummm an Obama re-election lol

Let's All Include Obama In Our Prayers Tonight, and Pray He Wins!

Tomorrow could be a great turn in R lives by giving back the leadership 2someone who promised delivered.Obama deserves this honor.

If Obama doesn't get reelected tomorrow.. Who am I kidding he's got this! #Forward #Obama2012

Cincinnati likes shitty chili, but we won't stand for Romney. We can only like so many bad things.

I hope everybody going to vote!!! Your vote counts. (Obama)

nice to know people are voting for another term for Obama. it's not gonna be to funny in a couple years when none if us can get a job. #dumb

Our gardner came 2America worked way up 2 now owning nurserybecame citizen last yearhe took friends 2c 2016ObamaALL VOTING #Romney

RT If romney wins I'm moving to canadayah boy obama's got this

If Romney wins I'm moving to Haiti and changing my major to Mango research

ATTENTION VETERANS: Mitt Romney doesn't deserve your vote. Mitt the Coward protested for the draft  Vietnam  then ran to France to hide.

Fuck Romney. Fuck Obama. Channing Tatum for president everyone. #TATUM2012

Forget Obama and Romney, I'm votin for Pedro! #napoleondynamite #vote4pedro

Obama came into office with a full plate. He had a lot of things to try and fix and plus he came into office when we were still in a war

for all you assholes out there who need to be told again, obama is awful he promised economic recovery in 3 years, well its been 4 #GotWorse

Some of y'all probably won't go out and vote ; but because your friend say it or you support Obama you're tweeting Go Vote !

Mitt Romney, get the fuck off my Facebook feed, I did not ask for you to be there.

If Obama didn't win the thingy. He will be the first president that rule America for 5years.

Obama. kinda looks like a terrorist. #thatisall #goodnight

Y'all don't get it. Romney doesn't care about the poor. He just cares about the people that are rich.

If President Obama is victorious on Tuesday, he will govern a deeply divided nation, and won't have a grace period

December 21 2012 is about to become November 6 2012 if romney wins.

aight soo Romney was a gov at Massachusetts right they were dealing with their own recession b4 the big national one hit

Fox News on schedule to call Florida for Romney before voting ends.

After this whole weekend and eagles lost I might kill myself if Obama losses tomorrow I ain't fucking around

Real talk neither Obama or Romney have any real power, everything's on congress

So I'm voting for Obama even though I would choose Ron Paul over both Romney and Obama

nuttin ..Romney aint going do nuttin for me either

Interactive map by has 431 ways to win (84.2% of paths); Romney: 76 ways to win (14.8% of paths)

Alsoooo Ann Romney's hair will NEVER be LAYD like Michelle Obama's

Obama sure is tweeting a lot. Its like there is an election tomorrow or something?

hey do you know what happens if romney is president?

There's no way that man with grey hair on the sides of his head is going to defeat Obama. No way!!

My TL just lit up blueit is safe to say that President Barack Obama has won the state of Twitter, Inc.

No really mitt romney cannot win

Thanks to my president, I have health insurance for the 1st time in 17 years. I voted for Obama like my life depended on it. Because it does

But really, Obama spent his first 4 years on CP Time. We gotta give him 4 more years to get it together and become the President he can be!!

LMFAO :( I Don't even know what a romney is.

If u haven't VOTED plz VOTE tomorrow OBAMA!!!!!!!!..11-6-2012 Your VOTE will make difference!!!!!!!..

NO NOW MY FAVE FIGURE SKATER, KRISTI YAMAGUCHI, IS COMING OUT IN SUPPORT OF ROMNEY! oh wait, literally no one has said that name since '92

Throw my short ass Finger in the Airrrr  say fuck Romney

Dang it looks like is gonna be the next president. Look out Obama! #sarahforpresident

Nate Silver Gives Obama a 92.2 Percent Chance of Winning: Some time between waiting for his appearance o

I wonder if Obama was Republicanwould ya Vote for him? #INeedAnswers

Obama is going to win youngin give it a rest already lol

YES 100% THEY HAD 8-YEARS SO WHY CAN`T WE FINISH OUR JOBWE ALL STARTED I`M SO PROUD PRESIDENT B-OBAMA IS MY YOUNGER BROTHER

I just said why, prices would've been much higher than current like 5 years ago.. they only went up when Obama was elected

I feel bad for the people voting for Romney because they're gonna be upset when he loses.

We never were. U just have had blinders on. Thankfully, my God, and President Obama, don't.

Obama the 1st POTUS endorsed by Russia and numerist Muslins

true, but Romney's trying to make the gap even bigger.

To everybody that got that text on how to vote obama then check all democrats don't do that because your vote won't count

VOTE!!!!!!   VOTE!!!!!   VOTE!!!!!!! PRESIDENT BARACK OBAMA!!!!

I'm sick of it all 2. I just want Romney to win  then life can go on, not sure it can if Obama wins. #RomneyRyan2012 #NObama

Atlanta Obama voters: it IS going to rain tomorrowfor certain. Pack your umbrella, ID,  get your arse to the

hope Obama win 2marrow Foreal!

Bill Clinton's is stumping hard for Obama.Why is George Bush absent from Romney's side? Think USA!

how Romney a mormon but he aint got no hoes? #Obama2012

Mormon Republicans, Democrats analyze possible Romney presidency

You are forever in #TwitterJail unless Obama wins the election

Government money to help out our house holds ,Romney says we should barrow money for college from our parents.. Dnt u think if we could .

Man if Romney become president .. I'm moving my Mexican behind to Canada ! #honesttweet

So y'all voting for Obama just because he's partially African? Cool.

Has the MSM called NH for Obama already? :)

A Romney court would set back the clock  via

Watching the Romney rally now, trying to find someone who ain't white. Nope. Waitnope. Oh maybe therenada. #welp

11,400 at Romney rally. Arena holds 11,770 max.

K guys lets Vote Obama back in so the unemployment rate can go up, so we can have less job opportunities, and America go more in debt.

If Romney wins who wants to join me in jumpming in a volcano?

Obama leads in early votes in Florida but expect Romney to have an edge on polling day.

Guys treat tomorrow like a pair of J's or that new 2k or COD coming out. Be the first in line and VOTE.!!!! #Obama

Still confused about your vote?  Romney supports overfishing. Think of your planet.  #Obama

Today I'm voting for Barack Obama #election2012 #Obama #VoteorDie

Romney is trying to involve too much of his religious views into his decision making for the people.

Kid Rock at the Mitt Romney rally today?? Nice PR move mitt because when you squint Kid Rock almost looks like a woman #mynameismiiiiiiiittt

12 reasons why I am for the reelection of President Barack Obama and why you should be too!  #Obama2012 #Obama

Obama is blowing up my twitter feed. I like it. #obama2012

Romney takes credit for Patriots Super Bowl victories and Red Socks pennant. #disconnected

I'm not voting for Romney cause he's white. And that'd be racist.

If Romney wins, imma have to kiss college goodbye

plot twist: Obama is a cyborg and will self destruct if he loses the election

If Mitt Romney wins and our country burns. THEN HE BURNS WITH US.

ur willing to let a COMPLETE Liar into office just because ur that against obama? Cmon man #dowhatsbestforthecountry

Obama's 'fired up' 'ready to go' chants sure fire me up #ElectionDay

Last election I had no doubt in my mind that Obama was going to win, but this year..im nervous

Obama IS a better man than Romney in my opinion, but he also supports abortion up to the 3rd trimester. That does it for me. Not voting.

This Is The Day. Its either Mitt Romney or President Barack Obama as the 45th President of The U.S.A.

Obama can go jump of a cliff.while getting fucked by that bitch as white boy Romney.

Fox, I'm stoked you're featuring us today, but you gotta quit it with these Romney commercials. I can't deal with hi

You realize of course that a Mitt Romney win tomorrow means a Tagg Romney presidency in 2032.

Though pull for one, I shall pray for both President Obama and Fmr Gov. Romney tonightthey both need it.

If obama legalize weed im gonna #PassTheHellout

Imma be mad if Obama don't win imma be scared for my black life.

Going to move to Ireland if Obama get elected.

I feel like people are only saying that Obama and Romney are almost exactly tied in supporters, just to make Romney feel better.

I'm pretty sure John McCain will beat out Obama tomorrow.

#NiteNite world!! :) big day tomorrow don't forget to go out there and vote #OBAMA

The last time I said 'its in the bag' the Sharks lost so for Obama I'm saying 'its in the suitcase' *nervous smile* don't jinx it!

Msnbc doing the most right now!!! Replaying old video of everything Obama passed when he hit office in 08! Since y'all forgot

Dixville Notch: Obama 5, Romney 5. Get the House of Representatives ready!

Powers back woohoo.I'm still not voting for Obama

Its a tie5 votes Obama, 5 votes Romney. First tie during this process ever. Shades of things to come?

IF Y'ALL DON'T VOTE FOR OBAMA , DON'T EVEN THINK ABOUT HAVING KIDS N THOSE WHO ARE PREGO , SORRY TO SAY , YOU N YO BABY FUCKED !! #TeamObama

Billy Graham has welcomed Mormonism into Christain folds in America after Romney shared the Mormon Gospel with him.What a u-turn 4 Billy?

They researched Obama  McCain  then pitched campaign speeches for the candidate they believed in.

Some of y'all blowing me wit these Obama pics, especially the one about no worries. Idk why y'all think he got this in the bag

Bruce Springston and Jay Z for Obama campaign wow! #great boys

Maybe Just Maybe , If Obama Wins , Apple Will Give Us Our First Black Emoji!

Because we already had Obama as a president once, and he didn't commit to his promises.. So we should make a change..

The votes are in from Dixville Notch, NH. 5 votes Obama, 5 votes Romney. God Bless America, from sea to shining sea.

Sometimes I want to pick fights with my friends who support Romney.  Then I remember, someone other than Romney will be president so it's ok

Dixville Notch ties at five b/w Obama and Romney

If you vote for Obama tomorrow, you are voting for the downfall of America. #NOBAMA #RomneyRyan2012

Dixville Notch, NH is first to report results for all 10 registered voters. Tie between Romney and Obama. #nailbiter #elections2012

Mitt Romney lies about EVERYTHING!!! with his creepy ass smile.. i don't trust him.

DIXVILLE (New Hampshire) First ville in United States casted 5 votes for Mitt Romney and President Barack Obama (they were 10 people to vote

I agree with that But Obama made it worse . The debt , the unemployment, everything.

Because Im a woman and I enjoy my rights.. #OBAMA

BREAKING NEWS: OBAMA AND ROMNEY CURRENTLY TIED AT 5 VOTES EACH AFTER DIXVILLE NOTCH VOTE.  #News #Votes #Debates

Romney's final rally in Manchester NH where it all began and where it all will end  link via

First election result in from Dixville Notch - 5 votes Obama and 5 Romney - first time they ever had a tie watch this space.

I cried when Obama was elected in 2008 because I saw a positive change. I hope I get the chance to see it again.

Ohh No Dixville Vote, First To Vote in The Nation: Obama 5 Romney 5! It's first ever tie!

Barack Obama Unites New Jersey's Finest: Bruce Springsteen and Gov. Chris Christie: New Jersey Gov. C  #Hollywood

The road to 270 is crucial to every president obama has to win ohio

Just Had A Real Nigga Conversation With Barrack Obama . . . - Everybody Get Out 'd Go Vote Tomorrow ^.^ #RealRap !

Romney never said if his medicare plan would still cover those vacuum penis pumps.

I just read something on twitter saying this election could depend on Virginia.Ya better step it up and choose the right candidate! #ROMNEY

There's alot more important issues at hand than your right to abort a fetus. Saying I hate women because I dislike Obama.

As ignorant as I sound, if you're a young adult and you actually support Mitt Romney, I honestly don't think you know much about politics.

Happy Chooseday :) esp. to my US friends. #USElections #Obama is the future;) #Obama2012

Romney is a dick not the big dick we want but the lil useless dicks. Kick his ass to the curb #reject

Yal gone act like Obama didn't create 4.5 new jobs during his first 4 years? Be thankful you collecting that minimum wage

Voting has begun in a small town in new hampshire. They got a tie between romney and obama. First time in their history.

If Romney gets elected in moving to Mexico #VivaMexico

So tired of seeing praise about Obama. He hasn't earned a re-election. Not saying Romney is any better but Obama is

My son chose Obama based on these characteristics. #election

Just watch History is NOT in Obama's favor  if Romney wins it shouldn't be a surprise

lmao . if Romney wins , he's automatically going to win the next election too .

Soooo who voting Obama tomorrow????

We have the exit polls on D.N. yet? Where was Obama at among single, white, college-educated women?

I'm crying if Romney wins , word up

Y'all can stand in line for Jordans  iphones  y'all better get up  vote cause e give be threw if Romney win

i love how fans who dont live in america are trying to convince fans who do to vote for obama tomorrow omfg

In case Romney wins. Ladies, where are we moving?

Damn they doing Obama bashing commercials on espn!

hahaha and stale ass weave that #Romney tryna exekute outta the pikture dem hoes gone be bald for rela

Cher and Kathy Griffin on why women shouldn't vote for Romney.

Election Night Plan-Watch #DailyShow Live, get looped. I'll be celebrating or putting myself in2 a stupor. Either way I win. #obama #tds

First #results in from Dixville New Hampshire, Obama 5 - Romney 5, first ever tie. #elections

left (momentarily) stunned this morning with my forecast of a comfortable Obama win with 287 elector votes. 891ABC #Adelaide

Rs, I Have Faith In OBAMA !

If you're exercising your right to vote tomorrow don't forget to bring your ID.  Especially if you are voting Obama.  #romNOPE

LMFAO, I'm loving this blog right now. 30 Reasons Not To Vote for Mitt Romney.  Funny.

#sandy the final nail in #obama's coffin. Step-up #tristate area, get rid of this guy!

lol somebody said that was Mitt Romney. I was deadaf.

As a college student who depends on financial aid to support my dream of a higher education, Romney will not receive my vote.

well, we shall see tomorrow whether he was in the tank for Obama or if his model still works for US elections

I HATE to hear these two people be spoken about in a NEGATIVE way:1) Michael Vick2) President Obama

Goodnight ppl. Long day of work 2ma. #Obama

Regardless of whether or not Obama's Chicago minions manage to steal the election I have perfect peace for I know in whom I believe #Jesus

So glad the likes of #Pelosi, #Reid and #Obama won't be center stage anymore. America deserves much better #leaders.

Well, Christie knows NJ isn't voting for Romney! But it was an impressive read of the politics of crisis management.

Barack Obama  Michelle Obama Are Wonderful !!! Not Only Him, But She Gets Involved 110% As Well! #Teamwork #ObamaBiden2012

that hoe Mitt Romney look like he play in LMN movies

I don't even know if I can handle this. Gishwhes is over, no more Romney after tomorrow, I just don't know what to do..

Once Obama wins tommorow because I know hes going 2 -___- I cant wait to see all his immature supporters start talking how hes amazing

ROMNEY WOULD BE BETTER THAN OBAMA FOR THE PRESIDENTSHIP OF UNITED STATES OF AMERICAM CONGRATULATION ROMNEY FOR PRESIDENT OF USA, ALERT OATH?

.im going to vote tomorrow BARACK OBAMA 4 MORE YEARS IN THE WHITE HOUSE

President Obama got 5 votes in Dixville, New Hampshire and Mitt Romney got 5 votes in Dixwille

Obama, Romney rush to the finish with battleground state stops

btw I don't like it but I want Obama to win. There kinda both dumb asses trying to fix another dumb ass's mistakes.

Sandy may get Obama reelectedreally Romney? Get rid of FEMA? #stopit private industry always puts profit ahead of human life

Bruce Springsteen Flies Air Force One With Obama Performs With Jay-Z (Video): Getty Images The boss as well as s

I would rather have Bush again than see Romney win tomorrow and I never want to have Bush back in office

Because tomorrow Romney will be our new president

First voting in Dixville Notch, New Hampshire it's a tie: #Obama 5 votes, #Romney 5 votes.

If Romney wins I might as well not register for classes for next semester.

Last time i voted for obama i went in the evening and dat shit took 2mins

Nate Silver's latest poll calculations show that Prez Obama now has a 92% chance of winning-

Can't wait for Romney to be prez tho.

Eagles. Sigh. I'm not up for losses two nights in a row. I'll sacrifice Vick for Obama.

Ladies, before you vote tomorrow remember: Romney will be making abortions illegal. Dont let him make choices for your body, it is yours.

I'm actually really scared if Romney gets presidency

Case Closed: If Moderate Voters See This Video, It's Over for Obama Independent Journal Review - Scoundrel!

I vote now calling daughters  nieces for a 20 y wedding anniversary gift of a vote for Obama tomorrow! 20 y's tomorrow!

i wonder how many people are actually voting for obama just because he's black ..

yea, if Romney wins im so moving to Canada. Even everyone in my first period is saying that c;

If Mitt Romney wins there is vertually no chance that Tagg Romney's.Solamere, willbe revealed.

aint nothing more than Obama! hallelujahhh

i dont feel like my vote even matters, tbh. i live in GA and im pretty sure Romney is gonna get our electoral votes. i still voted though.

#FirstTimeIMet Obama I shook his hand at #ODU in Norfolk, VA when I was in school even I'm mexican it was a special moment. I hope he won.

100 followers. What now Mitt Romney whatcHA GON' DO HUH

like imagine the hole that America will be in if Romney is voted in :/

Even if your state *won't* go for Obama (e.g., this state), you still must vote. Don't think your vote doesn't matter.

I can't wait to vote for President Obama tomorrow!

WOW did Obama give him the right to vote???

I can't vote to so dead ass Fuck this election ill vote for Michelle Obama in when I'm 21

#electionDay begins with a tie in Dixville Notch, 5 votes each for #Obama and #Romney

is it just me or does Obama look alot like Gustavo Fring  #bothbosses #breakingbad

if u vote all democrats before u vote obama..it excludes him from the all democratic votes..so vote for him first..u voted yet?

Hahaha, oh, comb over. Well given he also believes that Barack Obama was not born in the US, what he  thinks is irrelevant.

If you're uneducated about politics, you better not vote. If you vote for Obama because he seems cool or hes a brotha then do some research

I don't work for the campaign.  I'm just saying, watching Obama tonight - if I were a Dem, I'd me more worried than before.

PJTV: Hair of the Dog: Pundits Push Team #Obama In Final Sunday Shows Before #Election2012

national league rule points to Obama

The idea of a Romney presidency is more difficult to believe than it is scary. Though the idea of him appointing SCOTUS judges is scary

Did y'all know Obama will have an early lead tomorrow until all the Republicans get off from work tomorrow? Haven't heard that one

Romney Rallies with Huge New Hampshire Crowd  via #TCOT #GOP #TEAPARTY #TLOT #SOT #p2

Can't vote tomorrow because my address got messed up with the voting system. All you voters make the right choice OBAMA

If #obama goes on one more talk show or one more vacation and #romney this isn't the 60's boo.. #ourcountryisdoomed

We are airing this TV ad in Michigan to Defeat Barack Obama and help elect the Romney/Ryan ticket:

Praying that obama takes this win 2marow ;) !

Awesome  Thank you! Don't worry about losing Republican fans, they don't laugh at anything and their $$s gone to Romney.

No doubt in my mind Obama will win the election. #Obama2012 #Foward2012 #FuckRomney.

good night Ian :) fingers crossed for Obama !

Does anyone else think mitt romney looks like hank hill from king of the hill?

The results are in from Dixville Notch, NH where voting began at 12:01a. Romney: 5, Obama: 5. It's gonna be a long day.

Dixville Notch:  5 Obama 5 Romney  ::jumps off balcony::

Take this shower and take my ass to bed Got to vote in the am #Obama

FBI just attacked CIA on Homeland, i think Obama has big issues to deal with here.

If your only reason to dislike Romney is over tampons #takeaseat leave it to us real politicians me and

Romney Didn't Know What the Blunt Amendment Was  via

if Mitt Romney wins the presidency, the Republican brand would have pull 1 of the biggest scams in American history. but that's why we vote

Americans: My friend is flying into our fair country tomorrow for his 1st visit. Do me a favor? Vote Obama. Don't embarrass us.

Mitt Romney has that presidential swag this time, Obama has that motivational speaker swag.. Times have changed but I'm still team #forward

who was the art director on that Romney commercial? Either he/she was a complete idiot. Or a brilliant Democrat.

BEEN FRANKLIN 2012: What will the future bring if Obama wins??

AlrightI'm so ready to lose some followers on this here twitter.Please voteAndpleasevote for Obama.(Allowed to voice my opinion)

Takin a shot for every state Romney wins and a beer for every state Obama wins. Jk I'd die

I guess the u.s. finna be in another 20 trill in debt cause im voting for Obama got damn

it IS another case of lesser of two evils, but Romney is MUCH less evil than Obama, ya know?

If romney wins, imma take my family and move to Korea

vote for who u believe will lead the country into 2016. Obama has been doing a good job but made mistakes

They clowned obama for having hov and bruce but mitt has Meatloaf and Kid Rock and thats ok? im crying

She also thought President Obama deserved another chance.Let's ALL remember to exercise our right and VOTE tomorrow.

Obama will get the lead in the morning but you wait tell everyone is off work and Romney will get it (: #romney2012!

hacked your twitter and made you follow mitt romney?! that's messed up!

Yes, I trust Our President.  I do not trust Romney, No Ma'am

Finna turnt upppp just for Obama !!!

What if Obamas wife voted for Romney? Awh shiiiit. Can she even vote? Is there like a rule? #MyLateNightThoughts

If Romney wins tmrw I'm packing up my ish and movinh to Bikini Bottom!

Candy Crowley's 'President Romney' slip excites GOP: The GOP wasn't the biggest Candy Crowley fan following the

Every Vote Counts So Get Out There And Vote OBAMA 4 More Years !

I feel like there's enough ignorant and uneducated people in the US who haven't followed the election at all who will vote for Romney.

Obama flooding my twitter feed. lol D: glad this election will be over with so we can move on as a nation. sheesh #presidentialelection #USA

dese nigga tryin to hold me back dese niggas tryin to hold me back just trying protect my stack mitt romney don't pay no tax

WHY OBAMA MUST GO TOMORROW! HE IS A TRAITOR? Articles: The Worst News from Benghazi

Kidding. 281 Obama.  (where's dave's map?)

Loves Obama, election day tomorrow. ersomething like that.. Idk..

What people's don't seem to understand people's will make anything sound good to get there feet in the door. Be a fool to vote for Romney !

If Obama don't make it , it's gone be war time str8 up

President Obama holding the final campaign rally of his political career in Des Moines, Iowa. Watch live here:

So worried, all I can do is pray. I've been waiting for this day for so long.Romney/Ryan2012

Black people think when #OBAMA get in office he gotta just help us but it's other people in this country that need help.

Mitt Romney is running as a compassionate conservative. I heard this before. We had a surplus, economy was

LMFAO THIS SHIT IS PATHETIC  Video: Silly Sh*t: Romney Supporters From Ohio Don't Even Know!  #WSHH via

Nate Silver just moved Obama's chances back down to 92.0 from 92.2 percent. Romney comeback?

#romneydisappointments I laugh about climate change, who am I? Romney!

As Dixville Notch goes, so goes the nation??? Romney, 5, Obama, 5. #DixvilleNotch

4 years of Romney, please, NO, arrghhhhh **panting**. #nightmare

Heard President Obama's last campaign speech. Race is not why I voted for him, but it makes me proud to see a BLACK MAN accomplish this much

All the best Barrack Obama today

My friends are more awesome than your friends by the amount of national debt Obama has let accumulate over the past four years. #iWentThere

Who will win tomorrow? Ugly nigga monkey face #obama or ugly white old mormon face #romney #badluckamerica

If Romney wins I'm not moving to Canada. I am, however, going up there to get legally wasted to prepare for four years of Hell

Watching this video and this crazy old lady said Obama's father was a Muslim, Atheist, and Communist. How does that work?

Wow, Obama has 21 mil followers on twitter. Hope people are just following to see and retweet the stupid things that come out of his mouth..

If Mitt Romney wins, I'm suggesting black people in USA start organizing the Underground Railroad again.

U.S Election Day today!!! Americans, make sure you vote for Barrack Obama #TEAMOBAMA

Dixville Notch a tie for Romney and Obama both get 5 votes

You will be part of the 30 percent of Obama supporters allowed to vote.

Bad sign?   Obama Ends Campaign in Half-Empty Arena

Springsteen's performance at the Obama rally was sensational. 63 years old, in the freezing cold in short sleeves. This train,  all aboard.

I won't be flippant and I won't be aggressive:  if you vote for Romney you're a moron.  Whoops.

Romney not trustworthy after Massachusetts tax lie   #VOTEOBAMA

Espn won't be inviting Romney onto their shows like Obama has

Real talk, some of these Romney voters just straight up racist for real

what do you think Obama's beliefs on anti-outsourcing? - Vinay K asked: Will countries like India which depends on

Get Out  VoteDon't forget how Bush won by just 547 votes in FL that changed the course of the world. Happy Election Day! #Obama

Bruce Springsteen Rocks Swing States for Obama

Hey Romney are you on right now????? Nope the PRESIDENT is and his name is Obama

Obama 23, Romney 9 in Harts Location, NH.

Most Read: Obama-Romney Adu Jotos bak Jagoan Street Fighter

If u don't vote toma plz don't be bitching if Obama don't win!!!

How Romney gone run for President in an Easter suit and tie in November Boo No.

After seeing what I just saw on espn, I think Obama has good chance of being sports caster if this president thing doesn't work out

Those girls come in like Navy Seals how they was quick with it. I wonder if that was the seal team Obama used

that's a very generous Romney map especially in Iowa, Wisconsin, Colorado

Is going 2 vote 4 Obama 2 morra. Something inside me tells me that Romney might b worse than better. #HopeObama

Obama . you just  you need to win  ok ? #Enoughsaid

WASHINGTON (Reuters) - President Barack Obama and Republican challenger Mitt Romney face the verdict of voters o

We only can have one president at a time. Someone should tell Romney. He's talking about working on the Nov 7th.  Please vote for Obama!!!

I wish Obama was our president

Mitt Romney is giving everyone a new car if elected.

Okay so I'm not a big Obama fan but he just earned mad props in my book Having Jay-Z preform at your rally is awesome!! #HOV

I just made my FB profile picture the same Obama photo it was on election day in 08. I'm off the charts neurotic at this point. Truly.

I agree Christie had to get $ for NJ, but he didn't have to pander. A MR win means Obama couldn't short funding btwn now  Jan.

Be honest with me, after this 99 Problems (Mitt Romney edition) has Jay-Z jumped the shark?

I hope they block me think about it mitt Romney blocking u on twitter omg id tribal dance

Romney doesn't know his football

Have Nevadans forgotten about the contempt Obama has for them? Do they remember him trashing Vegas not long ago?

These commercials that talk shit ab Obama

I pray Romney don't win this election! #VoteOrDie

Imma say this vote for Obama because you Truely believe in what he tryna do not cause he black y'all sound dumb have a seat

A crude extrapolation from Obama/McCain county totals in OH early vote would hand it to Romney easily. But that's not how it works.

If Obama wins the election, he can finally proclaim his undying love for shawarmas. It's his last term, and it won't be easy to impeach him.

Not that any of you care but Obama is cool and most of Europe would gladly elect him

Losing your job is hard- just ask the 23 million Americans who have no job under the Obama economic policies.

4 more years for #Obama and I'm not even American!

Romney and Obama tie in Dixville-Notch! #BUNews

Every GOP voter Every Conservative voter now is the time to vote for MITT ROMNEY!

I'm voting for Obama because the barrage of US election coverage in the Australian media has given me the mistaken impres

If u niggas, i mean Literally,u niggas voted or voting for  romney, ur the dumbest ass niggas eva..make the rite choice and vote #obama..

when did rockers go political? You never hear Iron Maiden sing about Obama or Reagan or Romney! They are the reason rock rolls

As long as #Obama stands his place as President of U.S. then I won't be that mad that my power still isnt on.

You know how many old Black folks will be praying for Obama later? If you need something, better ask God now.

I hope is ready to marry me if Romney wins. I ain't about to be gay during his reign as King of the Bigots

Breaking News! Five uninformed voters in Dixville Notch USA vote for Myth Romney and that widow's peak guy

#southpark has Obama a greyish tint  he sounDs like a cracker smp. This shoW has no enVeLope to push iTs sTraiGhT #cWaZey

yo, fuck Romney. I'm tired of this dude.

GET YOUR ASSES UP ad VOTE PA tomorrow!!! Re-elect PRESIDENT Barack Obama for his 2nd TERM!!!

IF MITT ROMNEY WINS WE NOT GON HAVE NO WEAVE!!!! YA BITCHESSS BETTTA VOTE

LeBron picks supporting Obama over selling shoes: LeBron picks supporting Obama over selling shoes.

I know, right? Obama has been doing a lot of stuff to get the country back to the top and people still hate on him, *smh*

What exactly is romney planning on doing to us women?

But then I got to thinking, if he did pray about it  God lead him to vote for Obama, would he even do it ???

IMPORTANT NEWS!!!If you're voting for Obama, go and vote TOMORROW!!!If you're voting for Romney, go and vo

Romney warns that re-electing Obama would lead to govt shutdown, fiscal default and other things GOP tried to do

Hope this isn't a sign of what's to come tomorrow: Obama-Romney tie in Dixville Notch

Obama gained average of 1.5 pts between 12 national polls published today. Big sample sizes. That's a pretty big deal.

jus lost a follower.must be a romney fan

US decides in a free nd fair election..go Obama!!!

ima be looking like little. Bill fuck outta here Obama better win LMFAO

Election Day Presidential Odds Have Obama A Virtual Certainty to Beat Romney: Though pundits are expecting a lon

Navy Seal Team Six Admiral: Obama a Fantastic Commander-in-Chief  via

Watching fresh prince of bel air . I need to be going to bed so I can wake up early and vote for Obama :)

You'll be worse off if you vote in Romney-Ryan for 4 yearsthe 47 percent will become 87 percent

not good enough to be good for Romney either

Sherrod Brown Dances To Jay-Z At Obama Rally (VIDEO)

Romney ugly ass can suck on my big monkey balls lhh

Tomorrow Can Change Our Future Either For Better Or Worse !! It's In Our Hands To Make The Right Decision !! V O T E OBAMA AND BIDEN !!

We must come out in NUMBERS to support the President of the United States for 4 more years! #Obama

Nate Silver's last analysis of all nationwide and state polls gives Barack Obama a 92% to win the elections today:

Well said. If you have Faith in God, you can move mountains, Obama too!

IM VOTING 4 OBAMA WAT ABOUT U

like people didn't talk about that before Obama was elected because of his race?

No, representatives of the as opposed to Obama campaign RT Did you mix up democrat and republican there?

I'm not gone rate the snowman n the ciroc Obama

Seen A Man In NewBrunswick Ripping Down Obama Signs  Replacing Them With Romney Signs , Then A Bunch Of Black Peop

Any nigga that sucks old limp white dick (Romney) should not be president?

Melissa Rosenberg tosses up her support for Barack Obama on the eve of the election! #gobama #boldinkawards

Ayariga:Obama says yes we can't  . Obama:butthis Ayariga is jon paa o. yes and can't? he went to school for the death.

oh no! :'( i mean neither are great choices but obama had his chance!

on the political compass scale. romney and obama are only 2 marks from eachother. niether will need my vote that much. so ill keep it.

OMG! U ppl really don't have a cluedo more research. Obama makes me feel like I shld be pregnant  on welfare!! #chooseyouramerica

Brian from Ohio - Obama for America 2012 Television Ad:  via

Why a conservative evangelical Christian is voting for President Obama

Yes,does sound like president Obama.doesn't it?

#Election2012 #Obama left people in #Benghazi and now on the East Coast after #Sandy to die without backup! This is becoming a pattern!

Well, it's Election Day. Pray for our country and that Romney pulls this out.

you're an Obama supporter and with your assbackwards ideas you call politics i can only assume two things stupid or democrat

Why sure I'm gonna go vote with anybody that wants to vote for Romney.   #RomneyWinning

My T.V. shows for the passed couple weeks have consisted of CNN, MSNBC, and FOX NEWS. #Obama

Hoping and crossing my fingers that Obama wins this election..He is CHANGE and will bring the country many great th

If Obama wins again I'm moving to china

How you lose all your teeth, hair smokin crack and you makin more than romney just workin corners? You must be workin overtime?

All you people that can vote. Get the fuck up and do it. Vote for OBAMA!!!!  Fuck Romney!

Yes I agree! I guess tomorrow it's all about Obama the Romney Slayer.

Seeing all these idiots on my TL saying they are gna move to Canada if Obama wins tomorrw, makes me want him to win even more. #BuhBye

Duda Said Obama Won the Job lmaooo

I'm actually very excited to see who's gonna become president. I think Obama got it tho. It would be embarrassing if he didn't.

Mitt Romney changed his policies so many times just to get people on his side, u can't trust a person like him

On a serious note though21st century slavery if Mitt Romney gets in yo

Romney doesn't pay taxes, he profited $15M's on the auto bailout  his economic advisor was Bush's advisor. Jussayin. You know what to do.

voters 4 #Obama may be down from 2008 but he's still beating #Romney so what's your point? Lines in FL also contributes!

If you vote for Mitt Romney don't talk to me

Mitt Romney goin for guns! so dat means dis world is gonna b even more dangerous and anybody might get shot at any moment god forbid

If Romney win I'm taking that manager position at my job (KFC) *sigh

If Obama doesn't win ima stop eating pussy

Under Obama soldiers go to prison for telling the truth about war crimes. #FreeBradleyManning

I never see no Romney supporters tweetinwhere yal at?matter fact #lameniggabequite

damn right I'm home alone to smh if something happens to me make sure that Romney nigga loses  they stop tbt on IG

To be honest Moira, the only time I would watch,those garbage channels would be if Romney wins Tuesday.

I'm voting because I truly believe that if I don't, Romney will win by one vote. #vote

IM VOTING #OBAMA TODAY IF YOU ARERETWEET THIS AND SHARE TO THE WORLD #wearemobingfoward

Obama: 'fired up, ready to go' one more time: Des Moines, Iowa (CNN) - President Barack Obama delivered his fina

Robert Paisola News Romney back to NH for last rally and voter pitch: Republican presidential ca  World News Zone

Everyone remember to pick Obama FIRST when votin then choose.all democrats

I hope All u Illiterate ass College Students Vote for Obama .. Need all The Education Y'all can get!

Shut up about the election already ! Obama won its a done deal , now go pee and go to bed !

Get out there and #vote. Its easy to say u support Obama but unless u vote, there's no point. #TeamObama.

I really don't know how anyone can vote for Obama with a clear conscience, but millions will do so tomorrow.

Obama's crocodile tears are for HIMSELF, y'all. He had a huge opportunity, and he screwed it up. And he knows we know.

I'm predicting Obama will take an early lead tomorrow Until all the Republicans get off work. You will win

Don't worry Obama supporters, welfare checks and food stamps will be accepted as payment for SEPTA to take you to the voting booth

lowkey hope romney wins and cuts off my financial aidthass the only way moms will let me drop outta college.

#Election2012 #ohio #florida Romney reminds me of the characters in the Wizard of OZ. No heart, brain, courage  after tomorrow No home

Farting in an envelope and mailing it to Mitt Romney.

Remember to get out there and vote for Romney! If you're not gonna do that, I have cookies at the bottom of the pit for you.

If Obama wins, my dad says he is considering my idea to move to Australia. YES.

this shit serious, we might have a President n office named Romney u think that nicca care bout tracks? Lol, no more bundles

Watching a Video.. 5 Reasons To Vote For Mitt Romney: This election is a choice. And the simp  Chris Jones Gaming

#imsickof this election im ready for obama to win already

Obama Would Push For Fiscal Cliff Deal If Re-Elected, Democratic Aides Say  Of course!!!

If you're 18+ and you see this, you better get your ass to bed right now so you can wake up early to vote for Obama! Every vote counts!

Bottom line. Obama has been an absolute failure on the Domestic  foreign fronts.His skin color has nothing to do with it.It's his idyolgi

last one from me. if you believe in obama then please come give me all the money you worked for tomorrow and ill spend it on hockey sticks.

If Romney was black, would you still vote for Obama.

President Obama crushes Romney in Hart's Location, New Hampshire: Election day is already here  unske

Christian talkin bout obama theme song is hold me back by rick ross LMBOOO i can just imagine Obama playin that when h

I swear if I see another Obama or Romney ad, I'll vote for Gary Johnson.

Rupert Murdoch Has Given Up on Mitt Romney:                 Throughout the election, Rupert Murdoch has taken on the role of the wi

hell yes. it's not even funny. Obama is trying to do the right thing. Unlike Romney.

Obama wants u 2 vote out of REVENGE!  Revenge 4 what? loving  being proud of America?

I'm not I LOVE Obama. That's why I said that my party would include nooses if Mitt won Lol.

so my local butcher wants me to 2 bet on an obama win. I dnt think al do it coz the steaks are too high 4 me.

Early voting poll in Colorado has good news for Obama

FOLLOW ME BARACK OBAMA PLASEE

if you let Romney determine your future then thats YOUR problem . if you can let someone other than God control you

MT MT FBI Voter Intimidation Hotline/Keep this number-202-514-1888/Program this number  RT #obama

[National #Obama] Hurricane Sandy. Approve 67% (NBC News/Wall St J.) #polls -

Split decision in #newhampshire 5 for Romney 5 for Obama. First time there's been a tie. #Election2012

November 6 Surprise! Obama won Michigan, that's a good start. Not good for Romney, he lost his birth state

#Obama was late for a recent campaign event. He was delayed trying to get all of Chris Christie's slobber off #BarackHooch #BigWetKisses

Justin is Team Obama. you know it.

He might not have done enough but Romney has not shown he can do better. Evangelicals don't trust him, most undecided don't get him

The US presidential election is going down to the razor's edge. Interesting is the result. Romney or Obama? :D

But a rep or senator from an area Romney won has no reason to accept that unless pop vote is overwhelming.

23 -9  sounds right to me. Can't imagine who would vote for that lying piece of garbage, Mitt Romney

Ion Kno y it be so hard for me too sleep at nite#Team OBAMA

Vote For Obama He's A Fucking Pimp !

If romney wins.. Just find you a crack pipe and beem up!

The Obama Campaign and Democratic Party, purposely mishandled and prevented members of the military from voting or casting ballots. CONT

Dear Friends, it is in your best interest not to talk to me until after the election.If Obama wins don't plan on ever talking to me again.

who r u voting for I hope it's obama

I want to see obama and romney debate after two cans of the o.g. 4lokos

why is obama hanging with jay-z?? Hes a felon!! He can campaign  for him but he sure cant vote!

Hi twitter everybody know today is your last day to vote please vote for Obama because if you vote for Romney ladies our weave gone be gone.

maybe then we can ask Obama to come and be our Pres! We'll take him in.

:: Get Out  Go Vote Tomorrow! It's Imperative! #2012Election #OBAMA

and my vote goes to Michelle Obama.. that lady is really amazing

Obama  Romney Today we see what they've been doing all this time

For those who are making a mistake tomorrow and voting for Romney, just stay home. Thanks. #Obama

the coolest people are from Chicago. Obama, Yeezy, Floss, R.Kelly, Bueller, etc.w/ the exception of Oprah

I'm not trying to influence anyone's vote tomorrow, but I'm pretty sure I just saw Mitt Romney throw a sack full of puppies into a river.

First NDAA next up martial law maybe something else something worse even? never know with a man like obama smh

DTN Japan: Romney back to N.H. for last rally and voter pitch: Mitt Romney returned Monday night to the state wh

Hoping Obama gets the win tomorrow! #ObamaNation #2012election #Obama2012

So sick of hearing about the election tomorrow. OMG.  Also, telling me to vote for Obama, isn't going to make me vote for Obama. Sorry.

In all honest, if Romney wins, it's a sure sign that the world is ending in December.

In Ohio, if I'm reading this right, Bush/McCain counties seeing 14.39% increase, while Kerry/Obama counties seeing -4.10. However

Rapper Jay-Z warmed up the crowd at an Obama rally in Columbus, Ohio today with the most obvi  #apbfeed #tcot #p2

Christie has an Obama/Biden sign up in his lawn nowadays lol

Linda  Richard Eyre: How a Romney win might affect Mormons | Deseret News

Romney back to N.H. for last rally and voter pitch

i hope Romney wins tomorrow because im bored of Obama. If romney wins i can't wait for the hijinks.

if he was running for prime minister he would still be in power. Alot of Canadians r anti-Romney anti-republican

I really hope that Obama wins.. I'd vote for Obama but I can't.. #voteobama

NO NOT AT ALL. He is a competent leader. Who care about everyday people. He really does. Romney is for the RICH u know that

Can't wait to see everybody faces when they say welcome y'all president Obama walks out

If Romney wins Africans we gone !

Sam Emfinger Obama will find the murderers of Chris Stevens and Tyrone Woods just like O.J. said about Nicole

Make sure you all vote tomorrow. And please use your heads. I know I follow a lot of level headed people. #change #nobama #romney

My debate on Romney's 5-Point Plan appears 11/1/12 on WMBF NBC News Myrtle Beach, South Carolina, Raycom News Network!

I really don't give 2 shits about the american election but I'm gonna vote for obama because he's a reall nigga

This American Jew broad can't comprehend another MOT voting for Romney.

I wish Romney all the best

Republicans for Obama? That's like Nuns for Porn. Or Saudi Oil Kings for Electric Cars. Makes no sense.

As soon as I made that romney tweet my internet stopped working . watch out he gon' get you too

Vote For Obama, Romney Gone Fuck The World Up

Obama never has a never will want to take our guns..

Obama PLEASE Win PLEASE, Smh I Need To Change The Channel, CNN Got Me Tweaking Smh

If Romney win nobody is doing nothing so be quiet

Tomorrow is my birthday, if I wish for Romney to be President, and then tell everyone that I wished it, it won't come true right?

didnt say that but he is responcible for the mess that began and obama continued. But all u repubs throw in all the rest

OBAMA fo ya mama Romney trying to take away wat makes life easy fo ya go vote!

not voting obama only because i come from a coal mining towneveryone i lovecare abt are coalminers there future depends on coal

R in that case Obama lol. Romney has no say in what I decide to do with my female areas. Lol

vote for patrick not pedro or romney or obama. PATRICK STAR

Small number and considering that the candidates are already tied, #Obama feels the rush now more than #Mitt hahaha

Dey jus put me iff the Obama and Romney page I think i was going to hard lol Y folks so sensitive dese days Bytch u started it

he isnt taking away student loans! Abortion is terribel and obama is against it too he just says he doesnt care to get votes!

if Romney kills Obamacare, that's fairly significant changehow are Congress prognostications?

I remember when Obama won in '08and us partying it up!!! knowing damn well was suppose to be in set lmao Paid for that shit.

Oh yea the Obama rally 2day was great even tho I was freezing

Come on america vote obama can't have romney screwing u over and putting u bk to 2008 #voteobama

My future as a black female college student could be in the hands of Mitt Romney and I'm terrified, to say the least.

DOWN TO THE WIRE: Mitt Won't Quit, Eyes Ohio, as Obama Wraps in

Josh farro supports Romney? What the actual fuck?

Obama! 4 more years!! I wish I had a vote #canadianproblems

CNBC:Traders Bet on Romney Stocks as Election Nears

Lawd please don't let Romney win

You notice that people are concerned libs will riot if Obama loses. Nobody's talking about conservatives rioting if he wi

America decides today. Whilst national polls close I think Obama will be well clear on those college votes #uselection #president #USA

Obama has tasteless JayZ for his last ralley night degrading Romney - classy Mr President - as usual.

SBS NorthAmerica: Obama, Romney end tumultuous White House campaign: Barack Obama and Mitt Romney made their fin

Road trip to rally people for Romney-Ryan

Fm the outside looking in, libs attacking Kid Rock  celebrities who endorsed Romney.Obama has the A-listers but this's unnecessary

#POTUS is right voting is the best revenge I waited 4 years to vote him out of office. I am voting for love of my country #Romney is it!

I think sum of the Romney supporters aren't really gon b tht stupid, jus actin an whn the get in there they gon vote Obama #cnt b so stupid

Lets go Obama. Can't wait to vote in the am.

People Really Thought I Was Serious Wen I Said * I Voted For Romney * Lmfao

I'd rather take a shower at Penn State than vote for Obama #Realchange #Romney

I'm upset the fact that Obama is gonna lose due to the hometown Skins isn't getting any press.  17-1 with that record.

Obama to Iowa: Let's finish what we started - USA TODAY

Nate Silver's 538 blog now has Obama a slight favorite to win Florida. You can bet him at +190 on 5dimes.

LOVE BOTH ROMNEY AND FRIDAY NIGHT LIGHTS!!! Watching it now.

no.. He is talking about killing Obama.

#maketherightchoiceAmerica #Obama me too! I get anxiety !!

Start packing your bags in case Romney some how, surprisingly wins.

Romney all d way I pray u win d presidency

i can't wait to wake up and vote for obama

CNN eletoral map Obama 237 Romney 206 .I pray Obama should make it

I cant believe how trill Obama is for bringing Jay Z out.

Whos ready to crawl under a rock for the next 4 years if obama wins

But honestly though, what happens if Mitt Romney wins, does he have to work on Sundays? #religiousconflicts #morman

If Obama loses tomorrow, there's gonna be some angry negros

He is going off about Romney

I love Barack OBama as a person

Mitt Romney Holds Rally In Town Where Trayvon Martin Was Gunned Down  via

Why does Hugo Chavez ask Americans to vote for Obama? Think about that. Why? 4 your own sake vote for Romney Ryan

#ElectionNightSurprises Mitt Romney wins, middle class rejoices

Lord please help us if Obama doesn't come out on top tomorrow.

my future is on the line .please keep Barack Obama as my president  (:

Mitt Romney ships jobs to China and profits..  Read  Explain to me how this man cares about Americans.

Cheers! For a Romney victory!  Malone's Irish Pub  Restaurant)

lol iknow.but if romney win that mean more wars for us!

Obama doing some last minute bragging about extra-judicial killings and Republicans bragging about torture that prov

Romney has given 28 years of unpaid service to this Country. There is no question in my mind who has won this deal

If youre a dem that doesnt like Obama but cant stomach voting for Romney, better not to vote at all than vote for Obama again. #StayHome

I am definitely with Obama on this one!! #DontVoteTwittRomney

In a LiL Over 24 Hours We'll Know If this Country Will Be Moving FORWARD(OBAMA) Or Backwards(Romney)..Damn, I Don't Wann

I'm scared to see how the world would be if #OBAMA doesn't win so let's not make that happen #VoteObama2012

What's gonna happen after Obama .. Fuck.. .__.

literally going to kill myself/ move if Romney wins.

Four More Years!!! Four More Years!!! Today is the day. Mitt Romney is Moonwalkin that shit dead (no pun intended) FORWARD!!! With Obama

Watching the hunger games makes me depressed cause I really feel like Romney will do this to us

Firing Obama is the First Step to an Economic Recovery

Im just kidding i LOVE Romney. Im delirious too. I just thought id throw that out there.

Does anyone remember what a non political commercial looks like? Are they still making new products for stores?  #Romney #Obama #1moreday

Watch recording of  Barack Obama on the campaign trail and his final campaign speech along with Michelle. #Obama2012

There's just as many white people voting against Obama because he's black as there are blacks voting because he's black.

Dear Father God, I pray that you will bless USA with a Congress  Senate that will work with President Obama the next 4 years, Amen.

Obama win or lose will always be an idol to me and I will make sure my kids understand his importance to us minorities.

Vote for Obama individually tomorrow. DO NOT pick vote all democrat! It will exclude him from the vote! #SpreadTheWord

Vote For OBAMA, Or Every Black Mfer Gone Be Twerking For Foodstamps :(

Mitt Romney after he loses

Watched a documentary on Mitt Romney on PBS. It's crazy how so many people know Romney is full of shit, yet him

Obama!! I saw him this year at a speech in Washington. Plus michelle is hot. #voteobama

whaaa??  FOX predicts Obama will win.   Is that the sound of teabaggers jumping off bridges? FOX?!

300 Obama lawyers enroute to Dixville Notch to toss votes!  RETWEET - National Voting (cont)

wins the #FITN New Hampshire town of Harts Location. Obama supporters were on hand. #Forward! #BigMo!

Goodnight all! Tomorrow is a big day! Its important! Obama! Obama! Obama! Obama! Let's Do it! We did it before and we will

please go vote for #Obama, you meant to say ;)

Maybe after tomorrow Obama can be arrested for high crimes and misdemeanors.  At least Holder.

black woman and immigrant, who id vote if I could ? NO BRAINER !!! Wish Obama could do 12 years ! ILLBE ABLE TO VOTE NEXT ELECTION LOL

Obama gotta a regular fade bro.. momma say don't trust a nigga wit a regular fade

I knew you'd be team Obama

First Election Day voters, in N.H., give Obama lead: Tiny Dixville Notch ties 5-5, Obama-Romney, and Hart's Location

Vote for Obama. Romney will screw you.

I've said it before and I'm gonna say it again. Mitt Romney is a hunk!

Hindu. First result exactly split between Obama, Romney

a vote for romney is a vote for money .and i like money

Hart's Location Election Results 2012: Obama 23, Romney 9, Johnson 2: By tradition, the town of Hart's Location,

RT Don't make a MITTstake, Vote Obama

Barack Obama and Mitt Romney make closing arguments in final campaigning before an election too close to call. #BBC

All these Top Nigerians commenting about U.S election and even advising them on what to do, President Obama said

- leaving work early to go vote.  you know damn well #OBAMA HAS MY VOTE!!!!! he got this shit in the bag. i have #FAITH in my president.

If Obama don't win tomorrow I'm taking all my life issues out on white people.

we had a little vote in the high school doe !  I vote for Obama LMFAO.

And if Romney wins I'm gonna simply get out the military and/or live overseas for the rest of my life and when I die I'll be buried in Guam

Obama Mirror Image of Hoover With Lessons From 1930s - Bloomberg

This old guy talking about how good Romney is makes me want to punch him in the face.

So if Obama doesn't win the election..people are going to blame sis deborahlool

I really am gonna be in my feelings if Obama loseIma be depressed

Christians that support Romney will tell you but if you ask a Christian who supports obama than your discussing their personal life? #bull

obama is a lier and we can impeach him with his own words goto bing type obama admits he's from kenya RT follow vote for future vote mitt

#hoodmandate builds up from the local work we do. It pre-dates Obama's Presidency and extends beyond it. We need to deliver ourselves. #GRO

Romney's Images from the final week of the campaigns .

Are you satisfied with Obama's explaination on Benghazi? The way he explained himself to the families of our Amb. a

EVERYBODY ITS VERY IMPORTANT THAT YOU STOP WHATEVER YOUR DOING TMRRW AND GO VOTE FOR OBAMA !!!!!!!!!!IF YOU CAN

Romney looks like he touches little boys.

NO PRESSURE OBAMA N DA CLUTCH

dont tell me you want romney to win?

If Obama don't win tonite yall know its gonna be a #Riot

Romney has changed positions on SO many issues, it's embarrassing.

when the redskins lose the game before the election, the incumbent is more likely to lose and the challenger to win #Prediction #Romney

Bitches quick 2 say get out and vote and soon as you tell them you're voting for Romney they get evil. Wasn't your in

It's either OBAMA wins or ROMNEY loses

Romney doesn't consider women as people. He's got my vote

I mean how can you say Obama didn't do nothing in his 4 year term!?!? SMH just blinded, simple minded folks!

Just finished going over the propositions. I'm ready to vote. #Obama

he's a lier lied about birth goto bing type obama admits he from kenya and move to impeach

Let's say a little prayer for Barrack Obama

Mitt Wants To Ban WEAVE!!! #OBAMA Wants To Legalize WEED!!  So Who Will YOU Be Voting For?! #TEAMOBAMA

Aye what if Romney do win tho lol

Hope barak obama wins the vote, something sketchy about that romney!

he failed Massachusetts, they were 47th in jobs. Massachusetts supports OBAMA. check it out. Romney stands for nothing.lies

todays the big election day. it also could be the day I die since im killing myself if romney gets elected

Is Mitt Romney actually banning tampons? #ponderingquestion

If #Obama loses tomorrow, I'll be shocked and unhappy.#Election2012

The fact that Bob Dylan just endorsed Obama during his encore

Gotta love Obama's welfare reform.  Keep preaching brother man.

President Obama is the clear favorite. 4 + 4 equals what. #TeamObama

FIRED UP? READY TO GO! This is the kind of campaigning Obama is best at. #election2012

I hope everybody goes out there and votes! #Obama

Taking proper care of veterans is important. Can you let me know what Obama's done to harm you? I thought he did well by the troops

Hate all you want on #Obama, but #Romney is exactly what the world doesn't need. Or does it really even matter?

Please America, vote Obama for all our sakes #FourMoreYears #Obama

Obama better win tomorrow or else a nigga fina pack up his shit and go to Canada.

Recent tests on my Facebook wall have shown that FB is listing which friends are talking about Romney, while saying nothing about Obama.

Election day! Time to get rid of Obama!

it doesn't need to be close. It can be a landslide for Romney, the MSM will call it for Obama. Remember #Benghazi #tcot

Every second counts! Romney and Obama scramble for votes as they enter last  - Daily Mail

People like Romney ship jobs overseas for a better bottom line at the expense of the America. Blame corporate greed not

tbh if I HAD to pick one of them, like HAD to, sadly Romney would be it

Too close a margin, im even scared #Romney

I don't like neither candidates, I'm all for Ron Paul but watch just like Ron Paul predicted, Obama will win this election.

In my mind, this is how tomorrow night plays out. In my scenario for the 2012 election, Obama and Romney tie.

When she gone let me hit? When you Vote Obama

There is too many obama commercials here in cstat. It seems like they didn't have that shit in the cyp.

Romney's plans of creating jobs is some smart ass move. Lmaooo but it will only favor legal immigrants. Hahahaha he's a fucked up man.

My mama told me she voted for Romney. Yall don't understand how fast my daddy mean-mugged her ass..

I really have no preference to either Obama or Romney winning. Both have identical foreign policy plans for the next four years, which suck.

right cuz thats most def what obama want smh

A tie for Obama and Romney in nation's first results: The first presidential election results are in - and it's a tie.

If Romney wins I mind as well kiss all my black friends goodbye. RIP ya'll ;(

Lovely. Grp home accused of taking mentally ill 2vote4 #Obama

Presidential ellections; american followers, vote Obama!

I don't understand why Nigerians living in Nigeria will use 'Vote for Obama' as their dps.

Not only will it help Twitter issues, I believe it will thwart climate change, get Obama elected and finally give us jet packs.

What a second Obama term would mean for America

If i end up voting for Romney tmrw had nothing to do with it. I still think the way they presented the election was in poor taste

No Bretta, that's not how it works. Nate's predicting 315 EVs, incl. #Florida. #Obama has 92% change of winning election.

First election result in a small town of 10, Obama 5

A white man asked his black friend, 'Are you voting for Barack Obama just because he's black?' The black man responded by saying,

Corporation have more benefits and rights than the american people but people feel obama has made their lives better smh it's actually worse

If by misfortune the election is fraudulently called 4 Mitt Romney WE WILL BE CALLED UPON TO DEMONSTRATE WHO HOLDS THE POWER

did i say he wasnt gonna get re-elected? i just quoted a quote that fits obama supporters

I wish yall shut up. If Romney win yall just gonna move from section 8 into a shelter

You can't be running for office and start agreeing with the other candidates policies and plans. #MittIsDone #OBAMA #ChangePt2

Newspapers Increasingly Dump Obama For Romney  #IBDBlogs via

But if you like Romney because he's Mormon or you like Obama because he has a good speaking voice, you need some help

hey guys i am scad lets pray for obama to get back to whit6e house again

Call me when u vote bitch romney bitch

Thinking about doing skit about a Obama/Romney debate that would be priceless.

Amazing to see Obama has grown grey hair jst for an annual pay of $400k.and our senators in Nigeria are gettin paid $1.7m for nutin!life?

Zooey Deschanel has announced that she is casting her vote for President Obama.

i'm really afraid of what will happen to the USA if romney wins and i'm not even american.

:I think u just have to vote Obama ; miles away from american, most of us still see obama as the man for the job.

Holding thumbs!! Obama for 2nd term!!

WBEZ: No rest in final campaign hours for Obama, Romney

Gov't on steroids is Obama Admin. fantasy. He knows it won't work, but Rham and Axelrod like the pay to play part.  We lose in that game.

I'm voting for Obama because I believe he is the man that is going to turn the economy around for the middle class period.

Brief Betting Surge for Romney on Intrade

Fuck angel. Fuck her iphone. Fuck her emojis I can't see. Fuck mitt romney  fuck master p  romeo for making them nasty ass chips.

C'mon America, let's pretend Obama did a great job the last four years, 'cause voting Romney will take you nowhere faster #USelection

I don't see how Obama can say what he is selling is working Plain and simple.

I got faith that Obama is gonna win this election #OBAMA2012

According to Will Ferrell, all you need to do is vote for Barack Obama tomorrow night and he will do absolutely anything you say. Come on.

bro if romney win yall niggas gone live tha same . mentally , u'll fck yourselves , but physically, we're already doomed.. so it dont matta

If my white fans vote Romney! I understand! You gotta stand up for your own. So I am not mad at you either. We are s

Never before have I wished to be American quite so violently, just so I can vote for Obama.

If you don't vote tomorrow  Obama lose , don't complain when shit start changing !

Today America will make a choice between democracy and fascism. I hope democracy wins. #election2012 #forward #obama

#PresidentalDebate Doug Robinson: Romney vs. Obama has surprised pollster  #RealRomney

Tied in Dixville Notch, NH but large margin for Pres. Obama in Hart's Location, NH. #2012 #election

OBAMA VOTERS: he had 4 years to prove himself, and didn't. Don't be stupid, make a change!

Why is everyone tripping over school right now if Mitt Romney wins we're all going back to the cotton fields! #Vote20

My momma just said she'd be Lewinsky got Obama

I swear all obama does is repeat himself. Same thing for four years. #gtfo

Obama can win, doable, without either Ohio or Florida.

If Romney doesn't give his concession speech before I go to sleep.. I guess I'm pulling an all-nighter

everyone stalking up on poptarts at breakfast today's. cause if Romney win, there ain't gone be no more of that.

I think we have enough debt as is thank you, Romney has my vote

Republicans should silently privately Vote Democratic in 2012 because honest President Obama cares is steady proven mentally sound #Stable

Obama..You mean nobama.LOL Im so funny with my clever political tweet about the other candidate that is totally irrelev

US pres elections have an x factor. Plus Romney was chatting guans leading to the elections.

Pls pls and pls am nt feeling you guys rooting for Obama here in Nigeria,you dnt do dt during  ht

Obama should just make Romney illegal ..

Obama!! Cuz he's a lefty like me

If Romney wins I'm moving to Ireland withNo joke; hopefully Niall wont mind

Mitt Romney is a sleazeball.  Hope Obama gets back in.

Voting for Barack would be for selfish reasons, voting for Romney would be for economical reasons. Which to chose?

Why would anyone want Obama to win??? I don't fucking get it!

My dad said if Romney wins were moving to Canada.

And want my generation of kids to be successful,that's why I'm get my ass. up early tomorrow and vote for Obama

Feeling sick at the thought of a Romney win. Please US, vote Obama.

really put into perspective how not awesome it will be if obama doesn't win tomorrow :/

Mutt Romney is a cultist, homophobe, racist, bigamist, misogynist, and disgusting loser. He must not be voted into

You obviously can't fix THAT much stuff in 4 years, you guys expect so much. Obama for another 4 years and he'll do

#obama #romney I will vote for u ff back pls

its gonna be an obama day todaythe world is moving forward.. i pray naija gets there.. God bless Nigeria

Ok one more. Although he did inherit a horrible economy, I feel like Obama blames Bush too much and plays that card too often.

Why did the Economist  Financial Times endorse Obama? says it all.  sad.

If Romney wins I'll shave my head.#BarackObama

Don't be mad if Romney wins! I smell upset!

Everyday I'm Tumblin':  THIS IS OBAMA. GO!

Y'all vote for Obama FFS PLS

And let's concentrate on the important stuff here people #Obama is like a million times more handsome than #Romney ! Hahaha.

Don't say Obama did nothing with his term so why would it be any different this time and don't say Romney won't change anything, u dont know

I know I know little about American politics but I really do hope Obama gets to serve another term #Obama2012

Obama is going HAM on the last minute campaigning

oga charles they must be a reason why you like Obama

Dear America, Do the right thing today and reelect President Obama

Today is an important day for everyone! For Republicans it's the day we get to take Obama out of power for Democrats Halo 4 comes out today!

How Obama feel but never say shit

An #Obama win might mean safer lady parts, but I'm tired of gender-based issues just being used as an ideological battering ram b/w parties

Please please please let it be Obama.

but rly, OBAMA ALL THE WAY!!! ANOTHER 4 YEARS FOR 'MERICA!

Obama said in his ELECTION NIGHT speech in 08 that this work will take 2 terms. We all know it takes more than 3yrs from s

I vote freedom not Theocracy w Romney. The Mormon prophet rules Romney.

(NB: not now doing the twenty quid on Romney bit. I'm that confident, I'll risk paying for my own heartbroken bender.)

To my friends who support Romney: if he loses its because he was a doucheTo my friends who support Obama: don't shoot me I'm innocent.

on Wall Street are increasingly convinced that Barack Obama will win the election. #firedup #readytogo

Great photo from AP of #Obama shedding a tear at his final campaign stop in Des Moines, Iowa last night #uselection

Obama or Romney of course it's obama #teamObama

Abeg 4get mata Bobo don win American election: Obama now 98% likely to win, but conservatives disagree

Screw his tax returns, at this point I want to see the result of Romney's Voight-Kampff test.

Come on Americans, show the world that You care! #obama #yeswecan

Ladies, gentlemen, fanbases of twitter- If you voted Romney please note this tweet, press unfollow and get as far away from me as possible.

Is it just me or do all the selfish rich kids that I know wanna vote for Romney.  #ummmm sorry Obama is gonna win. peaceblessings

Obama or Mitt? Whose policy position is for the people's interest?

THIS IS THE MOST IMPORTANT ELECTION OF OUR LIVES ! IF YOU WANT BUSH ON STEROIDS VOTE FOR ROMNEY ! ! !

Obama. You? We're discussing propositions and she just tells me that and walks away like a db.lol

My friends and I were talking about Mitt Romney and he`s just not good for America on so many levels. #TheJEGroup! #Jobs

If Romney wins the elections, better for EU to start mobilizing most of the capital invested out of the USA.#ObamaForPresident #Obama

Obama - Romney are apparently neck and neck. Let's remind ourselves of Mitt's warmth and charm, shall we?

#Obama and #Romney are awful choices. Sad to see that either way we wont get what our country needs. Tomorrow I will be writing in #RonPaul

Gallops guess of R+1 national turnout makes Romney a 5 point winner according to this. What say you on final nat'l vote?

Yes he can  Barack OBAMA !!! #Election

How is mitt Romney getting votes? I think he's too bad to be true. Like obamas supposed to win

Obama ends campaign in Iowa with call for change  - Did Obama just endorse Romney?

Oh, I do like youI just don't like Obama

My president is black, my FACEBOOK is blue. I'm voting for Obama, the fuck Romney gonna do?

A Romney-Biden White House? It could happen

Son I can't wait till Election Day over and Obama win so people could stfu

I'm cheering for Obama! GO OBAMA!

Discuss the presidential elections ! Barack Obama vs. Mitt Romney - The Orange Room

Who rules the Twittersphere?Obama vs Romney

Yeah I think so too. Although most of my American friends prefer Romney

I favorited a video from  Gov. Gary Johnson debates Barack Obama and Mitt Romney

God bless my new #Republican #Followers. Together we can stant strong with the USA and #Romney. Let's save USA for

Obama might have a lead in the polls but YOU STILL NEED TO VOTE. VOTE VOTE VOTE.

Damn got it going on! Romney's wiener and an anon who wants her feet all over him!

Romney vetoed a bill that gives women who were raped access to emergency contraception #VoteObama #RomneyDisappointments

I guess this is where Obama leaves the White House and it becomes a White's House.

I'm a Aussie If I could vote I would be voting for you Mr Obama I only hope you Country gets it right

Unbelievable! #Romney paid no tax 14 years  So Harry Reid was right  #zerotaxes #c

Marxism is as dead as Marx. Romney Ryan.

The Unknown Candidate (Curtis Winfrey vs. Barack Obama vs. Mitt Romney) (DandrellScottLIVE) The e  #video #obamaorromney

Looool! If Obama and Romney gets 269 electoral votes to tie. Its gonna be Romney for President and Biden for Vice-president#knowthelaw

My people in yankee,u always get it right,today should not be different,vote Obama

Obama's name sounds SOOOOO Meereen, and Romney is like TOTALLY Westeros. So there's that. I'm going to bed. #wedonotsow

Sleeper group that will decide presidential election: veterans who returned from Iraq, Afghanistan to joblessness. #election #obama #romney

Please vote for our county, our freedoms, our God given rights. ROMNEY/RYAN!!! Every single vote counts!!!

Obama will win tomorrow, will it be by a lot? No, but he will win. Weds is when we will find out. Will be 2000 all over again. Do I want

If Romney wins Hoes gon have to stop Twerking and Start Working #RealTalk

Best ever Freudian slip on right now. 'Americans are going to the polls to vote for their president, Barack Obama'

if you don't vote for obama today i'm going to find you and shave your head

can't tell you how glad it makes me that you're with Obama on this! #Obama2012

Is the Truth Hateful? Obama has a Secret Kill list..NY Times says. He appointed M. Taylor of Monsanto as head of FOOD.

Looool! If Obama and Romney gets 269 electoral votes to tie. Its gonna be Romney for President and Biden for Vice-preside

4 More Years with Obama. Vote November 6, 2012 last day at the Voting Polls.

Michelle Obama to Florida Voters: 'Don't let anybody push you out of line'

hashtag Canada hashtag socialism hashtag poverty hashtag iPhones for the welfare hashtag honeybooboo on Obama's shoulders

If Mitt Romney wins the world ends right? #election2012

If america votes for Romney i'll lose every respect for this amazing country. #GoObama #ObamaForward

I may not be American but come on Obama. 4 more years #obama2012

All focus on Obama vs. Romney but some further Norges Bank's thoughts in today's Nordic Alert:

And I can sing all the words to the Barack Obama song as well yeah

I liked a video from  Romney calls out Obama's 'revenge' voting

President Obama is the real deal--a claim that could never be made about Romney no matter how much one tries.

I hate Romney, come on obama

To everyone planning to leave the country if Romney wins, good luck. Find your free stuff elsewhere, I'm tired of paying for it.

All dz nigerians ranting about U.S.A and Obama shud just take a break

Obama called to encourage us in Washington to re-define marriage.  Mr. President - We don't have the right to do what is wrong. Abe Lincoln

If obama doesn't get re-elected I will be angry

People, can't sleep worrying about this election crap!! It's 2:30am here and I need to be up for work soon Ugh! Obama, say it will be ok!

mfs steady talking about team obama but romney winning -________-

Today is going to be exciting! #Electionday i hope obama wins!

Obama, Romney Court 'Monday Night Football' Vote - ABC News (blog): The Plank on  (blog)Obama

well, Romney is an idiot and most people who are voting for him aren't really voting for him so much as voting against Obama.

My #Christian friends, if Obama re-elected, we'll loose r religious freedom to worship God. WHAT WOULD #JESUS DO? Would he vote for #Obama?

Vote Barrack Obama Out Of Office Today:  via

To every American eligible to vote I implore you to vote for Obama, the world does not need another economic crisis

I'm as close to middle these days, but still an Obama fan given these choices today

If Romney wins I won't have kids

No stance on gun control. A ban on gay marriage. Depriving the poor of funds for education-if #Romney gets in, it'll be

Obama 2012 OBAMA 2012: Change we can believe in Quotes from President Obama's speech at the Henry F  #video #barackobama

I didn't care 4 Erin Burnett cutting off Obama to hear Mitt! It's obvious that Erin is biase Rom

Vote #Obama - the lesser of two evils. Romney is a typical #USA tit!

If Mitt Romney wins the election, America will go to shit. .-.

That's good news! I hadn't even realised you were in its path! Obama or Romney by the way, or neither?

Romney smokes Pall Malls and u gonna vote for him lol

#VOTE #ROMNEY! Vouchercare, Emergency Room visits for NORMAL care, More homeless Veterans, chance of Paul Ryan as President

You hang out with this Reed person, yet it's President OBAMA who is going restrict your religious freedoms?

i dunno i need more edumacation but if Romney win i will have to steal other people knowledge .-.

Friends, don't boast if Romney wins tomorrow, rejoice in The Lord's provision. If Obama wins, don't cause quarrels, trust God's appointing.

If Romney wins god help us all

Mitt Romney would most likely become president, and Joe Biden would most likely become Vice President.

Barack Obama is trending hi Niall hi

After seeing all the brilliant people on twitter endorse Obama, you'd better all sort it out and make him win! Seriously, we ALL need it!

If Mitt Romney gets in to power, the whole world is absolutely unequivocally fucked

not being covered for preexisting conditions. Obama can't read a balance sheet so don't make him look like a genius

OBAMA'S CHANGES! (Official Music Video):  via

I know that all politicians are liars,but I think mitt Romney is bigger liar than president Obama..

Will Romney benefit from the black scarecrow? Will democracy suffer from the 2-party system?

Obama's Kenyan step-granny is against abortion  says there's nothing wrong with a spot of wife beating:  by

Obama better win because he is black

i dnt even live in america but if mitt romney wins the election il lose my faith in humanity

We do believe in ObamaI'm italian but I hope Obama win this time tooKiss from Italy!

Come on America it's time to vote #Obama2012 #ObamaBiden2012 #OBAMA  YES YOU CAN !

Sure hope Romney wins in a landslide!

I hope Romney does win. Then we can start a revolution and overthrow the government.

I voted as my mom did for Romney-Ryan - Republicans. I am so glad we did. November 6th or before do the same. Save o

#vote2012 shame none Americans can't vote, I'd well vote for Obama.

U.S Election Poll: D-Day For Obama, Romney

Why would any one vote for Romney, he's a knob #voteObama

Romney gne take adidas  polo out  throw so reeboks kswiss in that bit lol

Pisses me off that people are saying Obama will be ahead till republicans get off work. Bitches I work 11 hour days #stfu

This white lady got on the elevator and said something about Obama has a 91% chance of winning

Mitt Romney just looks like the biggest douche #obama2012

Obama and Romney put fate in voters' hands

Mitt hun, the world wants obama

Obama can blame it on the toxic legacy of the economy, Romney on the damage done to the Republican brand.

I voted Obama for a reason i know he will keep fighting for us so if your Romney goodbye to everything you want to happen.

Obama voters, if you're away at college, working, overseas, make sure you send in absentee ballots:

Dear God, thank you for all the blessings. And please let Barack Obama remain our President. Amen. Nite!

Obama better win. I'M not even American, but Obama is way better than mitt.. he's retarded

NYT Nate Silver latest Nov. 5: Late Poll Gains for Obama Leave Romney With Longer Odds - only 8% chance now

There seem to have been some issues at a Romney rally in PA

The blacks aint just gone be fucked if Romney wins , everybody is cause shit gone get crazy out here PERIOD niggas gone get wild !

I find it hard to believe that anyone could vote Romney

Video: lipsyncforyourlife: Yara Sofia wants you to VOTE OBAMA!

yes me too!haha It's a shame people like that know absolutely nothing about Obama or Romney, yet they continue to talk about it

If you vote for Romney you probably wear crocs and use internet explorer

Obama has surely got to win the election.

people should be allowed to vote through twitter or something then obama would win

Go on America go and vote for Obama cuz he's cool and stuff

IM LIKE TRYING TO SPAM YA BUT YA TALKING OUT  OBAMA actually he is pretty awesome .dam i wish he was australian

How can you say you have got Obama's back? You ain't even in America, you can't even vote for him. Shut up  Hahahahaha

Who is the lesser evil, Obama or Romney??

I told myself I wouldn't brag if Romney won. I'm just going to say a prayer, a long one, of gratitude! #RomneyRyan2012

TkU4rt-Mitt Romney's son Tagg Romney would benifit greatly from Romney'spolicies, if elected.A conflict of interest.

Going to sleep. Hopefully I wake up in Obama America and not Romenys China part 2.

he is not even ur president, why not talk about ZUMA? heh?R Obama is a f**ken sell out #realtalk

Support Obama #Forward if should I be a citizen one day, blue is gonna have one more vote wherever I stay

Guys, stop calling Romney a Nazi. A) Nazi's killed a few million jews. B) Romney has killed far, far less jews. C)

Really hope Obama wins this election I don't even live in America, so dearest Americans, its up to you.

Can't wait to place my #vote tomorrow. It's going to be a long night. #2012 #Obama

Pres. Obama, is a beautiful, caring man!

I'm taking it down #Obama #Obama #Obama #Obama #Obama #Obama  Please #Allah let em win.. On that note.. I holla

Aaron. Thats the problem with them It would be wrong for them to vote Romney due to fustration.

Obama that I used to know..lol #parody

U.S Election Poll: D-Day For Obama, Romney: Voters in the United States will on Tuesday (today) decide who would

if you vote for mitt romney then I will kick you off my christmas card list MHM I WENT THERE

I know Obama got some Blue magic hair grease under his bathroom sink.

will the trap prices go up if romney wins?

from antiobama CNN Celebrates Obama/Springsteen Rally, Ignores Larger Romney Event: CNN's 1600 Report blog is cu

I'm yet to see a single person support Romney on Twitter, so how is it so close?

It CAN'T be that close with Indies breaking for Romney like they say they are unless people are lying to pollsters.

If Romney wins we may have to annexe America to make sure they don't start a war with anyone. America, don't screw this one up.

Of the twoi can see how Obama is the better choice. But Obama is no angel. I like the dude but he is still a puppet.

No pressure America, but now is the time to show you have some common sense. Romney is no good for you, or the world. #Obama2012

i can't even begin to think about maths today when at the end of the day romney could be the US president

We all can't afford to have Fake Tan Romney to be in charge. At least with Obama, our future is more secure (:

If Romney wins you may fuck me sideways and call me Garry

Lol what if even Romney votes for Obama

Romney down to his last billion? I think these guys might build a stage for his concession speech

New post: Obama's 2008 win captured on silk in exhibition

hope that obama wins. Sending you guys support from the netherlands!

The character Mitt Romney is based on Family Guy's Mayor Adam West

The World needs Americans to keep #Obama for another 4yrs. If Mitt Rommney is elected into office , Americans  the world wud suffer

Jay Z singing 'I got 99 problems but Mitt ain't one!' at Obamas election campaign #hero

Mitt Romney talks sense but he's a crazy mofo. Come on Obama #blackpower

America. Vote #Obama2012. Save us from that idiot #Romney

If you post an article about how Romney is a liar, but use Huffington Post, Rolling Stone, or any other mega liberal source, die

Profile Defenders Obama: Several weeks ago, CNN invited the Obama and Romney campaigns to submit images from the   Best Reputation Co.

well imma have to hollar at Obama about this ObamaCare because I was pricing insurance and its outta a brothas price range.

Obama no doubt!!!! I don't know,I jst like the guy,he moves me wen he speaks,that's enough for me.

Romney: 'It's Possible' Obama Could Win - Yahoo! News  via that what i call a leader!!!

US Presidential Election Odds and Betting Preview - Live Odds and Scores  via #obama #romney #election

Ima go around school and yell obama all day

#Obama2012 It's a shame I would not be able to vote until the next four years. Would totally vote for Obama this year if I was a citizen.

so I want to remain president Barack Obama ! Although I am not from the U.S., but I'd like to support it! He loves

If Romney wins America can prepare to take a step back in time he's so backward!

People if you are able to vote don't waste that chance please!!! Just vote, vote, vote #vote # Obama

I really wish there was one more person running for president. Cause let's be honest, both Romney and Obama suck.

Yeaa so Shantahl??? What you finna do? Jesus is taken, Obama is taken; Michelle don't play that LMAO!

that 1.5 billion was already set aside before Romney took position. Bush and Clinton both were supporters in that.

thx for sharing your experience with the video blog. #uselection btw #Obama all eyez on us

Vote for Character, Not Color: I am white. I voted for Mr. Obama in 2007, but not because he is black. A black man htt

I'm not gonna claim victory until I know for sure President Obama has won

Obama has to win the election because Doctor Who said so.

4 more years of Obama's picture hanging in every single deep south redneck courthouse and police station. Yes please. #obama

It's not that I'm anti Romney I'm just pro the human race. #obama

Been trying to appear with my Obama book on his show for just one second. No luck yet

I only hope that Obama wins the elections today, else I'm going to start worrying about the future of my goddaughter.

Romney will make the Rocky Horror Picture Show look like the coronation of the pope

Republicans have to do a deep thinking if Romney loses. Will Jeb Bush come into the picture? One day to go

if ROMNEY win honestly what y'all gone do?

#whitehouse Watch for smashmouth politics, GOTV, absentee ballots, advance voter turnout moving needle for Obama today

Photo: Katy Grandma  Obama! How cute! || #katyperry #katherynelizabethudson #proudkatycat #proud #grandma

that's unfortunately exactly it! Such a shame that Obama failed to deliver his promises, but I'd stick with him over Romney!

Me? I voted Labour. I don't know your political system but I do know that Romney has Mormon views which are frankly laughable

Even though I'm not American #obama for the win  He's more down to earth, not racist and well. Just plain cooler

So I'll take Obama over Romney because Obama at least will spend more money on foreign aid.

So basically if #obama wins were not fucked but if #romney wins i get some laughs. Win win?

It's irrelevant whether Obama is a Christian or a Muslim, as long as he governs like he's neither.

How Soon Will Someone in the Press Project Obama the Winner Based on 31-State, Early Voting-Influenced E  #ohtcot

ok- either way obama or romney, we both want a better future for the country,only GOD knows what's best-

Hope Barack Obama gets a second term #teambarack

Don't know which I'm more excited for; opening night or possibility of Romney being president. Oh wait, yes I do.

I don't know a thing about Romney or Obama to be honest, don't know what either aim to do, but I still want Obama to win because it's Obama.

I'm sorry but i'm terrified mitt romney might get elected. I mean, its possible. Omg. Fml.

funny to see no lie and romney in the same sentence must be a first

I don't wish to try and influence any of my friends across the pond but VOTE OBAMA #USElections #Obama

im pretty sure my Yiayia will vote for Obama. she's a bit demented but can still tell right from wrong

I hope that America re-elect Obama, the other bloke looks dodgy. Enjoy your voting America.

Dear America, Most of Europe would sell a kidney to have Obama as leader. And we would all definitely sell our grandmot

if Romney becomes president shit would just go all left

okay, imma go to sleep, i really got to wake up early to go vote. goodnight :-* #Obama

We live in a world where sick people rules, just take a look at obama and his policies.

i'm gay enough to rescue the president, unless it becomes mitt romney

oh my god I've just figured out how romney is going to win!!!!!!

Obama showed up for a media moment, and flew off.  Mitt gave a bunch of goods to people soon after the storm hit.

Romney is a bully. He can't take no for an answer and he never fails according to Ann. Iran. B 4 warned. Ramping defense 2 come get u!

Obama better win or I might just cry

I live in the UK but Obama all the way!

worried that your RT edit looks like I'm aiming that at Obama ;) For clarity to all, I'm not. Reject Romney and fear politics

Today is the day #vote four more years to the man Thats ending war fighting terrorism fight for the poor and middle class.:-)#obama

I'm keeping my fingers crossed for you good luck OBAMA!

Finn:'So who are you gonna vote for babe' Rachel:'Obama, I'm not letting that Romney control my body by banning tampons!' Finn: 'I love you'

Couldn't vote so I'm just crossing my fingers instead! #Obama #election2012

If my Twitter feed is any guide, Obama will win easy. Then again, by my feed during the last UK election, we should have a Lab/Lib coalition

DEAR VOTERS, VOTE TOMORROW. AND IF YOU VOTE FOR ROMNEY, WELL GOD HELP US.

Im supporting #Obama.Mainly because we (the human race) cant have in a position of power, partly because follows me

reading Liberal's tweets about how they want to kill Romney makes me more proud to be #Romney2012 #Class #Winners

I hope obama wins the election, cause romney is such an idiot

Don't forget to fire Obama tomorrow. Four more years and he'll take our guns! #preppers

my view this is to important for a side issue, Obama the lesser of two evils,Romney? warmonger

Dear America, please vote for Obama! Sincerely, the World.

This is all I'm going to say on the matter - it's not an invitation for a political debate: vote for Obama. Thank you.

Today is Obama Day come on! Spread you Love.

Mitt Romney it all stinks of  hand in glove to me !!.

Voting for Obama tomorrow. Then back to studying for my accounting tests that I have every class. #asianproblems

Betfair has Obama 1/5. Is there any point watching?

Want Obama to win this election. Once you go Barack you never go back!

The choice is clear: If you want a job, vote Romney. If you want a food stamp, you vote Obama. If you want a safe,

ATTENTION AMERICANS, VOTE OBAMA OR ELSE

In the interests of democracy, anyone who votes Romney should have their right to vote revoked.

Reasons to vote for Barack Obama. Mitt Romney is a Mormon but he ain't got no hoes. #snoopdogg

today is the day that the world can change for the better or for worse ! first time voter :D #obama

You forgot the tag line VOTE  #Romney/Ryan2012

Mmm Barack Room or Romney Marsh ?

We cannot afford 4 more years like the last 4  bumper sticker Romney Ryan 2012 #ObamaIsntWorking #AreYouBetterOff

Why the fuck are people from England licking Obama's arse? Stop it lid

All my family want to vote for Obama!!!! But we can't cos we are English so you Americans can do it for us instead!!!!!! #Vote4Obama

Dear American people, please go vote and even better, vote for OBAMA!

Two trailer park girls go Romney outside!

Vote for Obama ! The first election was our baptism, the second would be our confirmation. #Obama2012

Please vote for Obama Americans!! Make the right choice! #GoObama

I'm wishing Mr Obama some joyous good luck today. Hopefully America will do the right thing. #hopefully

If Romney wins, my faith in mankind will be forever lost. I swear.

thanks for the obama support even if you're not from here! the good vibes are always welcomed

Will BO have a stinker? Will presidency fit Romney like a Mitt? One things for sure, it's going to be interesting! #election2012 #Obama

i give obama the benefit of the doubt that much of his first four years went toward correcting mistakes of previous 8 years

always fuck pakistan, Romney doesn't care about the States. He's a power hungry man and only wants what he wants.

I was told that when you go to vote. Start from the top down thats obama first or else he wont get the vote ok

Let it be Obama! Not only does America need him but so does the rest of the world. He stands for so much. #obamaforth

Nigerians in America should vote for Obama as President. Yes he can alwaz do it again n again!!!!!

The media is seriously so biased towards Obama #howdoyallnotgetit

Im with Romney for this election. All though it will probably just be another rich man breaking promises.

My job is not to represent Washington to you, but to represent you to Washington.  Barack Obama

US Election day live: Polls set to open on D-Day for Barack Obama and Mitt  -  Telegraph.co.ukUS Election day

today usa vote 4 their presidents as a indian i like to give a one chance 4 obama

If time for the awesome Obama ground game to go into effect.

Can Obama do it. Yes he can. #obama2012

Dear Americans, please go vote and it would be great if you don't elect Romney. Cheers.

Vote OBAMA!!!! He does what he says and doesn't make excuses for it. #Progress

The irony is dt folks dwn here rantin 4 obama arent doin it cz he's d beta man dy r doin it jst cz he's blackdats r

oh lol Romney of course lol (:

Make Obama win as my Bday present !

yu said MIT Romney better then Obama #LikeReallyForReal he taking away PBS kids come on now !

Are you willing to make an election prediction?  Obama to win popular vote marginally, but EC relatively comfortably (maybe w/300)

Obama HAS to win this election right? Don't see how he can't to be honest.

Good luck America - Vote Obama! You know it makes sense!

Yes! Obama lets us know that he bailed them out but if it was the Republican party, theyd bail them without telling the public.

Have to say I hope he does win. This is not an expert opinion. I just think Romney looks shady.

Omg! I didn't know Obama had really good aim at hitting flies.

This US election as always is a case of the lesser of two evils. For me Obama is the lesser of those evils.

24 It's been wonderful to have President Obama as a champion for access to health care for all women  Cecile Richards NY

if romney wins the election in america it'd be like rylan winning the xfactor over here, they're both terrible #VoteObama

Elections is tonight ima buy 2 bottles nd sum loud so as soon as Obama win again it's a party wherever I'm at

Obama's Anger Translator =))  Comedy Central ruleaza! Enjoy ;)

To my American Friends: Rome wasn't built in a day. Obama's change will really come to fruition in the next 4 years. Romney will ruin Ame

I can't sleep and it's past 3:00 am! Excited and anxious and ready to re-elect President Obama!

I think I will genuinely be sick if Mitt Romney becomes president! #HorribleMan #USElection

Its worrying that mitt romney sounds very much like dubya!!!!

If Romney wins the whole worlds in trouble! #obama

U do not like Obama,so what?Just mind ur own biz  leave Americans 2 decide,after all there r decisions 2 b made in ur country~#Zaraspeaks

I have a horrible feeling that obama will lose

American friends of mine, if you truly love your country, people and our world, Vote #Obama today. The alternative doesn't bear thought.

Obama calling for change is weird. He is on the seat. What the frog is he changing? Himself?

You're a dumbass.  Do you see anything that indicates that I am voting for Obama? Get out of my mentions.  Dick.

well you'd marry Obama shag Jay Z  could you just give Bruce a parachute and sell it as an extreme sport experience for charity?

#ElectionDay I'm from Spain and I would vote for Obama #VoteObama

if Romney win watch how many houses get robbed

#VoteObama only idiots world make the mittstake of voting Romney.

If Romney wins this election, you can pretty much say well done to the Mayans and goodbye to existence.

#VoteObama #Vote2012 I do believe Obama will be in the 80% region or Higher. So far everyone I know supports him (Only 2

From Italy I hope you're right on #Romney!

I might PRAY, that the peeps, who were MISGUIDED enough to have VOTED for Obama in 08, have the sense NOW to vote for Romney.

#Obama #News Madonna   Latest news, pictures and video: Madonna: Latest news, pictures and video of the pop star

Today's the Big Day! US election don't worry Obama has it in the bag #relax

I think it's tomorrow morning our time, I want Obama to win!

Haha, people on my college campus were telling people about how horrible Romney is and why college students should vote for Obama :)

IF YOU VOTE FOR OBAMA UR TOO MAINSTREAM

90% of britian and 80% of the world want obama to win #voteobama the voice of many is the voice of God

Some voters in NH headed to polls at 12a. In Dixville Notch, it was 5-5. In Hart's Location, Obama 23, Romney 9.

Nah, I still think Obama wins OH, just not by the 3.8% margin model projects

Interesting how last night I was watching V for Vendetta with a few friends and then I come home to find out that Obama won?! #freaky

New blog posting, Romney or Obama? Voters to render verdict -

Tillegg til dagens kommentar. Obama, the unhappy warrior:

4 Years Ago I Watched Obama Win The Election  Today I Will Do The Same #TeamObama

Yeah, I'll never understand that. Did you see the video of a woman calling Obama a communist? Then she couldn't say what it meant.

Makes you wonder which Romney the Americans are voting for.. Interesting

Obama needs another 4 years Please, not Romney, people And for CA residents, vote to end the death penalty

someone made a post about how Obama rhymes with Ohana and that means family and family means no one should get left behind I cry

I don't really give a fuck who the president is. But I like Obama's face a lot more than that other ugly guy

first time voting  I made sure study all the props.  I've been observing Mr. Obama since 4 years ago , no doubt he's the one! #2terms

In fact, I think I need to stop reading Obama vs Romney key issues because I feel a bit sick.

Let us Pray together for our Country. This could be the end as we know it. Get out and vote Romney!!!! #tcot #gop

Def one of your best shows though! Congrats and hopefully tomorrow we will have another four years with President Obama! #Forward

i can't see a question. I just can see that you'll be Obama for a long time. :-P

I sincerely hope that the US citizens do the right thing today and vote for a Romney/Ryan government. For everybody's sake.

VOTE FOR OBAMA AND ALL THE OTHER DEMOCRATS on your ballot today!  We have to send a message that sanctioned inequality is not ok!

Romney camp projects confidence despite polls: COLUMBUS (Ohio): Either he is wearing the best poker face i  #GE13

If Romney wins, I will attempt to ignite one of my farts.

yeah you're right. But it wouldn't be too thumping a Romney majority. He's big among American-Israelis  Right, but not rest

bakuraryou: fuck obama and romney just step aside like come on you know who the best president would be

Remember with Obama never before has one person promised so much and delivered so little #Romney2012

Obama will reign again (I hope)

Is there anyone outside the USA that thinks Mitt Romney is a credible president?

#SKYNEWS Romney gave some v. aggressive speeches warning the Middle East he would fight..  #romney  #obama

Mitt Romney be looking suspect., like he about to cry n shit,

This is why Obama should be voted for.  get these crack fiends off the streets!

Stuff that, why should they get their own non-screwed planet. I say if Romney wins, we leave and they can keep the earth

Kind of a no-brainer MT How an Obama ( or Romney win (

Ethiopia: Voting for Obama, Opinions  via  #obama #obama2012 #Ethiopia

Ok Americans today is the day! Don't fuck yourselves over and vote for a backwards idiot. Come on Obama all the way xxx

President Obama is a LEO.  and Leo's are WINNERS!

Did Wall street just give up on M.Romney #CNBCAfrica

'The Party of Romney is the Party of George W. Bush':    h

I hope the Americans vote for Obama, so much love for him

Election day is finally here. Polls even but Intrade and Betfair markets indicate 70.0% and 80.6% chance respectively of Obama re-election.

Its good to have a president with experience in hard times, but Obama need to be harder cuz he is too kindvote for Obama!:DDD

Just read a post by maplestory(global): 82% of maplers supported obama.

Romney seems like a nutter too right wing for me

I just had an epiphany that Obama will win this election and of he doesn't its because of something foogazy.

ur voting4 #Obama on #Gaymarriage ?U know best 0 close relationship w/MBHSharia hw long b4 he evolves back?

remember all you americans if you dont vote and obama gets back in dont moan when your country changes forever like engl

So, looking like a photo finish across the pond. Distinctive Drinks' endorsement for #Obama should be enough to push him over the line ;)

Voted O in 2008 bc he's 1/2 white. If I vote Romney now, am I a traitor to my race? - Pigment-Challenged Pete

RT Do you think Mitt Romney and Barack Obama get any sleep the night before the election?

I love the way pretty much the whole world except for 50% of the US prefers Obama to Mitt.

Praying for Obama to win today! Don't forget who Mitt Romney is and what he's saying about gay rights and female rights!

The World needs Americans to keep #Obama for another 4yrs. If Mitt Rommney is elected (cont)

I will be pissed if Romney wins because somebody actually believed what he was saying

deal and if obama wins what will u do?

Dear USA. If you really want a millionaire dilettante who fronts a party of swivel-eyed loons, we've got one of those. Swap you for Obama?

Come on mo-fos, lets get Obama a new lease on the White house today so we can get back to focussing on perfecting our union!

Hopefully this is the last time I go to bed with the threat of Mitt Romney hanging over me. Please make this true America

Obama or A Mormon!!!!!!Evangelicals will struggle!!!!!Billy Graham has made his mind up it seems!!!

Hope Obama wins today man, Romney will take America into further trouble. #OBAMA

yes! train just crossed the channel! 4 years ago went to #Obama street part election night in Paris

Give me 3 reasons to vote for Obama

With Mitt Romney in power I can assure you RTs will be hard to come by.

Voting for #Obama from East London, innit.

Obama: 'fired up, ready to go' one more time: President Barack Obama delivered his final campaign speech in a

Even Cristiano Ronald and God wants Obama To be re-elected!!

shut up with your Logic. Obama will save us.

damnit people wake up this aint no time to sleep we've been sleeping for the last 4 years now you can get some rest after Romney wins

Yeah he should win though #OBAMA

Last-minute stops as Romney ends White House quest: Republican presidential candidate Mitt Romney's yearslong quest

I was thinking the same thing, I just want Obama to win because he's a top bloke who sings and tells jokes haha

people choose what facts they want to look at. He's awful. So is Romney. I'm learning Chinese.

Obama want to win. So those of myneighborhood will become more racistthan they are xD

It's okay, if Romney wins I've got people in Australia with rooms open ready for me to flee there. #backupplans have em ready!

I am scared for America and the world if Mitt Romney wins the election. #Obamatowin

Obama by a whisker, no real change, Romney would take US foreign relations back to Bush era so war with Iran

Did not vote for Obama. Wretched civil liberties record. Caved to banks. Don't worry: I live in Oregon so it's inconseque

Did someone on my TL actually write ''VOTE ROMNEY''

MORE LIES - VIDEO FLASHBACK: Obama Explains His Secret Plans to Sell Out America That Were Caught on Open Mic

I want romney to win, because fuck the world! Pls I hope you people get sarcasm

Gotcha. I think it will be a short night.  I think Obama will have over 300 electoral votes

*smh* Dey der dey fight for Obama oo, will he give you a visa to America  a job :s

Doesn't what stream you follow they'll all led to OBAMA !!!!

Romney knows that the 18-24 age group is more likely to vote Obama. He's been bribing  game companies into releasing games before elections.

Taking video of your vote great idea - if machine changes Romney vote to Obama vote  smoking gun evi

make sure you guys rock the voteteam bluebarrack obama

this is 7hrs late BUT she endorsed Romney.

Up early ready to embrace cold weather. Only for President Obama

US election: Romney supporters 'hopeful' of victory

dont know everything about the US election but i know well enough that if Romney gets elected, the US/world will be in trouble

#ElectionDay I won't be surprise if Romney win, America elected G.Bush twice.

no Obama done started WW3. Romney will mind his business and get money.

Hey America, like the Beatles? How about X Factor? Shakespeare? Hugh Grant? Well if Romney gets in WE'RE TAKING THEM BAC

Hate him or love him, and despite losing some of his shine, Barack Hussein Obama is still a great orator. Fingers crossed for tomorrow.

on October 18 I wrote OBAMA WILL WIN

I personally feel romney's moral values are sounder than obamas. Whatever be, may the best man win.

Don't understand how anyone in this day and age can vote for Romney. Mental.

In contrast, #Obama responds to letter from a 10 year old girl with two dads  (via

hey louis are you supporting obama or rominey? :p

important question: will an an Obama win FINALLY shut her up? I know the answer, but I had to ask, to preserve my sanity!

If you vote for romney the only thing your doing is making the white people wealthier ! They even admitted i

I'm so excited to reelect Pres. Obama that I cannot sleep!

Rob I didnt know you were a poet can you do something with Nantucket and Romney

After tomorrow Barack Obama will either be the President of the United States or the highest paid public speaker in the world.

Mitt Romney in town today, and President Obama could be as well! Ohio is where it's at! I'm live all AM with the details.

I heard Romney is very anti-muslim

If everyone in the world had a vote, Obama would win by a landslide - there would be no contest at all. We can't all be wrong! #voteObama

I hate waking up from my sleep  can't go back to sleep ugh I guess i'll watch t.v. #remembertovotetoday =)#Obama

OBAMA A FAIT QUOI POUR L'AFRIQUE ?

Plz flw Chuck Berry Praises Obama, Laments Fading Voice -  lt;!-- --gt;  #newtag #RollingStone

obama can be president in nz if america dont vote for him bc hes fab

To be honest i dnt evn like obama from times his friend with jay-z his a wasteman

Good morning, We who love Barack Obama!

If Obama loses can we invite him over here to be prime minister? #fb

It makes me sad that some people are actually going to vote for Mitt Romney.

You also said that Obama is a muslim;common! Obama attended a Christian Gospel Church in Chicago b4 he became a Senator

There is no one outside the USA who actually wants Romney to win

MOVE FORWARD not back to #GOP #AUSTERITY VOTE TODAY #DEM CONGRESS #OBAMA

sad man, real sad. Obama bad for country

Who would make a better leader of your group during a #zombieapocalypse, Pres. Obama or Mitt Romney?

US election 2012: the world's wishlist: Whoever wins Tuesday's presidential election, be it Barack Obama or Mitt Romney, their allies

it's scary how large part of the American population can't see through the Romney image

probably but you never know..romney is good for US business so there's a chance!

I wanna know what y'all would be saying if it was Cain on the ballots today not Romney!

ON MY WAY TO #VOTE.#BRRRRR IT'S #COLD OUT HERE IT MOST BE SUM PPL #VOTING FOR #BARACK #OBAMA BRRRR :)

So proud my daughter turned 18 and she can't wait to vote today..#TEAM OBAMA!!!!

tuned in to the chat about Obama on Tubridy and then he puts on TLC Waterfallsrandom, but i'll take it #2fm

Mitt Romney called ending the war in Iraq 'A tragedy'.

Nigerianz wntin Obama 2 5president!!u nt dne wif ur country u poknozin into anothers*whew*

Nine Cleveland-area voting locations without power after Sandy  President Obama Send out National Guard Protect Voters!

Youngest's Update::: Romney in last-minute campaigning: Mitt Romney will not spend the final hours of the presid

Before you say Mitt Romney is your man check out this short videoMitt Romney: A Mass. Failure

If U Ain't Voting Fa #OBAMA .. #UnFollow Me Asap U A Emo  Fxxking Widd The Oops! #Night Farreal

Please America, I beg you to vote Obama and not a 1929 spokesman

IF romney WINS  My whole neighborhood gon' be looking like this--------- -_______________-

VOTE OBAMA BECAUSE HE IS COOL AND HE FUCKING KILLED BIN LADEN

Who is going to the next president in USA? Obama or Mitt?

Suspense to the end, Obama, Romney yield to voters: After a grinding presidential campaign that packed s  #travel

obama is forcing the catholic church to cover their employees contraception expense,like forcing hindus to eat beef

My mute button is worn out! I'll be so glad when I don't have to see/Hear obama yelling,pointing,teleprompting everyday on tv-makes me sick!

#foxsports LeBron picks supporting Obama over selling shoes: LeBron picks supporting Obama o  #sports #sportsnews

America, you only have to get one thing right every 4 years. Don't blow it today. #Obama #fb

My polls open at 7.  I am up early like a kid on Christmas morning waiting to go and vote for Romney/Ryan.

Good morning!!!! On my way to vote for  #OBAMA !!!!!

woman voting for romney are even more confusing, lol yeah I'll just vote for someone wanting to take away all my rights

If your of age you better be voting for Obama and Elizabeth warren

I can imagine him not being opulent like Romney and instead cooking with bad wine!

Ivan Glazidis and Mitt Romney both certainly have no clue about winning #IvanTheTerrible

My vote is for hard working. Go Obama! Hehhe. Wheeenn la i can vote for my country ni?

Obama only a glib and smooth talker !

Ok so Rich has come in full of it. Reckons it is nailed on for Obama, no way he can lose. So I took his five quid bet  went for Romney.

A tie for Obama and Romney in first results  via

if these elections were held in Nigeria given the circumstances, Obama would win by landslide votes

Any female vote for Romney I assume is an uneducated vote because, damnit, that man hates vaginas.

let me sum it up for you  NO JOBS NO PLAN JUST WORDS NO KEPT PROMISES USE FOOD STAMPS EQUALS POVERTY EQUALS OBAMA

- I am hoping the republicans dont have any more lies and tricks to deceive the election results. I AM 4 OBAMA as is Jesus!

Tell them ROMNEY supporters 2 #GetSomeREST when U See Em Today at The Polls. #tfb

a tipp Obama, who else? Surely not this other idiot he has no idea of geographic or foreign politics desaster programmed

So who's your man? OBAMA or ROMNEY?. #Forward2012

I bet the 80 years olds are voting for Obama because they aren't completely retarded

VA Attorney General:  'Early Voting Favors #Romney'.    YES!!!

Getting my information clerk on working for the board of elections! #iwillbehereallday #vote #Obama #electio

If Romney wins. We should nuke America, start again. Make the Faroe Islands a superpower, see how they fair.

About to get dressed and rock my vote! #Obama

Twitter launches 'Twitter Political Index' 2012 US Election page as Obama and Romney go to the polls  #US #Elections

Yes they do! Election Day baby! #2012 #obama

#OccupySesameStreet! Save Big Bird and protect good public media:  #Romney

Is there anything to this story that Romney may have perjured himself about his investments?

5:42 am, In line to vote for B. Obama

#Faith is the substance of things hoped for I have faith our cntry will vote 4 the man that will do more good than harm. #obama #forward

I don't Romney in my tl yu will get unfollowed

Vote Obama; else I'll eat all the cookies!

Global Markets Romney win may offer solution to US fiscal cliff: StanChart

Interesting Twitter observation, generally speaking, avg Obama supporter seems better educated  more intelligen

TODAY IS UR LAST DAY TO POLITICALLY TAKE CONTROL OF EVERY SECTOR OF UR LIFE SPAN. GO VOTE AND VOTE RIGHT! VOTE OBAMA! GOD BLESS AMERICA!

Boston (MA) Globe:  10 random facts about Obama . More #Obama #news -

Politic tweet regarding election day in the state: I think Pres.Obama has shown some great (cont)

They keep on talking about the #USelections e.g. #Obama hates #Iran, ah #Romney doesn't?By the end of the day, they

You would have to be a complete retard to vote for Romney, and be a woman. #voteobama

Welp , today is the day Obama sticks his dick in Romney's mouth at the poles .

America vote for Obama he is the right man for the presence///// good luck////

the difference between Haji Ali and mitt romney is mitt will let women worship and be home in time to cook dinner!

Obama has no balls  Benghazi proved that without a doubt !!!

Voting for Obama is like voting for the class clown; always has a smart remark yet can never pass the t

On my way to make history Team Romney bitch, hahahaha  Middle School)

LATEST BANKING NEWS Twitter votes for Obama (Market Watch)  follow warren today

Obama is winning in social media. That's like claiming to have won a marathon because you remembered to wear trainers:

obama will never get left behind. not ever. not even if there's a fire.

I added a video to a playlist  Pres Obama's Full Speech from His Final Rally - Des Moines, Iowa

We recommend Mitt Romney for president  via

It's simple people. #OBAMA Just look at his wife and daughters

Been using #RomneyLIES hashtag often for a reason. This explains it. Time to go vote for the only real choice. #Obama

I think Obama couldn't say it better then this. Dnt drop that thun thun

Obama leading #yawn On to other important stuff, bbal

After i heard their campaign speech,2 me Barack Obama's story is only possible in America.Mitt Romney's story is possible in Game of Thrones

Hope you have all day .  Lines gonna be looooong. Obama's gotta win or we are I TROUBLE

CNN: President emotional in final rally: In his last speech of the 2012 campaign, President Barack Obama g  #news

If I could vote, my vote would definitely be for Obama.

Just when I focus my campaign on claiming President Obama is weak and incompetent, Big #Sandy cancels me. #someoneUpThereHatesMe

Lol to my aunties sending uk texts to vote obama just lol

I never knew the twins met barrack Obama #sarcasm

Come on people of USA,Vote Obama!

Just the thought that Romney could be the next president of the united state makes me physically ill!

VOTE ROMNEY!! Many Americans are waking up to the reality of Obama.  And it isn't any prettier than Read more:

Polls have opened on the East Coast of US with President Barack Obama and his Republican challenger, Mitt Romney, neck and neck.

I am voting for Obama - my first dem ever. I'm a teacher and am SCARED of what Repubs plan to do to education!

Dumb hoes you a stripper voting for Romney tf really going on!!

- All #Obama Did For This Economy In The Past Four Years  How Dare You Not Vote For Him  !

I'm in Ohio,  I'm headed to he polls in just about a half hour when the polls open to vote for #BarackObama!  #Obama #Forward

VOTE!!! And make sure you vote for Obama. Every time Romney gets a vote, a kitten dies!

To #NY #NJ #PA voters: Obama and FEMA deserted you in the greatest time of need. Show Obama what its likeleave him behind at the polls

You know those Taliban folks in the Middle East? Well the American version of that is hoping Romney wins big. You getting it yet? #VoteObama

Good luck to America if Romney wins this election.

Da Bears Chicago Bears QB backs Romney: Jay Cutler plays for President Obama's hometown team, but he's voting fo

When Jim Carey gets old, he'll look like mitt Romney.

OBAMA is the Pied Piper who deluded many Minority Voters~Now many are waking up  VOTING ROMNEY

I'm Here Good Morning, Today Is The Day Election Day Poles Open At 6:30 People Vote Vote For President Obama Thanks In Advance

From New Learning Times - Obama and Romney miss the mark on education:  #electionday

Obama doing satellite TV radio today - wonder if ANYONE will ask him about Bengazi? Fast  Furious? Liar n Chief!

To all east coast peeps get up go to the polls and vote make it count and say yes to Obama

Barack Obama: The only thing better than one Jersey guy is two Jersey guys  #Elections2012 #Sandy

#VoteObama Obama needs to win, because if he doesn't, I may as well pack my bags and leave for Canada.

Hitler Salute Given 2 Obama By Democrat Ohio Senator Sherrod Brown

Right now in Ohio: Obama 50%  Romney 47% #ohioswingstate

Change is inevitable make a change to Romney

My first  ONLY 2012 pre election post: I am not as concerned with Obama's or Romney's laws as I am with GOD'S! Next#primadonna

Hope #Obama wins the election! Great man. #gotmyvote

#vote or kill yaself .. Because #Romney wants to kill us off slow with four years.. #teamobama

Everybody wake tf up. Its Obama day NIGGASSSS!!!

US polls 2012: Non-Americans across globe want Obama to win, says survey  In India 64 per cent were in favour of Obama

so if obama doesn't win can he please replace julia gillard as the australian prime minister. like please. consi

Wikipedia is trying to tell me that Mitt Romney was born in Detroit. Am fairly sure that he was actually born in the Uncanny Valley

Election Day! Lets pray that God puts the right man in office! I think Mitt Romney is the best for the Job! #Nobama

Don't forget everyone: whether you vote for Obama or Romney today you've been bought

Brother told me he voting Obama this election

I would vote Obama. I'm so left-leaning I'm just about turned back on myself, I could never vote conservative.

#Obama and #Romney condoms on sale in Chicago: 'Either way, you're screwed' - via

i've watched both obama and romney in ohio and theres something seriously wrong with the world if obama doesnt make pr

Ohioians are smarter than Mitt Romney thought. The victory will go to the President. The proven leader

Im excited to go vote today #Obama

I'm actually scared for myself and more importantly my grand mother if Romney wins. I use vouchers at Wendy's for frostys. Not medicine

am not any how related to USA elections bt bt i just want OBAMA to win! been watching the predictions the % r too close!

If the voting machines aren't rigged and the republicans that run some voting areas don't throw away Dem ballots Obama wins by 7%

Go vote now f! Uck romney

Could've waited until lunch but thought I would get up take a run n get in line to vote #question6 #OBAMA #MARRIAGEEQUALUTY

Listen to campaign Obama in this piece. He's a fucking Tool. This is what gets him elected, then he plays victim.

omg that post on tumblr about a girl who wrote a letter to Obama and got a response. 3

Obama. You seen much of the new episodes? Election one on tonight.

reading the story, it is a latest polling publish, shows Obama has 96% chance to win the election today

REMEMBER U HAVE TO SHADE IN #OBAMA TO HAVE YOUR VOTE COUNT FOR OUR PRESIDENT!!!

I want Obama to win tbh..

Watch And Compare Mitt Romney's Record As Governor: to President Barack Obama's 1stTerm  #Forward

President Obama: 'We've come too far to let our hearts grow faint'

#VoteObama #VoteObama #VoteObama idc I'm not American I'm Scottish but still want Obama to win!

The Joke's On Us: Watch Obama And Romney Poke Fun At Themselves And Each Other

Maybe, but he's the best of a bad lot. Obama will make us all equal but less free.

everyone in the whole wide world wants obama to win!

#twitter Twitter votes for Obama (//t.co/7fJWta3c

I'm down with Occupy but I'm voting Obama. At this point voting third party is throwing it to Romney. SCOTUS noms main reason

President Barack Obama, Mitt Romney Speak Before The Presidential Election: Loading Alert icon. Sign in or si

Wow, a tie in Dixville and Obama lead in Hart's? These are usually Republican locations. A shorter night than pundits predict?

Its obv obama is going to win, but not got the balls to bet enough to win enough #4/1isredic

I know some other politicians but if I wouldn't endorse them I wouldn't ask y'all to support them *shrugs* Ford, Dunn, Logan  Obama tho

Happy Election Day Swing State Newspapers Back Romney, Leave Obama Behind  via

Today, we RE-ELECT President Barack Hussein Obama for a 2nd term #Obama2012 #4moreyears

Feeling so good out standing in the line to vote I'm so proud to see so many people out here to vote young  old #team Obama

Im not American, but I wnt Obama to win aha :D

Out Here!!! Utilizing my RIGHT to VOTE!!!! OBAMA#2012

Vote for mitt Romney! He's an inspiration to my kind

I take more interest in the US Presidential Elections than I do my own country's! Come on Obama! #LoveTheGuy #Obama2012

I'm guessing Obama will take an early lead in the polls this morning.until all the republicans get off work.

President Obama will be on the Steve Harvey morning show in about 5 min

Ryanitis: Dowd Loses Her Delicately Balanced Mind in Ryan Fearmongering  #American #anyone #calm #pop #Romney

Celllllliiiibrate good Obama come on.. It's Obam, Obama!!!! #RandyMarsh

Bitches better vote Obama today or shit will get real.

Our polls are open in Virginia - I voted for Barack Obama last week.

Vote Obama. He thinks fafsa is a good idea. Romney trying to take that away

If Romney gets elected he'll make same sex marriage illegal and abortion too

Do any boring people support Obama? Or does supporting Obama automatically make you cool?

Listen out for President Obama this morning on the Steve Harvey morning show am Eastern time!!!

I really pray Romney wins tonight Bc if not were screwed is going to have a panic attack on me and ill cry #RomneyRyan2012

President Obama on Steve Harvey morning show in about 5 minutes. Tune in.

Map of today's last-minute campaigning by Romney and Obama. Fascinating

But at the end of the day obama is the lesser of 2 evils.

Vote Romney, lets give him a chance to c what he can do

President Obama and Jay-Z in #Columbus, Ohio:  via

If Romney wins, I'll delete my Twitter and open a FB account. No, wait. That will be too painful. Instead I'll jump to an in-coming train.

fuck obama.. larry sinclair did

US ELECTION: The results so far? Hart's Location voted overwhelmingly for Obama - 23 votes to Romney's nine (with

I can't wait to graduate hahaha if Obama loses I'm moving to Australia with you hahaha

Wall Street shifts toward Romney: President Obama, a Wall Street darling in 2008, is losing support   .. from CNN

Election tonight .please go vote if u didn't, cuz shit gone get real if obama loose

Kids voting today!!! #Obama everyone please dont cheat at voting and may the best win

Now please go vote for OBAMA if you're 18  older.

I see Da SOUTHSIDE came out to Vote Its Thick at Drivin Park Its Truly Beautiful #OBAMA

I voted early  Up early going to vote before work. have you and the madhouse voted??? #Obama

#MUSTFOLLOW First Election Day votes cast as Romney takes campaign into Tuesday, Obama  - Fox  #TEAMFOLLOWBACK

Get Up,.Get out and Vote Our Lives Depend on it Team Obama

All u muthafucka tweeting and retweeting  #Romney Once I narrow you all down I will Unfollow and shot will be fired!!!!

I vote for obama. I would love him to win but it dnt realli matter kus only god can change the world. The government is killin d world

Romney Wins! Biden chooses to be Romney VP#electors#deadloc

Today's election day. Ugghh people at school are going to be so annoying. Especially those rich white ppl who are gonna be like VOTE ROMNEY

would u vote for riley or obama

635am.voting lines are already  pretty long. #Ohio #vote # OBAMA

If Romney winsNo.  I can't even finish that sentence.

THE WORLD VOTES FOR OBAMA: BBC POLL#Obama #BBC #world #tweet #follow

So Obama puts Springsteen on the phone w/Christie? If he'da just done this a year ago, Christie woulda been a Democrat by now #Trapped

if Mitt Romney gets elected I'm leaving earth

Scared For This Election ( Literally ) #Obama  #FuckMitt t(-__- t )

Arab Squalor - Romney Gets It Right  and Leftist Buffoon Geraldo get's it WRONG, as always.l

I don't support either candidate, but I can't believe my people actually prefer Romney as the next president of US. #Pakistan

Real Clear Politics average puts Obama at 48.9, *exactly* what Bush had in 2004:

Bronco Bama ain't got NOTHIN' On MITCH ROMNEY!!!

Seriously though, who wouldn't vote for Obama?

please vote for Mitt Romney so there will be more real jobs after you graduate My son been out of work 3 years!

WTM news: #Obama victory would boost US outbound #tourism

Entering a voting booth is closest I'll get to throwing the Ring into Mt. Doom. So long Romney. #VoteObama  261)

Retweet if you voting for Obama Ignore if you not #VoteObama

Ohio remember Obama gave you Cellphones!!!! Everyone else, remember he gave them cellphones which are better then the ones you bought

Obama or Romney? Who should Fil-Ams vote for this #ElectionDay in the US?

Gretchen: Your wearing my favorite color Purple! That's good luck, and Mitt Romney is going to Win!!! Have an awesome day

If the whole planet was to vote, Obama woud have 10x more votes than Romney. #fact #VoteObama

Obama going nowhere I reckon

if romney wins nothing that matters will change just the same as if obama wins

Dear God in heaven America vote Mitt Romney Paul Ryan Republican and save America

I seriously seriously hope that Obama wins, regardless of his policies, he won't be a big a fuck up as mitt Romney

Standing in line voting this morning for the first time #vote #obama #democrat #4more

Yea, let me get up and do my part to get President Obama reelected! My president is blackyours is too!

Big day! Everybody voting? .  . . Voting for something good? Bin Laden's dead and GM's alive. Go team Obama

if Obama wins, it's 1st time since 1820  only the 2nd time that 3 consecutive presidents elected to a 2nd term!

Snickering as pundits trying to say #Romney could have a Reagan-like wave. He's not Reagan, never was, never will be

Up Early To Help Obama Stay In Office

Lets all hope Romney disappears after tonight. #Obama2012

Save America? 4 save the World, vote in Obama!

If Obama losenevermind i dont need the FBI or SWAT team at my house

I hope  pray Obama wins. Our country will ruined under Mitt Romney. OBAMA!!!!!!!!

obama got to win go out and vote ppl for obama

If UR A DEMOCRAT DO NOT JUST CLICK DEMOCRAT because if u do Obama will not receive the vote. RETWEET

Going to be watching the elections tonight like a loser #obama

Don't forget to vote today. Respect your country and make the change that NEEDS to be made! Romney/Ryan2012 !!!!!

My Obama!! Aye I got that Obama Water, change the way you hydrate! RT yooooooo Hu

If I was American I'd be a bit wound up by the same people who resent American interventionism urging me to vote Obama.#voteforwhoyouwant

But still..haai anyway, as long as they all voted for Obama :)

I have just discovered that when I type 'Romney', SwiftKey suggests the next word should be 'Marsh'. Vote Syn in 2012!

; I am bringing two people with me who never voted before. We are in Virginia and all three are voting for Mitt Romney

Father god thank you for waking me up this morning, but I also need a favor. please let Barack Obama win president tonight. Thank you , Amen

If you go for Obama sit down cause its Romney all the way.

Chris Rocks last stab at helping Obama

Doesn't matter who your voting for,just vote. Nov.6 #Obama #Romney

Big day today. Election and the NHL and NHLPA are talking again. If Romney wins and the lockout ends today would go down as a great day

Obama. Green card no but good president

#RomneyRyan2012 No matter what you hear on the news keep voting! Those in the P.T. zone keep pulling those levers for #Romney #tcot

If you vote Romney, it's basically taking a step backwards and you should be ashamed.Damn Rednecks#NotAPartOfARedNeckAgenda#ElectionDay

Since I DO work I'm going to #Vote EARLY. #Forward with #Obama instead of #StartingOver with #Romney! #GoVot

What an awesome guy/Gov/Candidate/Leader/President! Mitt Romney On Monday Night Football Tonight, -

I really really really think Romney is the worst person to be president but don't be ignorant and talk about his religion. Leave that alone.

RT.  I am a Canadian but i follow American politics.. your politics affects us also.Vote for President Obama..!

hahaha.. Ten bucks says Obama doesn't draw the same young vote!

Obama better win after I done stood n the cold

when it comes to politics, I don't joke.Obama has been an abject failure

I'd say #VoteRomney but chances are Obama's gunna win anayway haha

dont care that I dnt choose the rt horse 2day or numbers in #ozlotto, but i'll B pissed if #Obama doesn't win the election.

He really is, it's gone be some JFK type shit.. Romney need to stand down.

Obama betta win I'm out here freezing 4 dis nigga and might b late 4 work

On my way to work listening to Obama on the radio

MT MITT ROMNEY: Today he faces the specter of the presidency - or a return to private life.

#Vote turnout about half of 2008 in my heavily #GOP Virginia precinct (65-70%). The right coming out for #Romney? #FoxNews #TeaParty #p2

Some Of Yall Want Obama Too Win Cause Of Yall Stupid Ass Weed Addiction , Like It's Gone Be Free Or Sumin !

I wonder if #Romney ever truly recovered from the 47% comment

At the voting polls with my mom .  #VoteObama #Obama #Voting #Polls Park Rec Center

Vote Obama to keep going forward.

Romney winning will cause wwIII ? how exactly?

If Obama Loses, How Will Blacks Respond?

i voted for obama so you should too #VoteObama

Obama who ignored it and therefore contributed to Hurricane Sandy. Wtf???

Drudge Report - Obama in a landslide, predicts Bob Dylan: Obama in a landslide, predicts Bob Dylan(First c

Obama ain't even stressin right now I know he Koolin at the White House

I couldn't see Mitt Romney's wife doing push ups on Ellen, could you

Obama or Romney' the winner has already been selected by God!

Today is the election day. I hope obama  win this election! #Obama2012 #election2012

I am in a long line in North Atlanta. Romney territory! #takethat

Election day my fellow americans please vote smart and for a prosperous future. The Republicans are NOT the smart choice!! #vote #obama

If he wasn't winning, Obama would vote Miguelito Sec of State, Archerio and Kengo Cabinet #straightin ht

Get America back in the right direction, throw Robin Hood out of the White House, VOTE FOR ROMNEY

I'm officially a 2012 Voter!!! Yay!  Team Obama. Our President!

Blessed to see another day and thankful to be able to make my voice and opinion matter. God bless obama

Why people saying the voting for obama  knowing damn well they not old enough to vote

Countdown U.S. Presidental Election!!! Obama VS Romney #USElection #Election2012

If anyone needs any more evidence of why not to vote for Romney, you dont deserve a fucking vote

It someone stands on every side of an issue they will agree with everyone at some point. Scary  Secret How they will rule? #Romney #Obama

So we get done saying prayer for breakfast and some random white dude said and lord please let Romney win

no ohio is dumb the dumbest state in the country one of the laziest to thats why they voted for obama

rumor Obama has lost 3% of vote bc of instagram pics of ballots is FALSE. vote CANNOT be

I knew alot of the media were supporters  wanted Obama to win,now u can hear  see it in their voices  faces! They're jus as excited!!

YES. YES. YES. YES. YES. YES. WE DID IT. WE DID IT. 2nd Term For President Barack Obama For These  ht

Talk about looking crushed, I know romney feels like crap knowing all he write was a victory speech

I aint gon lie..Obama had me nervous for a sec. lol..but I believe #TeamObama

Once you go black you never go back. Obama won. Nice job

How many white ppl done already called Obama a nigga bc he won?? Lmao

Haha so since he got reelected does that make the stereotype true?? Lmao#onceyougoblackyounevergoback #Obama

Mitt Romney did well among white males Obama did well among everyone else

IDGAF what none of you haters talking bout..FACTS IS FACTS and my PRESIDENT is Barack Obama. Cant touch this..dun dun dun dun dun#Obama2012

Fox News calls OH for Obama.  Sigh

Just because Obama is black doesn't mean anything Annoyed with that race card

Congrats on not fucking up America, Obama ftw.

Barack Obama to Fox News' desperate attempt to keep their ratings up:

We survived Bush for 8 years. You will survive Obama for 8 years. #GetOverIt

Niall also wanted Barack Obama to win(He did),One Direction is in the U.S.Soooo. This adds up to a fucking pretty day!!

I want to see Obama's speech, but I'm about to pass out!! #MightNotMakeIt

Biggest pet peeve is when people say black people only voted for obama because of his skin color!

Breaking: #TeamRomney does not concede Obama victory. Less than 1000 votes separate them with 25% of the state left to

romney won the popular vote not fair

You disqualified Romney you disqualified !

I imagine Romney furiously scribbling a concession speech right about now. #Election2012

Obama endorses marriage equality, Dems endorse it in platform, and Obama wins the White House. Let this be the end of

Why's racism brought in this election? Obama won, just leave it.

If the House of Representatives doesn't block everything that Obama tries ill be extremely disappointed

Everything gave you fuckin hope. S/o 2 #obama the only man that made me believe anything is possible. Gave

Just so everyone knows, I'm a poll worker in Ohio and I WATCHED a voting machine change votes form Romney to Obama!!! WHY???

Romney supporters can quit hating now. #Obama won. Just like he deserved to. You don't get to be the first black president doing nothing :)

Mitt Romney people looking stupid!!!!

4 years ago, obama won the election with million tears of joy..seems today things went a bit different

Imagine if in another 4 years Obama becomes the first president to go 3 terms

Now that we're safe from Romney, will liberals start speaking out against Obama's drone strikes, kill list, deportation

it's sad that people only like Obama because he's black..

false on arabs in general just terrorists now i do agree that obama gives too many handouts though

Man I pray for Obama's safety though REAL TALK..Ignorance is Bliss!

Haha at Fox News. They're now questioning their decision desk giving Ohio to Obama. #giveitup

Hes still in office lol if romney would have won it would be the same

Time for Romney to sit his ass down, Obama got this, lol Romney you're dismissed, ur services are not needed. #4MoreYears #TeamObama

NC goes red again for president with Romney

My nigga Obama back stage harlem shaking while michelle drop that ass on the floor..

Barack Obama has been declared the winner and will be re-elected as President of the United States of America.#FightFo

Yeahhh!! TEAM OBAMA 2012 now let's prepare for all the racist and ignorance people hold. I really pray for some of you.

Obama wins, I guess I have to stick with fair share, fair shake, middle-class, medicaid, tax, etc etc #curcol

Michelle finna throw that ass back for Obama tonight!

ok everybody Obama won NOW GO TO BED

So I guess #Romney gotta kick rocks and take that bullshit 2 another country

now seems to be the  time for all the jokers predicting a Romney landslide to begin 12-step return-to-earthly-reality

ayye . obama finna put it michelle ass tonight !

I'd laugh if Romney won over the last 4 states and became president hahaha that'd be sweet #IBelieveinMiracles

Praise The Lord, President Barack Obama has a second term!!

Ready to hear my president's acceptance speech. He had both an acceptance and concession speech prepared, unlike Romney

Thank you Ohio!! Super stoked! 4 more years of Obeezy baby!! #Obama2012 #Obama #ohio #thankyouohio

Obama getn sum pussy tonight #rns

Hey Obama, you gonna cancel school for us tomorrow? #CmonBruh

OBAMA BITCH!!!! 11.06.12 ;) now that nigga better legalize the bud!!! Haha

Obama Won! We Should Drink To That! (:

Now I need to go get an Obama shirt just to rub it in a little bit more haha

Regardless of your views, we all must wish Obama good luck and hope that our country will be better off in four year

Im not sure Obama is the better candidate, but he ran the better campaign.

ima wear my obama shirt tomorrow, and if i get thrown into ATS, ima throw a bitch fit ~

Man I want to see Romney face.

Why are ppl so happy over Obama being re-elected? Its not like we're goin to see any change  dis motherfucker is pro-israel so f him  #real

Obama beats Lonely to the White house race.

role reversal election. Romney wins popular vote but loses election

Hey Obama won presidential election GUESS WHAT IMA DO? SIT AT THE HOUSE  DO HOMEWORK  PLAY VIDEOS GAMES TF I LOO

I like president Obama as a guy.. Cool as hell  great to hangout with but I don't agree with everything he does a

Today marks the sadest day of my existance. I can't belive that americans are so foolish to reelect Obama

People in middle school mad Obama won lol nigga did all your teeth fall out yet #yourababy

Obamas probably gonna be kickin his feet up on his desk tomorrow and be like fuck yeah running this shit Obama-self

my neighbors and they dogs are mad mitt romney didnt win..i hear both of them barking loud af outside

Congratulations to both President Obama and Governor Romney! Now back to Miami Heat basketball!#HeatFamily

Mitt Romney is gonna flee the country so he doesn't pay any taxes lol

Obama won. Support your president even if you didn't want him to win. We are all Americans after all.

Obama is helping us. he cares about us. he didn't cause problems. Bush caused them but he's trying to fix it ..Romney

It's starting to look like a great win for Obama! Thank God!!!!

If Romney won it does not mean we could not pay for college, make blacks slaves, or take away women's rights. Dumbasses.

and this is why i love you #Obama so proud!!

I bet the neighbors know Obama name tonight.

This man OBAMA made history TWICE!!!!!!!!!.first black prez EVER and to serve TWICE

Whole time up untill 10 min. ago I thought his name was Mint Romney. lls

I'm so happy because Obama won. and I'm Mexican lol.

MITT ROMNEY GON CRY IN THE CAR LMAOOO

Can't wait for Obama's acceptance speech!!

If Obama even tries to make any gun laws, hell will break lose. #AintHappening

I'm soooo happy right now!#Obama

I give Obama a week tops before assassination

Ayyyyeeeee!! OBAMA REELECTED FOR PRESIDENT!! God is good!! :))

Maybe Fox News should allow Romney to read his victory speech to Fox viewers .They don't live in America anyway.

'04 was his greatest achievement. Taught the Obama people everything they know about base motivation

EVERYBODY THAT VOTED FOR OBAMA THANK THE MEN UP STAIRS IT ALL HAPPEN CAUSE OF HIM!!!!!!!!!!

IF YOU SLEEP , WAKE THA FUCK UP. OBAMA WON NIGGA.

RT I love the hell out of obama. #2008-2016

Nine months from now there are going to be three Obama kids in the White House.

s/o to OBAMA yu a real nigga

How can you lose by 1.M votes and still get elected? It's a shame guys. Obama or Romney supporter. It's terrible.

Yall might as well leave my tl with the bs. Obama won, again. and yall hoes can SUCK !

Am Barack Obama n I approve this azz whooping!!! Aiight!!

If your a college student you will understand how important this is. #OBAMA

After Obama fails a second time, will it still be Bush's fault?

I have faith in my nigga Obama!

Mitt Romney did create one job, only it was for Barack Obama.

Aye , Our Senate DEMOCRAT So Even IF PUNK BITCH ASS ROMNEY Woulda Won , He Couldn't Do Not A Punk Bitch Ass Thang !

I need to have a discussion with my white, Romney followers. Tell me why Obama is bad.

Romney loses. At least he never has to pay taxes again.

oh yeah, Obama won lol :-)

My president is black, my twitter is blue, I voted for OBAMA.wtf MITT GONE DO

Colleagues here in the Shanghai office are celebrating Obama's re-election

OMG. Can yall not talk about Mr.  Mrs. Obama's sex life?

Obama won, yea cool. Now all you can shut the fuck up  go to sleep.

Women made the difference in the Obama win. We make up 54% of the electorate  voted 55% for Obama.

Obama is the first president that has teenagers watching the election like damn #Obama2012

My TL looks like: OBAMA OBAMA OBAMA OBAMA Michelle's pussy is about to be sore tomorrow OBAMA OBAMA Fuck Romney

Lol. Alot of us know our facts on this election. We aint just vote for Obama kus he black lmao.

Yeah Obama Runs This Shit Again!!!! Wooooo shots for everyone!

The funny thing is, Romney is gonna go blow a few mil tonight and still have money in the bank. #RomneyRyan2016

I guess nows a good time to say I voted for Romney..

WE MADE HISTORY AGAIN President Obama is our Commander In Chief who is going to DC in January

Romney wouldn't have halted abortion. Get your facts straight.

Lmfao, what made bitches think they weren't going to be able to have weave if Romney won?

There you go, obama won now everybody stfu ~

Piper Gone Be LIVE As Shit Tomorrow !! Obama SAVED OUR EDUCATION !! Fuck You Republicans (Sticks Up Middle Finger)

Obama bout to use a rubber tonight

The sad thing is, Romney still won the popular vote. I'd say he deserves the win

Obama is not keeping you from getting a job, by time you are even out of school he will be gone and you will be blaming

Obama is Clutch! He was down by 30 at Halftime, but came back and won by 72.

Romney Sick Ass Shit Right Now DICKHEAD -.- #Team OBAMA THAT'S MY FUCKING PRESIDENT FYM ^O^

Romney got that salty face on .LMAO

Romney could of helped  created jobs! Wtf has that negro done!!! Stupid Muslim!

Romney, Aloe Vera should heal that burn right up. Unfortunately all your money can't fix your syndrome of being a huge asshole.

Ill be at work 10 mins early to talk shit to the Romney supporters..

If Obama is Baptist, why did he cut God out of his platform  cut ties with Israel, (Gods chosen people)?

Issues Mitt Romney left on the table: REVEREND WRIGHT, LIBYA, BILL AYERS, FRANK MARSHALL DAVIS

I voted for Romney and I'm laughing that Karl Rove is still arguing this isn't over. Doesn't he have a coffin to sleep in?

Woohooo Obama 4More Years as our president!! #Happy :D

Yes we get it, Obama won. Now stop with all the tweets.  You're all tweeting the same thing.

Obama needs his own money $500 bill

ashamed that my state voted for romney what were they on

4 years later, Young Jeezy's song is still relevant!!! MY PRESIDENT IS BLACK!!! #Obama

ROMNEY THAT'S THAT SHYT I DON'T LIKE !!!!!!!!

Since Obama president we still got weave, condoms, black churches, illegal cable, food stamps and all that good stuff!

Nice try Romney! Congrats Obama!!

If Mitt Romney would've won ALL you motherf*ckas would have salty tweets

Is Romney speechless? Is he going to give a speech or not???

BREAKING NEWS: The Associated Press has called the election. Obama wins the U.S. presidency.

ROMNEY is OBAMA BITCH NAH LOL

I refuse to tune out until I've seen Romney cry. #Election2012

Romney can't even decide if he's pro-life or pro-choice. You people expect him to decide whats best for our country? Yeah. Right.

obama won now the only thing is left is for  to stop fronting like they ain't back together

Now Romney Can Shut The Eff Up , Go Back Home, And Learn How To.Stop Cutting Real Nigggas Off lol

WE BOUT DAT LIFE TONIGHT BABY!!! THEY SAY OBAMA IS BACKI TOLD THEM NAW HE AIN'T NEVER LEFT!!!

Had to unfollow ah few Romney voters, Them Hoes is Salty !

My granny can get Obama Care!!! Thats all im worried about!!

Naw Romney wife just admitted she voted for Obama!

Women should be proud Romney didn't winYyyyeeaaaahhhh

FOX News is so openly anti-Obama. It's sad! But, I know they all mad now!

Nice job.  Are you going to work for Obama now like you did for Clinton?  What will you do for a living now?

Obama is President, end of story. Now go to bed kids.

The Romney campaign still trying and shit. It's done with, Obama already won.

I hate how peoples parents warp into their kids heads who to support if they were to cut u off from all of THEIR money ud be happy obama won

OBAMA HELPS MILLIONS ROMNEY WANTED TO HELP MILLIONAIRES

Obama ftw.  Now I can concentrate on Halo 4.

Good I hated that two faced bitch Romney

I just unfollowed someone because she supports Romney and is acting like a cunt about him losing. I'm such a bitch lol

Crazy people are so upset about Obama being re-elected but were fine letting Bush fuck up for 8 years

We should put obama face on every condom

So Obama is going to win Florida, Ohio, AND Virgina.  That should tell the #GOP something.  They were positive they had this in the bag.

Romney won the popular vote.So why did Obama win? Oh yeah thats right because the electoral college is freaking STUPID #nicegoing #screwthis

on a scale from 1-10 how mad do u think Mitt Romney is

I wonder if Mitt Romney is crying right now lol

Obama need I throw a project x party now at the White House for his winning

God is good 4 more years #IVoted OBAMA!!!!!!!!!!

I hope all of y'all that voted for Obama get exactly what you voted for

Obama gon hit that south Dallas swag on em!

Please enlighten me. The world is not endng cause Obama won. Obbiouslly he wasnt to terrible, cause he got voted ba

don't you worry, Romney supporters, just go to your family's lake house or go ride jet-skis or something. relax, get your

damn romney loss the election, and he aint gettin no pussy. smdh

It looks like Obama will win Florida, Colorado, Nevada AND Ohio. Why are pundits on CNN etc saying he doesn't have a mandate? #election2012

Romney what happened to all that shit talking ? Smh *does I don't understand dance* ^_^

*Indian accent* Thank you, come again Romney!

EVERYBODY SHUT THE FUCK UP!!! Shit! Obama won,People have their opinions but it doesnt matter..This is showing peoples true colors..

and where's that bitch romney ? going back to the fucking drawing board right? OH.

its not that obama isnt doing anything, he just cant do this  that congress HAS to approve..  most of them ar

I remember in 8th grade when obama won, school was too live. Idk why?! no one had a clue about politics lol

Warren and Obama win time to move to Europe.

Fox is already blaming Romney. They can't even give this guy a night off. Oh well! #Obama2012

Niall fangirling over Obama winning though when he doesn't even live here. Precious.

Romney and all his supporters need to stop acting like bitches and stfu,yall lost GET OVER IT get that shit offf my tl

Romney loading up that 44 bulldog listening to I ain't got no worries drinking whiskey bout to kill the whole campaign #whitepeopleshit

If yu dnt wanna hear anything about obama tf yu on twitter for this a social networking site bitch imma tweet what I

Yes! Mr. President!! You won!! #Obama

Obama just won and my moms bickering, I'm not hearing dat.

Barack Obama Wins 2012 Election, Gets Second Term - ABC News  (via

I'm not a big fan of Obama.. But I'd pick him over Romney any day. Romney is an asshole. #Election2012 #forreal #dumbassesforpresident

My president is black !!!OBAMA IN THIS BITCH !!!!!

so other than the normal scholarships, how would obama help you keep low loans? The interest or what?

I had a gut feeling Obama would win. Glad he did. #dualcreditps110

said President Obama probably doing the cat daddy lol

Lmao Obama just got reelected and  talking about his cat recording songs in the studio

Romney lost because he was too Romneyey. #election

Sooo Romney is winning the popular vote Told y'all those votes don't count.

FOX news projects Obama victory while simultaneously its hosts debate its own results #election2012

Congratulations President Obama. Was a good contest. I pray that you earn the trust that was bestowed upon you tonigh

Everyone is so busy with the Obama no one notice that Colorado legalized weed

I want Obama to succeed for people like and who whole-heartedly support him for legitimate r

oh. Why would you be scared? Are Obama police going to come to everyone's house and steal our food and jobs and insurance?

would you consider the electoral vote system a joke if Romney has won? Nice try though

If Romney tries to run for president again

Romney family, as always, gathers around the candidate

Majority of the people voting for Obama is white so don't make it a racial thing -___-

You're ignorant as fuck if you think I voted for Obama because he's black.

Haitian parents will call the world to tell everyone that OBAMA just won the election like we wasn't watching it to

At the end of the day I told y'all god had us .. And look . We got another term !!!! #4moreyears #2TERMS #Obama

Mad people hating on Obama in my TL right now.  I ain't worried bout it doe..

BREAKING NEWS: has NOT called Pres yet to concede. The Obama camp is awaiting his call.

S/o to Obama with his 4more years.

Karl Rove has gone off the deep end. Truly. Even the hosts of Fox News are arguing with him as he desperately tries to say OH goes Romney.

If Romney got the popular vote, then he should be elected? #commonsense ##RomneyRyan2012

Mitt Romney prolly in his feelings bumping drake

Hey Romney men lie, women lie, u lied but them numbers didn't. OBAMANATION

Who the fuck is tht bitch tlkin shit abt Obama

Fox News and the GOP minds are completely blown by the Obama Campaign taking Ohio. LOL!

IT'S GNE B FUCK UP IF ROMNEY  POINTS CUM UP BUT OBAMA GOT 284 NA

CNN is saying its almost impossible for mitt romney to win unless he sweeps the battle growns ( 5 of 6 states left)

Yes, because Obama made a 14 year old's life hell. That makes total sense.

Isn't Obama basically a lame duck since the GOP controls the House? Y'all celebrating too early.

President Obama has won Ohio, he has won reelection #msnbc2012

Romney And His Votes Got Da I Eat Ass Face !

#OBAMA My Muthafucking President Again..Now Im Ready For Thanksgiving  Christmas..#LovinMyLife

Romney the race is called. Go back to your unemployed wife

Man after Obamas Second Term is over Michelle Obama should run  make history as The First Black WOMAN president ,

I just realized that but there is still time for Obama to regain the pop vote. My vote has never gone to who I voted for though.

I just can't trust this yet! Not until Romney is on TV saying he lost.

So take that RAISED RIGHT republican bullshit else where  don't infer I wasn't raised the right way because I support Barack Obama.

I want to retweet stuff but everything's about Obama so I'll just wait till tomorrow

Obama got reelected, but I'm not sure what his stance is on the ongoing hostilities in Skyrim.

Obama won. Now everyone shut the fuck up

If your having election problems I feel bad for you son. I got 44 presidents but Mitt Romney ain't one.

Romney's Campaign is on hush mode lol. glad i mad the right choice for my first time voting #Obama2012

Y'all fuck Romney and obama POT IS LEGAL IN COLORADO

Where Obama at these white people getting on my last damn nerves

Ok I'm officially done with the romney and obama tweets.. My retweet was the last one

Obama won Massachusetts, the same state that Mitt Romney governed. His own damn home state doesn't even want him in office!

I still love u dog just tell Obama not to try to send me to the cotton fields lol!

if romney wins we're road trippin!! #liketocanada #outtahere

Actually Romney won the Popular Vote. just sayin'

Its 05:54 am, and im not sleeping Great Denmark I don't like you right now! xD well GO OBAMA!! :D

Actually it isn't called yet but Romney is ahead right now in Ohio. #RomneyRyan2012

Celebrities React to Barack Obama's Election Win!  's tweet is on there too ^.^ AWESOME !

This gotta be like on of the best weeks ever the bulls won Obama won  my nephew leaving for a week to go to camp God Favors me #YesLawd

Obama needs 2 cum out listen 2 det ross dez niggas cnt hold me bck

Was really hoping to see Romney and his family cry on TV. But I have to wake up in five hours

Romney is winning by 1 million in popular vote. I understand Obama won, but shouldn't he wonder why the majority of Ame

And this nigga won't turn it backO we bouta throw dem paws if he don't flip back before Obama speak

This Obama re-election is going to put Polling (and sampling) under the microscope again. We saw this in Calgary

I think I'll wear my Obama pin tomorrow~

If Obama doesn't become president until January.. Does that mean we have no president right now, or?

Romney Wea Your Votes Ad Fuck Outta Here It's Forever Team Obama!!!!!

See Romney, this is what you get when you mess with Big Bird!!  #Vote2012

The Brown and the Gray: Obama wins 72% of Hispanics and 91% of AA 30, Romney 60% of whites 65. #YourVote

seriously. We will not succeed if America is run the way Obama has run it. we really cannot take 4 years.

Looks like Romney carries a lead in the popular vote, but will the electoral college favor Obama? #njelec

When President Obama won in '08, I called my grandma. Because we're still blessed to have her at 101, I can't wait to talk to her tomorrow!

Romney gone cry when he get in the car *Smokey v.

Mitt Romney done shook the table!!!!!

Barack Obama was re-elected to serve his second term as the President of the Uni

but I would love I smoke with Obama lbvs .. he from Hawaii too .!! shit that's nothing but LOUD

Romney wont even come out and give a speech he prob in the corner listening to micheal jackson man in the mirror n shi

So does this mean the end of Romney? i wont miss seeing his fake face but hope Mrs Romney can concentrate on her battle w/MS

Go ahead Obama and start writing out welfare checks to half the country that does nothing but want free money.

To who all voted for Obama, you will continue to get your food stamps Along with abortions, gay marriages, and a stic

I Know Romney Feel Dumb Ass Hell Lol

Even the people from Peru , knew Obama is going to win , hahah !!

ok people obama won now chill tf out

Hitler killed over 6 million Jews in concentration camps and his invasion of Poland sparked WWII..how can you compare him to Obama?

We did it we did it Romney say he didn't even write a I lost speeech wtf

Bull shit! Romney won the popular vote #morepeoplewanthim

All Fox News rants aside, Obama could be the first Dem. President since FDR to win two elections with over 50% of the vote. #Election2012

In Barack Obama we trust? Last chance! #Economy #InmigrationReform

Ayyyeee my vote counted in Obama's win #Obama2012

S|O to my BLACK president BARACK OBAMA , he in this thang for another 4 year !

BREAKING: With most of the uncounted votes from the left coast, President Obama projects to win both the Electoral College and popular vote.

LOL Romney didn't win the state that he governed in! That should tell you something

Obama returns to White House. Romney returns to 1954.

Hope Romney drowns in his tears. It's okay, he'll think it's a mormon baptism.

Its not all about Obama race b/c many whites voted for Obama, its more then that ! Stop being ignorant

Obama gets re-elected and marijuana gets legalized in Colorado. It's a good day for black people~

I know how Romney is feeling right now. It's the same feeling I get when I remember how many followers I have on my AC

Romney got that garnett face lmfaoo

I was joking. Im just saying I dont get why youre fightin w/me? I dislike Obama regardless his religion. The end

I didn't gaf about politics b4 Obama

at least obama is a people person and understands to treat everyone the way you want to be treated. oOOPS????

Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual and Transgender for Obama. #Obama #Obama #Obama

I just get upset at all the Romney supporters being called ignorant. I'm not racist. So dumb.

all I have to sayyyyy if I was Mitt Romney, I would quit after my own state didn't vote for mejust saying

Oya obama, iz enough now. You've already won. No need to lap them again. #281OBAMA203ROMNEY

U mad go to sleep but when u wake up our president  still obama tho

Dollar Falls as Obama Win Paves Way for Monetary Easing - Bloomberg

What's funny is Romney is winning in overall votes by over a million. .

romney supporters waking up to jobs, obama supporters waking up to cockroaches and foodstamps

Obama supports everything our job at UPS stands for. Romney would want to break up our unions and take away our health benefits

Obama won because over half this country doesn't want to work. They want the government to take care of them. Times ha

I heard that ppl were getting death threats for voting for Obama. AHA I WISH a mutha#%$^% WOULD try to threatin me for who i voted for!

I've been observing Obama's Campaign HQ crowd on tv and trying to find a person I might be able to relate to. It's not really happening.

Empire State now blue, and blue tops red on spire. Obama is re-elected.

OBAMA WINS! This calls for a celebratory GIF party, no?

Guess America just moved FORWARD!!!!!!#OBAMA

Chris Freind said Mitt Romney would lose PA. Here's why:

george bushy vagina put us 50 years back in 8 years, it wasn't gonna take obama 4 to fix that

AYEEE Obama fa tha $1000 dollar bill. We in this hoe *beefs it up*

Bam DIDN'T I TELL YOU OBAMA DIDN'T HAVE IT JUST YET. #Rewind

Congratulaions to Barack Obama on his re-election

Obama ain't black y'all he mixed so stop making this about the color of his skin but that he making a change!!!

Obama prolly on bout 3 stamina pills tonight

Assuming that people just voted for Obama cause he's black is so damn stupid..

Romney is not conceding. I think he needs to hear from the 47% and their supporters that he lost. Snap out of it!

Evangelical Leaders warn that forced gay marriages in Obama's 2nd term could begin as early as tomorrow morning #cu

Obama won electoral votes but Romney won the majority votes #facts

Obama has done it yet again

How about worrying about our future now instead of Obama's sex life. Not everything is about sex, weed, and money O

everybody that voted for Obama should have to wear an idiot sign.

Romney say he still got ah chance hurry up  count them mfn numbers hoe.lol

How dumb yall gonna feel if it changed and Romney pulled through? Ima just go to school laughing my ass off.

They got sum mad wonder breads on my tl. Sorry but OBAMA rules.

We haven't had a budget since Obama was elected but this many people think we should give him four more years? #TheBlaze2012

Why you sucking his dick ?  House of Representatives shouldn't give anything to Obama unless he ter

SO proud to have re-elected Obama and Brown in Ohio!

Puhleeze.  Obama  his goons were doing WHATEVER they wanted  were protected my the media.  I

IT'S ANOTHER 4 MORE YEARS TO BARACK OBAMA..CONGRATULATIONS..

they gone be like sike Romney won

Barack Obama re-elected for FOUR more yearsWish him with US

Who the hell is Ronmey or whatever his name is LOL . I only know Obama ._.

Wassgood obama wins again bitchess!! #4moreyears

it's ridiculous. They are crunching the numbers. Even fox called it for Obama.

RT Karl Rove doesn't even know that the GOP has already moved on to being embarrassed that they ever liked Mitt Romney.

i literally love how angry everyone is right now #Obama #goodnight

Romney won't concede because he is watching Fox News..

NIALL, I voted for OBAMA and Pre-ordered Take Me Home. What's a girl gotta do to get you to notice her? :D

I'm waiting on Obama to officially when before I turn up!!

Again people, take your tits and calm them! Romney is a shitty candidate too, they both suck and would be terrible so let it go! #fuckyouall

Obama voters, please give me a good reason why y'all voted for him? Cause I'm sure you can't.

Okay okay, Obama won, get over it and stop complaining. Everyone shut up now, is in my country.

Obama won, 3 states just legalized gay marriage, and Tammy Baldwin is the first openly gay senator. America, cheers to mo

I wonder how many death threats Obama has gotten already?

I'm going to cry lyk no hw 4day weekend one direction usa ukno xfactor ELLEN obama the essay day and saturday imma cry brb

Twitter just message say if u say one more wrd abut Romney they gonna deactivate my twitter lmaoo

Obama care will never happen. I wish it could. But it's just not reasonable

Crowd at #Romney party booing, not ready to concede. #Election2012

That nigga Romney mad asf , he finnah go smoke a fat ass blunt

John Hawkes portrayal of Mitt Romney in Martha Marcy May Marlene is just flawless!!!

Relieved to know my student loans won't be AS expensive as they would've been with Romney as president

- my mom is mad because i yelled Obama won at the end of the movie in the theature

Not Sayin All White People Are Racist But SOME Of Them Truly Are They Didn't Want A Black Man Up In The White House Obama Might Be The Last

AGREED!! Romney wins but denied the office do to this stupid electoral college. Bad system that denies the true winner!!!

I changed the 'my' to 'our' congrats Obama/Biden #Clique #Win

lol punk ass security tried to roll on me. I said Woooo Barack Obama just won again u can't tell me nothing! Where is your badge young man?

It's not about geography anymoreit's about demographics!!!! BADMIND don't pay!!! Big up Obama!!!

If Romney won my ass was moving to Canada

In 2000 Al Gore won the popular vote by 500k. Romney is only 200k ahead of Obama now, and we all know what happened in 2000

Lets do it again!! Congatulations  OBAMA!!!

Obama does not support legalizing Marjuana. You are too yound and naive to understand women rights. And Rep. will continue

President Obama Re-Elected to 2nd Term

Time to celebrate Congratulations to President Obama :) #ineeda6amwakeupcall #teamkakaklerin #teamjosecue

#Loudoun as bellwether? Seems probable. Unofficial results (all precincts) show Obama victory; #Va. leaning that way too. #election2012

Keyboard warriors talking about Obama

OBAMA WON! *beefs it up* *dougie* *south dallas swag* *TWERK* *two step* *walk it out* *shoulder lean* *stanky leg* *s

Romney mad as shit he want them to recount votes ain't no one got time for all that, you lost deal with it and move on

Shouldn't romney have Ohio now?

I think Obama should of gotten voted out. That's my thought, but lets hope he actually does something good for us in

The past two elections  McCain and Romney would have been much better choices.

Come on Obama!U suck mitt Romney go kiss a dogs butt

Now Indian tweeple will once again rejoice over Obama's victory as if he has become India's president. #IndianObsessionWithAmerica

Seems like Romney will wind up getting  less than 30 percent of the Latino vote. Wow.

Oh, and last time i checked you're still living off mommy and daddy's income. No wonder you were for Romney. #BornWith

Obama securing presidency.. Jibby camana PRU? Still goyang?

Romney stood no chance against Big Bird and the whole of Sesame Street! Yip Yip Yip!! Uhh huuh ! Uhh huuh !!

Mitt will be demonized by the GOP in ways that only Obama will truly understand

I'd prefer to see Edge cash in on Obama but I'm satisfied with Ziggler too.

Lmao these folks hell talkin shxt on my Tl about  romney  GN tho #School in the A.M.

I was shook for a min but God come on and have two terms #obama .time for a praise break

I just read the most ignorant shot. Obama is definitely the 44th president y'all. Please, educate yourselves.

you're getting subtweeted by Obama supporters haha

I Know Romney Salty Af. His Own State Didn't Vote For Him, And He Didn't Win As Being President.

If you're sending hate to Erin or Emily for not liking Obama/having an opinion I think you need to step away from t

They cuttin up for Obama on SU campus lol

100 black people outside screaming Obama. Only in kincannon #compton

that's right screw most of the people in this country who think Romney should be president!

Mitt Romney can jump off of a cliff.#evil

Romney's people are maddd! hahaha so funny

Live election results Huffington post has Obama at 290 electoral votes.

These females on my twitter and Facebook that are mad that Obama won..Shame on you! Romney's female views  were degrading. #smh

Bed time. I have to WORK in the morning. Somebody has to pay for all the gifts Obama plans to give out

Sesame St Big Bird has come out of hiding after fear of his impending demise under Romney

After watching the first debate how can ANYONE vote for this IDIOT. #Romney

Its simple! Obama won because he put a spark under Young ppl like NO OTHER PRESIDENT. Its 2012 you cant win w/o suppo

Dude, Why U Mad Tho!  House of Representatives shouldn't give anything to Obama unless he terminat

S/O to the ppl who saying black folks voted for Obama just cause he's black, oh freaking well he won!!!!

Shyt so what if black ppl support Obama because he's black we done came a long way from slavery up to a dominate le

stop these ignorant tweets.. Obama is our president, support him and America will run much smoother. I'd say the same

It's crazy that people really believe that the only good that comes out of Obama is food stamps/welfare Uneducated fucks.

Romney has to do his concession speech first

No single factor helped Obama more than dropping marriage rates. Unmarried people voted for Obama. Far more of them t

So all it took was for Obama to win for the 4G to work on nations ford

Mitt Romney don't care he got bandz he going home to.$$$$$$$$$$$$

Romney gets secret service? me: yeah, the official candidates all do. him: even for the green party? me: ??? do you all know?

NO MORE OBAMA CARE, IT'S CALLED HEALTH CARE. U JUST INHERIT IT TONIGHT

Obama would like to thank you for ur winning vote!

I was scared. If Romney would've won, I would've cried like the KKK at the million man march.

All you blacks day dreaming that Obama is your president . Iketleng .

To any of My Republican friends: Don't come at ME reckless because Romney lost. It's not a personal thing. Be pissed but come correct.

Romney is still waiting for results frm Florida. Maybe they shld add Bahamas to the map. Ooshi. Abegy bow out joor!

I have no problem with Romney waiting to concede: let the votes be counted.

Goddamn my nigga Obama went super saiyen on the electoral college

Came home after a terrible Math exam to find out OBAMA GOT RE-ELECTED!!!!!!!!!!

Can't wait to hear President Barack Obama's victory speech. He always delivers such powerful and motivational speeches.

Romney's gonna draw this out for all ten days, isn't he.

Everybody Thats Black Or Like Balck People Please Go Give Hell Shes Talking Dirty About Us Shes Team #Romney Didnt He Just Lose

Fox News calls Fox News for Romney.

Previous tweet is something I can imagine Obama saying. I should be his speech writer!!

not true. Romney's not president because people are stupid and voted for Obama and his lies to our country.

Fox's Carl Cameron: Conservatives in GOP arguing that Romney was not conservative enough

Even Al Gore thinks that Mitt Romney is taking way too long to concede this election.

you gotta chill lmao how many shots will you take when obama makes his actual speech?

Maury: Governor Romney, when it comes to Americayou are not the president

Romney was govener in Massachusetts for many years, and he lost dramatically in this state.. Maybe that should tell you something America..

We Love You President Obama. You will continually be in our prays that God will use you mightily these next four years. ME

but even if they take Ohio, he will have 272, and Romney winning every other state he will get 266

Would Romney winning have been bad?

Women cheering on Romney.. Do you not love yourself, or? #ignoranceatitsbest

#PV was too live when OBAMA won!!!!

Yes Romney won!!! [: nah that would be funny though

I can go for a sandwich right now. #obama

too long the unemployment benefits. But other than that Obama is good, equality for everyone.

Romney Havent Congratulate Obama Yet -___- Bitch , Lols

Aint Nobody Fucking With His Clique. #Obama

So Romney aint coming out till ohio votes count up right

So when Obama gonna get me my iPhone 5?

way to go obama 4 more with our help u will make it better

Romney needs to concede the election already -_____-

Another pic of Barack Obama celebrating with a braai, tongs in hand.

bitch deleted her status cause she knew she was gonna get hate for saying she likes Romney.

I want Obama to hurry tf up , black people always late to shit

Romney didnt even when his own state fuckboy

Watch Obama be some crazy dictator just waiting to take over America #conspiracy2012

The fact that #obamanation is trending is sickening. This is America. Obama is not king or Jesus. I need to sleep and dream something better

I dont hate Romney supporters.I hate all the ignorant Romney supporters who can't say why they wanted Romney in office other thanObama sucks

Yes Obama won but y the f r South Africans excited, did u forget he killed Brother Leader,continues to support Israel apartheid in Palestine

Fuck the election. Fuck Romney. Fuck Paul Ryan. Fuck Ted Cruz. Fuck Romney wife. Fuck republicans. Fuck y'all. Fuck it. I'm going to bed.

Regardless, Barak Obama IS your president. Show some respect. You're an American first, a member of your party second.

Good To #Sleep Now With Both Eyes CLose.. #Obama Wins Re- #Election2012 U're Stoppable!!!

OBAMA! Real Nigga! All Day! By Himself! 1 Nation!! 2 Terms!! Fresh Cut!! White House! Mitt, You Ready To Go Night Night Ni**a?

Got dat Obama you gone kum out  talk or you gone stay in the hotel an beat dat pussy up! .. Lol

romney said he would have abortions for veey extreme situations. That is one of those situations

Obama declared victory on Twitter and Facebook before victory speech

My fbf that support Romney are real quiet now

Ooooh HE MAD lol go head and throw that victory speech away ROMNEY.u aint know#TEAMOBAMA

smart people can't like obama. Americans are blind ! #Godsaveamerica

What ALOT of college students doin RIGHT NOW #TurnUpTanite #CSUEB #OBAMA

Shine bright like a #diamond mr. Prez.!!! #Obama

Barack Obama, congratulations on your reelection. (Checked in at My bedroom)

Nobody has values they want to be handed evrything and don't worry Obama will at the expense of families who work for what they have

Even where Mitt Romney is from the voted for Obama hahaha

its a celebration! obama-nation 4more yrs thank god!

maybe the billionaires should have spend the money on creating jobs instead of waisting it on Rove and Romney

Obama wins a second term as U.S. President - The Washington Post

Obama is president, but no matter what God is still king and thats all that matters !

I'm soo glad obama won!!! :)

Sorry Romney your money couldn't win the election for you!

Obama won and Colorado legalized weed..today was a good day

Obama got this, even if Romney about tie with Obama. I just seen it on news.

I'm not trying to sound like its the end of the world and I'm not trying to be critical of Obama. Just saying is all

NPR calls Virginia for Obama, bringing him to a projected 303 electoral votes vs. 203 for Romney.

GOVERNOR Romney hahaha go back to your state that doesn't like you

Romney hasn't conceded cuz his minions r busy writing the one speech they SHOULD have written!

All dem females pussy wet because obama won

Now that Obama won time to get it together.

If Romney wins it would help so many struggling millionaires who can't even put gas in their yachts because of heavy taxat

I love how the #romney campaign is still not recognizing Obamas win. Lol can we say #salty #idontbelieveyou

I'm assuming my aunt didnt know Obama won 'cause she came in the house, being all loud 'cause I left CNN on downstairs.

again, if Herman Cain was in it, yall would have voted Obama out..or wouldnt have known which way to vote #FYou

You all act like the world is ending because Obama is remaining to be our president I'm pretty sure we were still

RT Obama got 40% of white voters, fuck your color lines.

Obama is up 78% to 21% in Richmond. Fuck outta here BS I retweeted earlier lol

Romney only wrote a victory speech and haven't heard from him he's probably writing a loser speech

Obama victory was surgical. Does it bother anyone that elections can be won by micro-targeting  the population? #elitepower #election2012

Fuck Romney and Obama, Jax is president #soa

Can't believe Obama won again! What was America thinking?Atleast this is the LAST time he can win.Only 4 years from getting a REAL president

obama people can party over winning the next 4 years b/c you won't have to wake up for work the next day considering you won't have a job

I just put Romney on waivers and picked up Marco Rubio for my fantasy politics team.

Time to WEED out all these #Obama haters :)

I'm out to miami to paint a huge wall!!! Let's celebrate obama baby!!! Made in america!!!!

I'm sorry to say this but Obama may get shot!! America I'm sorry.

denshamagic: ohaasahoroscope: pikaballoons: oh my god obama is leo and romney is pisces thank u based oha

Take note apparently Obama won because of brown people and women #fourmoreyears

Obama is probably going to win the popular vote as well.

Obama will win the popular vote. No split.

Romney is still not ready to concede. Maybe there's a secret 3 Doors Down Fans Only bonus nook in the Electoral College we don't know about.

All of you Obama supporters better not be complaining when gas is $5. #Idiots

I don't care if you're a Romney or Obama fan but don't come around me talking politics if you're close-minded or uneducated

If people didn't vote for Obama, you get called racist. If you did your just retarded. #Election2012 #FuckObama

Still no phone call from Romney to Obama conceding the race.

Romney won't show his face for a good minute.

RT I bet tonight Obama gone be like wait..Hold up..please let me roll up

You are ignorant . Shut up your president is Obama bitch , fuck outta here!

Thank god for amendment 64 333 colorado, ur so cool. But ps how the fuuuuck did mitt romney get so close to winning. Not okay, America!! :(

Maybe Romney shouldn't have pissed off GM Chrysler women and minorities dumbass

I'm pretty sure people only vote for Obama cause he has so many supporters in Hollywood.

Mitt need to go to sleep before them obama goons pay his ass a visit

If your candidate lost, stop being so bitter. Let's not divide our country. Let's support Obama to build a better America.

Barack Husein Obama wins. The power of Husein.

America isn't doomed. What makes me sad is not that Obama won, but that America has missed the opportunity to be led

I should wear my Obama shirt to school tomorrow.

Alright Obama all you gotta do now is deal with a republican house. A brother is tryna stay on his moms healthcare for 6 more yrs son

Mitt was let down by the Meatloaf vote #Romney

I Think It Would Have Been Better For Mitt Romney To Win But Im Black So Yay Obama

#forwardmovement RT Not only will Barack Obama be inaugurated on MLK Day but 2013 is the 50th anniversary of th

And the sock game continues thank you Obama

Ok #Romney concede now.even if you get florida and ohio you ain't getting 270

I know I wished they'd quit crying and accept Obama won.

To all the Romney supporters who say you're moving to Australia, Canada, Italy, etc. because Obama wonyou're doing it wrong.

People and their ignorant racist tweets can take an exit with Mitt Romney.

LmaoCNN said even if Romney hypothetically won Ohio, Alaska and Floridait still wouldn't be enough.Concede already.!! I'm #sleepy

but when i do go to sleep i know its gone be a good sleep knowing #Obama is back in office

Felicidades to President Barack Obama on his re-election tonight 281 electoral votes and counting! photo via htt

If Obama legalizes I might be able to like him.  -_____- #dafuq

Bush 2004 had fewer electoral college votes than Obama 2012. #pageRove

If President Obama really wants to mess with them, he should just do his acceptance speech, and leave Romney holding t

Tears as Republicans learn of #Romney defeat. Video:

Idgaf who was president, I've been had my rights for 19 yrs and I was gon have them with Romney .

you can't call the popular vote yet. Most you can say is romney is ahead

i forgot about Paul Ryani think everyone else did, too. Including Mitt Romney.

Love how John King at CNN broke it down to see if Romney could reach the 270 Electorial Votes ('He's not trying to

Romney preparing a Mormon miracle!! LETS GO!! lol #election2012

Under Mitt Romney's rule, we'd have sanctioned blogging, censored YouTube, no more Oatmeal and Online Entrepreneurship

Oh so everyone that is successful voted for Romney? And everyone that voted for Obama is broke/stupid? #ignorance th

I have an idea, we make them both president: #Romney on even days and #obama on odd days #election2012

Why does trump feel Obama should terminate obamacare ?

You say I'm a lazy asshole because I voted for Obama. Yeah, explains why I'm working my ass off to go to med school, right?

I know. But seriously, that was some ppls first response to Obama winning. Not about health care or jobs and what really matters

I'm at Obama Victorypocalypse 2012 (New York, NY) w/ 206 others

Romney act like we don't have shit to do in the morning just cause he's jobless. Quit the bullshit.

Not only did Obama win, but Minnesota passed Vote No! Gay Marriage will now be legal!! #VoteNo #Friends #GayRights #

Yep. Neither Romney or the TeaParty failed here. A clear choice was on the ballot. America chose to run away from its problem.

celebrating obama's win n donating towards sandyat the same damn time??? =)

are you the President of the  USA?  Obama is so afraid of pissing the Muslims off he hasn't visited Israel to show support

and i know you like obama and you know i don't so we're never gonna agree on this and idc cause you're my

Troops should all retire.  Obama can send his voters to manage Afghanistan  his Arab Spring.  They'd do anything 4 him, right?

I guarantee every black person wanted Obama because he was black..

How in the fuck are we lazy because we support Obama? Okay then I f you support Romney you a straight up #BITCH

With Obama's coal policies, Kentucky/WV's economies will plummet over the next four years.

Barack Obama, Yes We Can  Again !!!

Soooo Romney HAS NOT called Obama yet .And Romney only prepared an acceptance speech not a concession speech. Ol arrogant LOSER!! #PunkMove

McConnell announces his next goal Obama will be a two term president. #obama #get_it?

Yes! Congrats to the Re-Elected President Barack Obama! :)

Romney sorry ass, Man up you lost #bitch

Honestly, if Michelle Obama were to run for President, I would vote for her!!

I watched obama get reelected 2min before  posted anything. for life! #fastlane

Romney is showing that he was only in this for himself - and not for the country - by not conceding. #selfish #ric

During the wait, let's discuss the cosmetic. I am among few that really liked Michelle Obama's Narciso Rodriguez last Pres election night.

Ohhh well Obama won end of story so people should just face it ahaha

Fairly certain Romney would not have played a Nu Schooz track had he won

Is Romney refusing to concede symbolic of middle-aged white men refusing to concede? Anything. Ever.

how bad you want to punch Obama right now on a scale of 1-10

I'm not racist at all actually.u sound ignorant. Your black and I'm not. If I say I don't like Obama that makes me racist?

Now Romney is being a sore loser..in his hotel room crying and won't give his concession speachshame

This guy is right. the first objective for Obama is bringing the country back together cause this shit is ridiculous

To all the kids at LPPACS who keep talking shit on Romney - just remember hes the one who supports the charter schools like LP, not Obama.

I know what has happened Romney is making it a long night like all the so called expert said it would  be. Maybe Sepp is on his team.

giving Romney a break to catch himself lolz

I hope obama tax cut Stacy Dash, Donald Trump, and Mitt Romney 45%

Btw! the stereotype of African Americans liking Obama for food stamps, medicaid, welfare, etc.. is FALSE! Bc I receive neither. Just saying.

President Barack Obama did not create this mess.  Prior administration did.  It was just a matter of time before the bandages broke.

ima go eat  wait for obama's speech.. then head to bed. goodnight to all my lovers  loners.  obama supporters  rich ppl. muah.

Can Obama just make his winning speech I'm really tired but I don't want to miss it #4moreyears #latinos

Well done, Philly - thanks for the RT!  Here's to Obama!

lovin how all the butthurt dickriders complain. Romney is a flip-flopping selfish ass. He doesn't give a shit about normal people just money

so if you voted for Romney you must be smarter than those who voted for obama. Makes perfect sense! #Dumbasscomment

Barack Obama - Mr. November congrats America! #4moreyears of This ones for all of you. #MrNovember

I know that's right. It's not fair. He needs to call. Obama might give you a job if you do

you are what's wrong with Americacalling people racist because they didn't vote for Obama is racist i

OBAMA MADE THAT HAPPEN CAUSE HE WANTS TO SILENCE ALL THE WHITES!

BET is the BEST!!! They're PARTING over thereLMaoThey just called Romney the LOOSER of the eveningCTHU

Gotta get to sleep. Have to be up early for work. YES, I have a pretty good job and I voted for Obama. Would you look at that?

Barack Obama to Mitt Romney: I just beat you, and this is crazy, but this election is over, s

Surely someone put a fly w/ a camera attached to it's head in the Romney war room?

romney give it up. You Lost!!!

Just in: #Barack #Obama re-elected as the US President

If Romney won the electoral, it would have been a clean race, Obama wins and it's a conspiracy #icant

I'm for Obama . . I'm just tryin to get yu to understand where I'm coming from . Lol

Obama's 'Four more years' victory tweet already the most retweeted of all time: Barack Obama has been re-elected

Romney is refusing to concedeBitch, you lost! Go home and accept defeat you dumbass; it's over, you're not president #fuckyou ((:

Holy shit I can't believe Romney won

Romney would have had to use all his skill to bring America back from the brink. Americans have no idea what we're in for

I wanna set a car on fire like the Raiders won the SuperBowl right now!  #Obama #fourmoreyears

Romney probably hasn't conceded because he only wrote an acceptance speech. He's probably writing the concession speech now.

Romney not conceding so far after Obama's re-election has been announced speaks volumes. No class, far from a class act. Glad he's not pres.

Anyone else (than NYT) calling VA for Obama?

For #OBAMA too be plyin before I let go haha #Gshit

your wrong obama is winnign the popular vote

Weird. I voted for Romney and still following all who voted Obama. Politics is what it is, so is college sports. #nosweat

popular vote is favoring Romney. The GOP got their mandate

Even if romney wins ohio, alaska, virginia and flordia he still wouldn't win

People need to back off the people who are supporting Obama.. #freedomofspeech

So while you're close-minded and believe the generality that all gay people love Obama, I'll snicker and remember all of my political views.

Females would twerk for anything  Not surprised if they all twerking cause Obama won

Obama is a Great man but he won't be able to do shit w/a majority Conservative party, he's more like a mascot in the office.

Live updates: Videos show Democrats jubilant at Obama victory, Republicans dour: Democrats celebrate a  #lasvegas

obama and romney should be bonus characters in def jam fight for NY along w/ they wifeys lmao

Romney, even with OH, FL, and VA you still won't have enough to win. Just. Give. Up. You lost. Preserve what little dignity you have left.

Being in the room when it was called for Obama was like nothing I've ever seen.imagine if the grand final was held e

Should I point out that both Romney and Ryan lost their home states to Obama? #Ouch

So why hasn't Romney called the President yet?  He is just an asshole

They said Romney only wrote one speech and that was his acceptance speech.lol #FAIL

Mitt Romney is proving why you should always have a concession speech, just in case. #election

I never thought there would be a moment i wanted to hear Romney speak!!! But TONIGHT is the night #ItsOver You are DONE!!!!

Why haven't I gotten a Code Maroon text about Obama winning the presidency yet?

How do 49 million people support Mitt Romney? What planet do they live on? How can you keep up w/his positions?

Romney is seriously being a dick!!! He refuses to concede, he want a recount in ohio!!

My favorite tweet tonight for so many reasons. RT My cab driver told me Romney won. Can I trust this?

Whoever voted for Romney yall might as well take them Romney Ryan signs out of your yard cuz Obama won

FUCK YOU OBAMA AND EVERYONE WHO STANDS BEHIND YOU!!! Might as well flush the US down the shitter #RomneyRyan

Ok its over with Obama won. We're all gunna die. Now stfu  live it up while you can.

So you're with me Nialler! Prefer Obama than Romney. Hahaa

Guess we are waiting on dear Romney to write his losing speech

So romney is lagging cause he only wrote an acceptance speech WOW

Mitt Romney was spotted fleeing Boston in a white Ford Bronco. #SoreLoser

Obama camp Frankie Beverly and MazeRomney camp Tears sliding down cheeks and sniffles#What'sTheNameOfThisBand?

Mitt Romney Cant Name 3 Ramen Noodle Flavors #HeDontKnoTheStruggle

Ignorance has eaten deep in many pipus lives.. Obama won.. So? Wud he give u money? I taya 4 dese pipu o..

Romney please come outit's ok..

What could go wrong? RT I am confident in saying that President Obama is going to carry the state of Florida tonight.

Every time I blow smoke in my truck, I say fuck you Obama and your EPA!

We celebrate Obama's win cause he doesn't believe in self-deportation, just ICE deportation  simultaneously lament

Who's DJ'ing this Obama rally in Chicagohe got that shit rocking like a Family Reunion Cookout after all ya uncle

Romney hasn't called Obama yet? He must have lost his number in one of those binders full of women.

Obama looks like the dad from the Proud family if anyone has ever seen that show..

Damn Obama sitting at 303 due to Virginia

Romney, be happy man, probably they legalized marijuana just to console you.

Right now it's all about Obama or Colorado

Yes he STILL can! Republican/Romney crisis averted! #election2012

Its good that Obama is still going hard!

Right now the Romney administration is running around trying to find the definition of the word concede.

I'm just glad I get to wake up and be myself tomorrow :) and I don't have to move to Canada #obama

Is the Romney camp watching Fox News? No wonder he hasn't conceded. Brother is being deluded by the strange stat's and silly views. Shame!

Well ah can put the lyrics away and give the drugs back to the dealer since Romney not in. All u females can kill the stripper thought now

I couldn't be more excited. I believe that Obama is going to make this a more tolerable and efficient country #FourMore

I go to bed in absolute certainty that sense will prevail  that when I awake Obama will b president.

Lets recap the victories Obama, lots of women senators, marriage equality, and legal pot. Sounds like a #win to me! #progress #forward

BREAKING: Barack Obama wins Virginia. Our full state-by-state tally:

Hey Romney, can you concede already so we can hear our President speak? #thanks

Give it up Mr. Romney. Concede with dignity.

Obama is goin to learn the entire kamasutra tonight..

hey donald trump, if you think obama getting in on less votes is bad consider what travesty that constituted with bu

#romney only wrote a acceptance speach that mf thought he ben gone win lil losein azz hahahaha #TeamObama #Obama2012 #Obama #obamanation

Tbh I don't care that Taylor likes Romney, it's what she called Obama and what she said to a mahomie. Ugh okay goodnight :/

NO DISRESPECT: But Barack Obama fina fuck da shyt outta his wife

Romney's an idiot for only writing his acceptance speech. Pompous prick.

Romney did not work on a concession speech, over confidence proves to be a weakness tonight

She was irritated that Obama won too, but mostly that her vote doesn't count the way she thought it did.

Blame puertorricans for that Obama Florida win!

#Romney has A LOT of grandkids to talk to right now. A lot of kids, too. He'll call Obama, but he's just got to wait his turn.

I admit I'm now more hyped about Colorado legalizing Mary for recreational use also. Than I am for Obama winning.

Scioto county Ohio home of worthless bible thumping ass wholes. No wonder they voted for Romney there one and the same

Congrats to president Obama ! #4MoreYears you deserve it :) #Obama2012

Someone please put a cattle-prod to that smarmy worm Romney.

I'm rapping the results of #election2012 Hey Romney you can put that #winning speech back on the shelve

TechCrunch: Obama Declares Election Victory Via Email Before Speech

if I was Obama when Romney called i would rush that nigga off the phone

And people are so dumb, Obama aint even black lol. He is a muslim, his name aint Tyrone Williams

soo.. since romney only wrote a victory speech.. what's he going to say tonight?

Somebody need to tell Romney fuck you , your campaign , your couch, your money , his shoes he got on , and Blake grif

Now that I think about it, Romney should just read Trump's twitter feed for his concession speech. That would be lege

Hell why work? Why make an honest living? Ain't no need in that shit Obama gives it out.

Hologram Tu-Pac playing at Obama's acceptance speech.

CBS News Obama will be the winner in Virginia. Polls kept open. Gives Obama 303 Electoral Votes.  (live at

Lol be quiet Jewel!!!! I can't go to sleep all tho I need to.tryin to wait for President Obama's victory speech

Since theres nothing i can do about it, congrats obama, good luck with your next 4 years.

Gravy. Moar plz  AP RACE CALL: Obama wins Virginia. #Election2012

Mitt Romney is starting to cut into my sleep time. CONCEDE so I see my President speak and go to sleep #SHIT!

Sensex gains momentum as Obama gets re-elected: The Sensex surged nearly 100 points after Barack Obama won the U

Romney supporters saying they are #MovingtoCanadayou know we have public healthcare, gay marriage and abortion righ

Let's get real, the best part about Obama winning is seeing all the angry reactions.

Barack Obama wins re-election to serve four more years as president via

13 electoral votes from Virginia projected to go to Obama, bringing total to 303 to Romney's 201

Romney NOT ready to concede (aka stalling for a concession speech)

Karl Rove is spinning the Obama win. Shit the fuck up bitch, you lost!

When I was a freshman in high school and Obama was elected, my teacher asked the class what they thought about the election

seems we must wait for #Romney to pass through all 5 stages of grief before we get a concession #election #vote2012

now thank you America .. they're gonna try to get Obama impeached and you'll be stuck with a real idiot .. JOE FUCKING BIDEN GOOD CHOICE

The funniest part about this election is how pissed of the people who wanted Romney to win are lol #FUCKROMNEY

Missouri and Kansas electoral votes went to Romney. Get it together or yall one elction away from a republican President.

IS ROMNEY IS REALLY WAITING FOR THE LAST VOTE TO BE COUNTED TO GIVE A CONCESSION SPEECH?! LIKE SERIOUSLY ._.

Lmao blaming Obama cause she cant get a movie role. Porn IS available

If Virginia does in fact go for Obama, then I think every state in which I've lived voted for him. I am ridiculously

I snatched ballot papers meant Romney and gave it to obama

Take that, Cits united! RTBad night for mega-rich white guys. #romney #kochbrothers #wallstreet

Obama actually act like he one of them older folks from the city . #Real

Obama didn't screw us over, Bush screwed us so bad, that Obama is still trying to clean it up.

If it's a legitimate election, the American body has ways of rejecting a Romney. #USElection

Bush won and we were mad. Obama wins and you people burn shit, threaten his well being, and disrespect the position of

Fox: Romney will concede at 12:55am local.

Congratulations. Been up thro night watching  routing for Obama. Happy to help u with the Champagne if your struggling ha! .

obama winning popular vote too. sorry, wingnuts who think that makes any difference. #election2-12 #tcot

OH THANK GOD HE GOT RE-ELECTED! JFC I NEARLY DIED!! #OMFG #OBAMA #FTW

I wonder what would happen if romney just so happens to get the rest of the few states votes

romney was going to support the rich not the poor obama supports everyone. nuff said

President Obama defeated Republican Mitt Romney in the 2012 presidential election.  #Patchelections

I'm pretty sure there more white ppl that voted for Obama then there was any other race!

The abundance of Obama lyrics and songs that will be dropping soon

And of course, most Republican strategists will look at this loss and blame Romney's lack of conservative bona fides

Why Obama again??? 4 more years, I will be counting down the days

Not our President. But everyone knows all countries look to the USA for guidance/pointers. Good to know #Obama won.

Romney has conceded CBS reports

AP: Romney wins Montana. But having won Virginia, Obama up to 303 votes.

S/O to the electoral college for voting Obama back in for another term!! ^_^

Me n my LB out after Obama won !!! #WeWon #CampusLife #Psi #ForMyPpl

I'm guessing all the #Obama supporters will be partying all night since they don't have a job to go to in the morning

after 12 im taking my lil self to sleep cuz bitch romney not trying to do the walk of shame

Obama Wins, what stocks go up?: what stocks are going to win from Obama re-election?

Woman on BBC 'hopes' parties can work together but fears economy won't improve in nxt 4 years and that Obama will push USA into 'communism'.

Pres. Obama and Vice President Biden remain at hotel about 10 motorcade minutes from election night party.  Supporters party on.

Some of you guys were so sure Romney was going to win. Ha xD

Okay after Obama it's time for a female president!

Janet Jackson Control. President Obama

Maybe mitt Romney can join the RB Divas since they kicked Nikki Gilbert off

FWIW, ABC News projects Obama will win Virginia. #Election2012

All these obama supporters must be so into politics. I mean they care so much about condoms that economy doesnt matter.

Idk how ANY of you actually believed Romney would win.

NEVER GIVE AN INCH, OBAMA IS A CRIMINAL; NOT ILLIGIBLE TO BE POTUS  HIDING HIS TRUE IDENTITY ** IMPEACH  PR

Obama should really come out here an give his speech, fuck Romney

dammit stop teasing me. JUST CONCEDE, THEN OBAMA CAN SPEAK, THEN I CAN GO TO BED.

Obama never said that abortion was right, he just said its NOT right for him to decide what should be left up to a woman &a

Obama is going win the popular vote. Now what are you going to complain about?

Aye I can't even be selfish doe we ain't do it by ourself shout out to da white folks dat voted for Obama #realnigg

Too bad Romney doesn't have binders full of concession speeches.  #Concede

I just saw the Obama motorcade leaving the Fairmont Hotel on Lower Wacker heading to LSD. He should be at McCormick Place in 10-15 minutes.

Habla Romney en 5 minutos  #Romney set to speak in #Boston in about 5 minutes

I hope the exams went well. Nice  you should. Don't worry about the 1st debate, #Obama got dominated. Watch the 2nd  3rd debates

Phil.. Dr. Phil is what Romney is gonna need.

Thanks for all you did, Samuel.  Can't wait to see what Obama has in store for a second, history and legacy making term.

Seriously Romney, it's about time

Obama came BACK and won Virginia !

Looks like its gonna be Romney haha

Welp, no need to deny myself any more sleep just because Romney is a fucking asshole who doesn't appreciate math.

Obama is the nice Starbucks worker who gives u extra whipped cream  Romney's the bitch one that fills 75% of yo

Romney's concession speech to consist of nothing but a series of awkward smirks and chuckles

Nate Silver easily retained for a second term. (Barack Obama also wins). #Election2012

This pic was supposedly taken outside Romney's headquarters? What does it mean?  Could it be an anagram of NO GLASS?

Obama is actually ahead in popular vote right now Get your facts straight.

Even though Romney lost tonight's election he is a good man  a great American that only wants what's best for our great country! #USA

Obama I woke up early to vote for your ass I'm gonna need you to hurry up and  give your speech.

How many Obama Tats will I see on Instagram tho

Obama is the realest nigga in the United States of America

Well whether were Obama supporters or Romney supporters. We can all look forward to no more campaign ads for a while

RT Romney only prepared a victory speech. Confident man huh

InstaForex.my - Market Talk: Obama's Win to Put Pressure on Boj - Analyst

MSNBC reports that Mitt Romney is scheduled to speak at 12:55 ET. #Election2012

shekharkapur tweet:My absolutely fav pic of #Obama. Drivin the US economy is such fun? #noflyingFs were given

Romney is on his way to make his speech

Some of the best political speeches came from concession speeches incl Al Gore and John McCain - Romney?  #election2012

Romney called up and conceded defeat to Obama. America however is as split as ever.

romney says his speech in 6mins.

Ok people. Romney is in Colorado smoking blunts. That's why no speach.

Romney is going to speak at 12:55!!!  I HOPE HE SINGS!!!

Romney has to untie his dog from the roof. #WhatsTakingSoLong

MSNBC says Romney's going to speak in 6 minutes.

Obama elected, marriage equality and THC legalization!? The Mayan prophecy is coming true!!!

oh and one more thing, if you're only argument against Obama is that people voted for him just cause he's black or some dumb shit, save it

Romney will be speaking soon. Meanwhile still waiting for precincts to come in on props. Only 17% reporting. Will update soon. #election2012

Now Romney gotta be a humble asshole. Lol

Obama is winning the popular vote now.

C'mon Romney. Some of us need to go to work tomorrow as hard as that is for you to believe.

That guy dressed like Romney on Halloween must be embarrassed to know he went out as a loser #awks

Breaking: Gov. Romney has called the President to concede the election. #Election2012

Obama;God's wrath on America. Christians make sure your salvation secure. Persecution comes as times get tough.

Gay marriage and marijuana legalized in some statesand another 4 years for Obama? Is this the best election ever or w

Stop The Press! Beyonce Joins Instagram amp; Shows Her Support For Obama! (PHOTOS)  U WILL LOVE THIS!

All the black people and the white people that try to fit in voted for Obama lmao

4 CEOs That Threatened To Fire Workers If Obama Won  via

Forex Flash: Obama win should be USD negative - Saxo Bank:  (Barcelona) - Early US election r

EXIT POLL: 47% of Americans think it's not Mitt Romney's job to care about them.

Lets see if Romney will have that smart ass Smirk

awaits for Obama's speech then suddenly #mitb I'm here to show the world!!!

I wanna see what Romney bitchAss bouta say

Mitt Romney said,If you can't afford college, school isn't for you. Well Mitt, if you can't win the election, the p

i mean Romney himself has advocated some form of this so idk what the deal is.

Tomorrow morning Romney will amend his taxes #Election2012

Obama is about to get laid tonight.

New Gossip Girl is THE ONLY WAY I'm pealing away from this disgrace of election. Every single person who bubbled next to Obama are idiots.

Friends say obama sucks we spit factsDad says he sucks..we quit but when he leave we be talkin again!

Obama won Prince William County.

Me and my sis to Romney son of a biscuit eating bulldogyour such a lint licker.I jk not

And it's all over. Romney concedes to Obama. It's finished, at last.

Mitt Romney is keeping his supporters up past their bedtime. Pack it up, pack it in sir

Just waiting to hear Mitt Romney's concession speech so I can go to sleep. #BelieveInAmerica #RomneyRyan2012 #ChrisChristie2016 #GOP4Life

Hold on to your vaginal wands, folks. Romney could pull a fast one.

Welp then i guess that means obama will be on 2k for four more years lol

ABC Reports Mitt Romney has called President Obama and conceded the presidential race.

Come on people be classy. While I'm not a fan of his Mr. Romney is not an evil man. Please stop acting like you're still

#Concede Romney owes The President an apology for being so disrespectful during the debates.  By golly, he is THE PRESIDENT!

Bet Nicki Minaj regrets voting for Romney.

Praying for Romney to not have a heart attack

Romney to concede election. Catch a live stream here:

So , congrats Obama . 4 more years :)

Imagine if Romney's call went straight to voicemail.

Celebrities React To Obama Win On Twitter  *UPDATED*! RT! #Election2012

From an entertainment perspective I'm disappointed Romney conceded.I wanted him to add on to Trump's troll fest. Classy move tho.

btw, i'm so please that you are not a romney supporter

jdkalcbd 1 of the reasons is cuz romney lost :/

The world can breath a sigh of relief after Obama won Romney win would have meant Armageddon! #Hilary2016  #ObamaTheHopeGiver

Romney about to freestyle this speech. Drop the beat.

Is Romney in a movie theater? Because he's handing out concessions.

Romney is giving his fuck ass speach now

Will the Republicans stay classy and not boo Obama?

Romney looked like his bitch ass was crying

Romney enters the stage to the roar of dozens of supporters. #election2012

Romney why make it worst jus go home its over

If I were Romney I would've went down swinging. YOU CAN'T TAKE IT WITCHA MITT

dey say Romney got 18 grandchilds

And yes there's a douchebag at Romney HQ recording him speaking with an iPad.

OK people. Its nice to be proud that Obama won. Now go do something so you can be proud of yourself.

I literally cannot stop farting #obama

Romney, keeping it classy. Good for him.

Romney Ass Sick!! Dat Nigga can't believe he has to Bow Down!!! Give dis speech !!

Now: #Romney steps up to the podium at the Boston Convention Center

Obama won this electionaezeeee. *la'scrappy voice*

Amazing heckling of Romney at beulahland right now

Romney better sit back and smoke one and think sum shit ova

Romney mad ass hell it's eating him up I can see it in his face

Haha! Now that loser Mitt Romney has to go home and sleep in his Scrooge McDuck swimming pool of money

Romney looks how u look after u been crying but u gotta straighten up your face before your mama hits u again

Color me surprised, but I'm impressed by Governor Romney's speech. Good man.

Lol romney isn't even thanking the people that voted for him ! #Romney2012

Obama bout to be harlem shaking and then play some smooth ass music before pipping michelle down. #ItsCrucial

Barack obama u have really made the black,white,young,old,europe,asia,africa,etc, proud I LOVE YOU DEARLY

It's okay to shed a tear Romney.

Watching Romney give his Loser speech

Romney has bags under his eyesdo ya think he was crying!!!

Romney's smile looks fake af.

Things I will be arguing this week: Mitt Romney was not a bad candidate and Obama does not have a

Mitt Romney look like he just got done bawling his eyes out seriously

Only at a HBCU we have a celebration parade for Obama !! I LOVE MY HBCU

And that is how Barack Obama swept swing states to win #USElection2012. Mitt Romney camp is challenging Ohio result. #ForMoreYears

RT   JWBlack would work  I bet this is one time when Mitt Romney really wishes he could drink.

I hope that President #Obama will be successful in guiding our nation, says #Romney

Morning folks!!Hats off to you President Barack Obama, great stuff sir.And to the rest of ya'll, Happy Wednesday, enjoy it.

Does anyone want to have a sweep on the number of new unofficial drone bombing wars Obama will start in his second term? 8-9 more?

Mitt Romney is speaking to this hometown people right now that didn't even vote for him as a whole. How does that feel? #BackStabbed

if i was romney i would not give that damn speech. fuck no. call me a sore loser

Romney is giving a lot of thanks to all.. I respect his speech!

Lmfao at mitt romney stoopid ass!!!

Mitt Romney took so long to come out because he had to write another speech

Romney didnt even have to give a speech just punch girl lmao

This is one boring ass speech, take yo ass to bed Mitt Romney

Good concession speech, very generous remarks from #Romney #Election2012 #CNN

Romney gave a very respectful speech.

Obama is a dick. We're all screwed

My friend doesn't get why we're happy for Obama

I've always thought Romney came off as a complete douche.

He said that Obama's wife is a beautiful woman

Wrap it up, Mitt. Waiting for the man of integrity, who unlike you, says what he means  means what he says, Pres.Barack Obama! #Msnbc2012

Fuck the Romney all yawl uggg

Axelrod mustache safe: Obama wins MN, WI  PA. Promised to shave if Romney won any one of them.

#LT I was talking about Russell Wilson Who the fuck is Barack Obama?

Congratulations President Obama for another four years!!

Am I the only person who watches Mitt Romney speaking and just cannot begin to guess how he really feels? A bit scary and weird.

Romney's concession speech is the first time I've seen him be open with his feelings and thoughts while talking to a large audience.

these are the reasons why Romney didn't win , FACTS --  - sp

this the first time I actually listen to Romney speak

And so ends the career of Mitt Romney's spray-tanner.

Obama will get little time to celebrate -    I think people should read this and think about this.

Romney got more niggas on stage than a Young Money VMA nomination

I don't care what anyone is saying. I'm happy ass hell Obama won!

I wonder wat Romney really wanna say

RT Romney got more people on stage than YMCMB

Mitt Romney might have a bruised ego, but he is still ridiculouy rich. He will buy himself a new ego

Here's Tomorrow's New York Times Front Page Announcing Obama's Win

One time for Romney he gave Obama ah run for his money

thank the lord for you claire jones, your tweets have kept me giggling throughout the midst of this obama whirlwind #hope

For President Obama,Good Luck Barack From Italy

People saying Romney supporters bashing Obama..I've seen so many tweets about f' romney and all his supporters more than any other tweet

Obama is not your nigga.Obama is not your bro.Obama is your president.#Respect

President Barack Obama Reelected: Alec Baldwin, Donald Trump  More Tweet Reactions

I am a Obama supporter but I wonder how many ppl voted for him based on his skin color alone. Ppl need to be educated

#cnn Romney reading from a speech covered in Tippex!!!!

I don't think the naysaying on Romney's genuineness is fair, this may be the toughest speech of Romney's life. #teamrhetoric

PHOTO: Obama And Biden Celebrate Their Victory

Have a headache _ but still happy for Obama!

Okay I'm So Ready to Hear Obama's Victory Speech.

aight, what time is obama gonna come out?

Classy speech by Mitt Romney. Let's join together and make our country the best it can be!

honestly my worst fear now is something happening to obama and having biden's stupid ass take over.

Classy speech by Mitt Romney.  Respectful, optimistic, and much needed.  We must find ways to work together to restore our country #respect

After nearly 6 years running for POTUS, Mitt Romney speaks for about five minutes and walks off with family. No his

FREEDOM OF RELIGION was granted in the First Amendment. The fact that he's a Muslim is no different than Romney being

Romney's speech seemed genuine and gracious. Well done.

Regardless of my hatred for Obama, I sure do hope that mother fucker does a good job.

Congrats America! Obama, you're the man!!

20 bucks says Obama takes the stage with a menthol and struts. #RacistThoughts

Romney could give two fucks about becoming president honestly. He still owns half this country.

I'm glad Romney didn't win, but it's always a bit emotional watching concession speeches.

After Obama speaks tv will go off

I'm with you  #Romney seemed relieved, probably tired of dragging those #RWNJ around b/c it was pitiful to see him act as a puppet,

South Africans outchea happy coz Obama is president? fcuk is wrong wit yal?

I need to pop open a bottle of Chocolate wine! I hear it's hella good.. Plus I have a reason, OBAMA!

We gon forget about mitt romney ass in a couple weeks watch lol

Mature poitics is not xnout einner takes sll. Romney: This election is over but our principles endure. #CNNElection

For everyone complaining about popular vote. Obama now has a larger popular vote then Romney.

Mitt romney gone cry in the car , Lmao !

OBAMA CANCELED SCHOOOL FOR EVERYBODY TOMORRROW !!!

(WESH local news) Mitt Romney concedes election to President Obama: Mitt Romney has conceded the el  #ORLANDO #FL

They still wanna bash our president damn give props when props do #salute the man #Obama

Romney has no one to blame but Trump's homestretch social lunacy.

Romney Family Lookin Like The Brady Bunch.

Obama is our president once again and it's my nigga birthday !! All imma say is #TURNUP !! Happy birthday fam

The Romney campaign's handling of this situation is a preview of how he would deal in a crisis.  #hideinhotelroom

Slash fanfic fuel, tbh. Barack, Joe, Michelle and Jill after the networks call it for Obama

, lol! See I was mad, but after Obama won, I was like fuck them! They can suck my nuts. Hahaha!

IT'S TIME FOR YOU TO STEP UP AND START IMPEACHMENT PROCEEDINGS AGAINST OBAMA. WE ALL KNOW HE'S GUILTY

Obama in Chicago smoking with Chief Keef #3hunna

I have to write a paper on how the Obama regime utilised social media in swinging the election towards them. Easy peasy.

how can your prayers work when obama delegates voted God out of the process at the dem convention?????

I love living in a town where everyone cries about how they're gonna move to Canada cuz Obama won. #Mittstake #Goodbye

They voted fo Obama , he had caught osama, romneys a broke boy, god he's a broke boy

What if Obama comes out dancing with Beyonce. I would like that. I would.

Same as offering $5 mil for Obama's passport. He's an ass and you, tonight, are a huge loser. Enjoy!

Barack Obama, the President of the United States. I love how that sounds!!!!

Romney: This is a time of great challenge, and I pray that the president will be successful in guiding our nation.

Celebrations outside White House as networks project Obama victory: Nov. 7 - Supporters of U.S. President Barack

Previous RT  SWEEETEST PIC EVER!! #Obama

Be safe Arizona, Obama just won and Arpaio gone be out. . . Yeah pigs on alert

Them winning the senate means they can turn down bills that Obama wants to pass This will be a intresting 4 years

Im Just Waiting For Obama Speech So I Can Go Smack Out!

If you like Romney then oh well but some dumb girl on my Facebook said she hopes Obama gets assassinated, c'mon that's

I know right,what an #Election  Yes we can continue to move #FOWARD with OBAMA #4 MORE YEARS! #PROUD #AMERICAN RIGHT NOW!!

Now Obama better do wat he said! Cuz if he don't shit will go bad for America

Obama cone with this speech now I'm sleepy boo! Lol

Good game out there, Romney. Respect.

Congratulations to our President Obama on his excellent victory.God bless America!

Gracious speech on mitt romney's behalf. #respect is key

What A Fantastic Night !    #OBAMA - #BIDEN ! 4 More Years !!

Four more years of things moving in the right direction.  #yesplease #obama

Romney's Family Is Like YMCMB, All Of Them Always On Stage But Only One Is Getting An Award Or Recognized. Lmao

Where are all the Republicans calling Obama the next Jimmy Carter? Where are the Right Wingers, not one Tweeted me to

Great election coverage by Looks like the 310+ plus collegiate votes for Obama though #nearestthepin

Waiting patiently to hear Obama's speech

okay people pissed because romney lost,  boo fuckin hoo! he ain't abt that life anyway.

yea but they still didnt have enuff ppl to put Romney ahead. But no matter now, its official

Obama Needz Ta Hurry His Azz!! I's Tiired And I's Gots Class In Tha Moanin

I betcha Michelle Obama is gonna come out with her hair all bouncy and swinging like in a Herbal Essences commercial..#loveIt

Country continues to be divided down the middle. Obama wins with 26% of eligible voters. 53 million out of 210 million. Divided nation.

Come on Obama! I need some sleep!

Ah, yes, the Romney Clan. Yes, we've got Bort Romney, little Tugg Romney, Blart Romney, Flub Romney. They're all here!

Money cant buy elections anymorePrez. Barack Obama welcome back!

Yes, Romney didn't call for revolution or herald the end of democracy. Funny how that set him apart

Obama get yo smooth ass out here and deliver this speech ! Lol

Now MF's can finally trash all of those sorry ass Romney/Ryan shirts and yard signs. :) #Obama2012

did you just blame Obama for something that couldn't possibly be his fault!?

S/o to all the obama band-waggoners popping up all of the sudden. I thought you didn't care about politics bitches?!

lol tbh he really almost got Obama

I remember when Obama was being sworn into office and I was sick that day so I kept sneezing and it looked like I was crying so these girls

Photoset: nerd-are-i: Doctor Who had spoken. And Obama was elected. THEY WERE RIGHT AGAIN

The fact that me and my friends just ran up and down the halls of Tyler yelling OBAMA!!!! #toomuch and #toofunny

Nigerians should remember Obama's Victory!  Americans voted rightly for FREEDOM over FEAR! Including GAY RIGHTS and a re

So proud of America today. Progress in gay marriage, women in the senate and Obama re-elected.

I saw you on the news at the Obama speech in chi-town!

Congratulations Mr. Obama. I'm proud of America. Now get to work.

I love how they say Romney didn't have a LOSER speech prepared!! HA cocky ey. . he really thought he would win! SMH

Yeah I call him Ciroc Obama, idgaf cause I'm serving the nation, so suck on it.

#Romney concedes U.S. presidential election to Obama  | #USA #USElection

I don't understand why ya'll would re elect a president(obama) thats just going to be sitting in the white house all day doing no work.

After Obama speak twitter gone b dead AF

IN YOUR FACE! PRES BARACK OBAMA HAS BEEN RE-ELECTED! #msn

Obama getting that victory nut before the victory speech.

That #Romney got only 37% of the popular vote in the state he governed is so telling.

A massive crowd has congregated in Obama's campaign headquarters in Chicago, Illinois to await the President's victory s

#Chicago We Does This. Bulls,Bears,OBAMA.

classy speech by Romney. Now plz speak Obama, its past my bedtime.

Romney just handled that concession speech like he was riding a jet-ski made of monocles.  #classy #graceful #jetskis

aawwww yyaaaaayyy!!!!!! #OBAMA #OBAMA #OBAMA #OBAMA #OBAMA Obama for a better future!! #LOVE

Romney i would've voted for youBut ya see, the way my financial aid is set up.*Kevin Hart Voice*

Obama, please give your speech soon so I don't have to listen to the CNN reporters' bickering.

im liking this whole Obama thing goin on but imma need his ass to hurry up!

I want a mix tape from #OBAMA I bet it's off the hook

I'm going to need to get my link card, Obama phone, cancel my health insurance, quit my job and get on welfare to ma

Duke said Obama n the office telln all the white people who wanted him to loss to eat dis nigger dick lmao

obama still at his hotel gettin it!

These girls are really balling their eyes out over Obama winning. Runny nose and everything.that's deep.

Obama took off in Florida  voting ain't even over with #TeamObama

We lose to Bama and lose to Obama in one week, looks like the Mayans were right. #apocalypse_2012. Good luck to our c

This fact: Not only will Barack Obama be inaugurated on MLK Day (Jan 21, 2013), but 2013 is the 50th anniversary of the

We dnt agree with Romney plans so wats your point! Jss STFU while your ahead

Come on Obama I got class at 9:05 Mann..

I voted for Obama today feels god this is the first time I ever voted to

OBAMA!!!! Can't wait for this speech. A BOSS always wins. #shittedon'em

Me  Obama use to tweet each other Back in the day lol that's how iGot him to follow me on twitter. Him  Donna Brazil.

We can't blame Obama for the next 4 years because he inherited the problems from Obama. Wait.

My parent's were sleeping this whole time and I woke them up and told them Romney won lmbo. Their reaction was priceless

Obama back. Pot legalized. Gay marriage approved. A woman senator. An Asian-American congresswoman. America, there is

.. I mean if Romney won then where would the couples run away to get married in fanfics???! ;___;

Obama Wins.  We keep our President!!!!!   #breakingnews #President

Hey jokers, I am an #Obama supporter AND I have a job. Retweet that!

It ain't over yet, we still got this!! I'm naming  claiming it right now that my President Obama will be re-electe

Shout out to The Illuminati for helping Obama get the W

Obama what is taking so long? Hurry up

Thank god I don't have to be home schooled next year!!  #OBAMA

I would wear my Obama shirt tomorrow but then it might cause an uproar with the simple minded people around this place.

Congratulation obama for being american's president once more !

hahahahah! someone just said obama holding everybody up cus he waiting for that durag line on his forehead to go away LMFAOO! *tears*

Mitt Romney shoulda read the victory speech stilljust for laughs

I'm fighting my sleep for Obama right now, Lord knows I'm sleepy as hell.

Well it looks like you're in the driver's seat again Obama. Good luck and may the force be with you

I saw, in person, Obama give his final speech the night before election day in 2008 and I'm still really proud of being there that night.

Gonna fall asleep before Obama speaks. Hurry up Mr.President! It's past my bedtime!

It's been 2 hours since this Obama election win report began on TV. And this is Australia! Uncle Sam!

Romney kept it classy ill give it to him

Obama re-elected for 4 more years. There's hope for you yet, America. #PrezObama #POTUS #EqualityMatters

Watch Mitt Romney's Concession Speech for Election 2012: Mitt Romney waves to the crowd before conceding the pre

Obama likely to win popular vote, too

Congratulations President Obama!!  You are the people's choice!

And Obama wouldn't leave the hotel until Romney concedes.smh. Fuckin idiots

Cranking some Al Green at the Obama HQ. Let's stay together, indeed.

Mitt Romney is a man I respect. He is a great American. My hat is off to him. #tcot #RomneyRyan2012 #election2012

the election has been called Romney already Conceded now just feels like our votes didnt count.

Obama probably still fucking Michelle!

Mitt Romney wanted to run this country because he is rich and bored. We would have been toast lol. I can exhale now!

Thank you God for giving us Obama  Biden

Oh obama won .? What? i didn't know -___-

Waa Obama dtg Malaysia! Kna prgi rmh tasha ni. :D

Whoever's DJing the Obama Rally on CNN is killin it.

Obama was asleep,he wasn't even watching the results as they came in.That dude was too chilled out,like he's in the BDP.

My god, Obama, dear, please hurry, I'm so sleepy.

Shouldn't Obama take some of the electoral votes he worked hard for and give them to some of the less fortunate candidates..?

Now that Obama's elected, should we expect to hear about how he plans to pay back the $10 billion in debt? #usavotes

President Obama is taking awhile because they are back stage whippin' the hell outta Michelle's hair, so hol on

Obama celebrations across from the White House #dc #election2012  Hay-Adams Hotel

and on top of that, there are more than plenty of black Romney supporters. Again. Doesn't make sense. People just need to think.

Polarized public means no mandate for Obama: Barack Obama won a second term but no mandate. Thanks in part to hi

Mitt Romney is sooooo not getting drunk tonight.

Ok Obama what you doing? Playing with Sasha? Smacking Michelle's ass? Turning up? Likecome on

Sure Obama got a shitty economy, but did he need to add 6 trillion dollars to the national debt?

4 years ago me and you were making shirts and hoodies with obama on them in printing graphics. remember?

Romney's speech was as genuine as they come to me.

Obama now over 250,000 ahead in the popular vote.

I Just Want To Go To Sleep!! But Not Till Obama Makes His Speech.

They gon be like Obama can't make it he couldn't take it lol

RT Oh  #DemManSay Obama was not leaving till he buss.I'm doneee!# lol

#passiton Let's make #Obama mention #Hemp with our minds and #twitter

Classy speech by Mitt Romney.  No excuses.

I might eat all my popcorn before Obama's speech. #worstnewstoday

Thnk the Lord Pres. Obama won..i was really tryn to either riot or leave the Country if Mittens won #2TERRRRRMMMMMZZZZ

Michelle Obama better have some pain killers on deck cus tonight she bout to GET IT

What a celebration of democracy at the White House!!! Felt great to be a part of it #uspresident #obama

Damn, he looks exhausted: Obama embracing Joe Biden after the tv networks called the election

If other people are carrying the whole Obama drama on their heads, leave them be. How is it affecting your own life? Una like wahala self!

I guess God voted for Obama

Waiting to hear the homeboy Obama speak

oh my bad lol #teamObama she could go die in a hole with Romney #js

Obama start of his speech: Allow me to re-introduce myself my name is O!

Mr Barack Obama, thank you for your hard work I believe in you because you are the best and I'm so proud of you now keep working for USA

i want Obama to make his speech already so i could go to bed

congrats to obama and he support team.i don't live in America i am glad Barack Obama won

Going to bed after Obama's speech.

Feeling good #Obama won time to watch Martin and chill

Hey I voted for the guy but even I have to wonder how long it will take before Romney claims he never ran for President in 2012.

I didn't believe Obama was elected legitimately in '08 and I don't believe it now.  America is being deceived big time.

At the end if the day, mitt Romney has 250 million, dude truly ain't got no worries lol

SC never won for presidential election for Obama to many white ppl vote .! And to many black ppl dont vote

I wonder how many people are aware that Obama is pro-wiretapping, pro-extrajudicial-assassination, pro-web-censorship,  anti-whistleblowing

awwww don't cha know it.. women can survive now that Obama has made it another 4 yaaaahooo!!!!

Presidente Obama microchip? No thank you!

Felt bad for Ann who looked like she'd used binders full of tissues. #Romney #Concession

the best thing I saw tonight was the lame cover band playing Black Eyed Peas songs at Romney HQ earlier

Dear Gov. Romney: I understand it hurts, but get your fanny out there and concede before you destroy any reputation you m

Why is these bitches twerkin cause Obama won -___-  He don't want that ratchet shit..

Tomorrow morning Mitt Romney will say he never conceded. #likestolie

Karl Rove's Super Pac spent $325 million and Obama won and Dems picked up more Senate seats.  U have to love that!!

Who's this fine ass sitting in the audience at Obama headquarters. Lol. Damn. #cnn

A great day for US and the World, President Barack Obama re-elected! Well done people who voted, you're great, good sense prevailed.

One thing I'm upset about is Obama is anti military.. like to see him fight for our country.

I Didn't Go Run Cuz I've Been Waiting For Obama's Speech  I'm Still Waiting

If you give us meat (mitty) we eat congratulations obama

Lol man ain gne even get childish Obama gt re elected. Its sum very mad ppl out dere Keep tha prez in ya prayers fr

Mitt Romney Concedes to President Obama, The Winners  The Losers in the 2012 Election

Obama. Should come out  dance lol

President Obama is about to talk to supporters in Chicago. You can watch live on #mivote8 #decision2012 #earlyclub

No race thing #Obama just the man for the job!

I can't stop laughing! Everyone was so sure hahahahahaha!!! #Obama #2012 #youmad?

Obama looked like he knew he was going to lose. His statement to the media looked like a concession speech #NRA #TCOT

Ann so dry right now  Romney Going To Get Pity Pussy?

i'm assuming these songs are all from a playlist on obama's ipod

:x.lord knowsObama still sitting,Romney pick beanz abeg!

Go Obama, so pleased!! Well done America.

Ana Navarro, Repub strategist is speaking frankly about how Romney lost the Latino vote.  Imp points.

And Obama should be like. Fuck y'all. Y'all just got punked.

Watch Obama Walk When He Come Out

NBC News says that women voted overwhelmingly for Obama--a 12-point margin. There's a lesson in this, GOP. #RespectWomen

im tryna wait on obama ass.. shit i got school + tryouts tomorrow -.-

i was definitely not going to class tom if Romney won.

Obama only did that for the votesHe's not crazy! I voted for the right candidate that will benefit me and my fam!

not a good night for #gop did not see this coming especially after #obama taking America to new lows  still winning easily

Obama must getting the cleanest line up in history damn!

I wonder how many dead people voted? Obama's shovel ready jobs, dig up dead to vote.

Things r so good, #obama, lets go back to work. We won, hands upupup..winning!

Obama, you need to hurry up and make your speech so I can go to bed.  You're not paying my bills, and I have to work tomorrow, bro.

Glad to see Obama return to the White House! Congrats from BC Canada! #election2012

you are a dumb ass racist bitch that's why #Obama won despite disgusting racist mothersfuckers like yourself

Obama is going to cross his arms, nod his head and *poof* all the electricity comes on in the NE.

Tomorrow Barack Obama will still be president, and Michelle will be in bed icing her vagina #election2012

I, for one, am interested to see how the markets react to Obama's victory.

Obama should bring out Bin Laden's corpse like the closing credits on SNL and thank him for being such a good sport. And also dead.

How grey is Pres Obama going to be in 4 more yrs! Totally Grey!

bitch please I got more than you and my parents work hard every fucking day for it no help from Obama so gtfo with that bs

Someone should tell Colorado how the Obama admin has cracked down on medical marijuana in California. #cognitivedissonance

Obama really has his work cut out for him -- he is inheriting a stagnant economy and over $5.6 trillion in new debt from his predecessor.

We Turnt up for our President #Obama

Full text of Mitt Romney's concession speech:

Obama deserves a song dedicated to him for his re election , is the person to do that song #4MoreYears #TeamObama

I'm feeling like Obama is on cp time waiting for him to make this speech! I'm literally fighting sleep!

YES to Obama. And I'm not even American.

Chief keef about to preform understand me after Obama speech

Romney's Mom voted for Obama?? Lol

#ThePShow President Obama Wins, Seals Victory With A Tweet - Shortly after 11:15 p.m. major news outlets confirmed t

Bye Bye Mitt Romney Atleast the world is slightly better off with one less idiotic politician now!

MT Romney is on the phone buying every Jamie Farr Lebanese Hot Dog Stand in OH  selling them to China out of spite

I don't think Obama realizes how many people who have jobs and students who have class that are awaiting this speech!

#US2012Elections With 2 states still to be called Obama has 49.4% of the popular vote 303 elec2ral vts. Romney has 49.1%  203 elect. votes

I've been refreshing my Braids since 7 now it's 12:30 Obama won that's enough for me I'm going to bed, I got class in the am

Lmaooo not too much on Obama tho he run shit ;)

Obama won, shut up. I'm not saying I'm a republican, but I'm not a democrat either. I'm for whoever is gonna do what's best.

so much facepalm in that comment. You must be so mad right now that old mormon man romney failed

Donald Trump boree! blaming electoral officials  all that. Masa go do ur celebrity apprentice thing  leave obama. Lol

Never seen Obama this happy ^_^ , kinda looks funny !

lets go obama in there four more years

Lotta white people at Obama HQ dancing badly and flag waving out of step with the music

I don't care Obama won I can get over it. It's my dumb ass friends who know nothing about politics but bitch about it th

Obama's re-elected. Obama's got 303 seats won and Romney only got 203. This win is nothing personal, but would decide the worlds fate.

Me and bout to put em in air for Obama

best part of this has nothing to do w/ Obama. This country seismically shifted Left (socially) and Reps will need to respond.

Mann where Obama at I'm getting sleepy

.okay Obama hurry up  talk. shit I'm sleepy.

So far, I've gotten 9 of 10 swing states correct: NH, PA, NC, OH, MI, WI, IA, CO, and NV. I predicted VA would go to Romney. Waiting on FL.

Are you sure Obama left the hotel?;) lol I c u Obama

So true M Can't overstate how much praise deserves for 1.5yrs spent covering Romney..

Trying to see Obama but uuuummm I gotta be up early .

Look at the diversity in the Obama crowd tho

Lil Wayne going to put out a song this week about Obama

i fell asleep an hour ago and we still don't have a victory speech? doesn't obama know we have SCHOOL tomorrow?

To anyone who's overly concerned about the election. It's not like Obama be able to get anything done anyway with a Republican house.

Trying to stay up to see Obama, but I'm so sleepy.

Okay President Obama.I love you butwere sleepy lol

If Obama doesn't start his speech in 10 mins, I'm going to sleep. Lbs.

If Romney wins, we all know that we are just gonna #BlameNolan.

describes reaction to Romney's concession at Obama's HQ LIVE NOW:  #CTVElection

My President is Black, Jesus Christ was too, and I be gawd damn if Cleopatra wasn't too, Romney going home,  Fox New they salty as hell.

I know who i'm voting 4 n it's definitely not  a Mitt Romney

Top News Today: Obama's re-election and a path to a tax code revamp

It's been like 3 hours Obama needs to give his speech already

So since Obama won is it okay for us to stand in line for J's again? #coontweet

#Romney Loses  #2012Election: Romney's Complete #ConcessionSpeech:  via #goodbye losers welcome #ObamaBiden2012

If Romney loses, Paul Ryan is going to bicep curl the Liberty Bell.

Pls romney,kindly go n rule nigeria ..thank you

Anddd time for bed. Hurry up, President Obama, and give your acceptance speech! Will need an IV of caffeine in the morning.

Fuk romney speech !! Obama we waiting !!!

im just waitin on Hov and Bey to run out on stage and start performing. and then Obama just arrives out of no where.

Aye, all these Barack Obama winning pictures funny as hellllllllll lmao!

A GREAT night for women, tolerance  acceptance. :)  Congrats Obama supporters Blessings  enjoy your ce

According to everyone, we are all dying soon, the world is goin to end, and Obama is going to get shot. #no

Obama you won and all, but hurry up and speak! niggas gotta go to school tomorrow. A school that will have a pop. of

I laughed at all of tweets about Obama. Lol

ahaha :D #sostoked. Now waiting for Obama's speech :D

#Obama2012 watching Obama HQ did they give those people drugs?  They are dancing about the end of freedom as we knew it! Stupid Sheep !

FOOLS!  all this nigerians supporting obama :s has he added value to ur lives

Why argue with ppl over the Presidental election tho? It's OFFICIALLY OVER President OBAMA was RE-ELECTED..now g

Thats wassup obama had 60% of us youth votes..congratz yall!

You know what? I'm glad #Obama won tonight. Now the entire country can see  how horibble he really is. This is my last political tweet.

Obama taking 3 hours to give his speech, he's probably too emotional to come out right now.

Maybe, with Obama not having to worry about reelection, we can see the end of the end, too.

Congratulations freeloaders!Romney wont be able to cancel your checks in Jan. Healthcare prices continues to rise, economy continues to tank

;* They Should Play Eye Of The Tiger When Obama Come Out .!#BarackObama #Obama2012 #ObamaCampaign

iv accomplished somethin today even tho i aint vote.im tired af so im goin to sleep!!!! CONGRATS OBAMA!!!!!

Holy shxt Obama wtf are you doin at that hotel.? BUST YO NUTS and get to the podium.!!!! I'm tryna go to sleep soon.

If anyone has even the smallest bit of happiness left in them,let me know,i would really like to borrow some part of it - Romney#okbye

At the end of the day I have to like the President's face. I could play spades with Obama. Romney?! I'd reach across that table  slap him.

I think Obama has catered this speech to those just minutes from last call on the east coast. #election2012

i feel like this gonna be the Obama we been waiting on

Waiting for Obama to come out like a boss wbu

MT Akin, Mourdock, Ryan, Romney Gone. Women Here. Turns out Rape is real and it matters. Now its time 4 #1billionrising

My nigga Obama in the back popping bottles yall chill, wat would u be doin if you was re-elected President.

i dead ass was getting mad at work when all them white ppl was talking shit bout obama now i cant wait to go into work tomorro lol

How Barack Obama celebrated his victory: US president's 'four more years' tweet becomes most popular ever, with

Where is Obama come speak already

Woken up and Obama wins! Woo hoo!

If #Obama doesn't come out in 3 mins this speech will be watching me

I love the diversity in the Obama crowd that is real America

U2 song playing at the Obama party! I can hear it over the talking heads on CNN. *Dances*

The good news?  Romney lost.  The bad news? Obama won.  #Election2012 #ronpaul #GaryJohnson

I was wondering what do you guys think about Obama being the president for another term? #PDSlive

The real significance of America's re-election of Barack Obama, is that it heralds a real change: Part 2 of a

Im glad obama won but you lazy fucks should get  up and get a job now stop trying to live off the government.

Biden in the back forcing Obama to take shots. #ReasonsWhyObamaIsntOutYet

I am really curious WHY do people hate Mitt Romney? Honestly I want to know- tweet me about it.

Pres. Obama to speak in TWO MINUTES. Watch LIVE:  #election2012

tf Obama then won , now he dont wanna speak , his ass better come on

HURRY UP OBAMA! I'm tired! I got classes all day tomorrow sheesh!

Mitt Romney is now apart of the 47% he doesnt care abouthe is #unemployed

BARACK OBAMA IS IN THE BUILDING..CHI~TOWN.

MITT ROMNEY. Instantly forgotten. Ta! Bu-bye! Hope Ta never see your arse again.

WATCH LIVE: President Barack Obama gives presidential acceptance speech in Chicago  #NBCPolitics

Obama has has some serious swag, nice suit bro.

I fucking love the Obama family!

I and my husband voted for Obama n we r in out 70s and white - and we live in FL.#edshow

HERE COMES THE MAN OF THE HOUR.. or shall i say the past 4 years! #obama #celebration

Hell yes! There he is President Obama. I love you man!!!

Pres Obama speaking to supporters in Chicago.

History in the making once again guys! That's right it's Obama! Oops, President Obama! Love it!!!

Haha Obama gets on cues Soul Music_ hahaha

Just saw that Obama has been re elected. ! Congrats from France !

says President Obama is about to speak on his reelection.

Romney was most humble and gracious. Now we await Barack's appearance

THE OBAMA FAMILY ARE ALL SO CUTE AND CLASSY FRICK

Sign sealed delivered - this man is way too cool #Obama

I would say that obama is going to fuck this country in the ass, but i would enjoy that ;) #4MOREYEARS #SafeSex

Holy crap, I'm glad to be alive right now. #2012 #Obama

If we get another black president after Obama can white people say the N word with an a on the end? Are we all square?

Obama finally just came out, took him long enough.

I liked a video from  Key  Peele: Obama's Anger Translator - Victory

Oh my lord we get it Obama was re-elected. Now let's leave it alone please.

Was bout to get up and turn to Obama but I am naked and my roommate here so I'll read tweets about it

You'd swear Donald Trump was the candidate  not Mitt Romney.

I've been just wondering, what did Romney do with his binder full of women? If he had said that he had a binder full of Afro-Americans,..

Romney acknowledges Paul Ryan as the best decision he's made besides his wife Ann and calls her the love of his life

Glad I still get to watch big bird and the rest of Sesame Street characters with Obama's win! #usvotecbc

Obama's about to helicopter his big ol' dick any minute now.

Malia Obama is so over being onstage right now.

Obama Is About To Play Some JAY Z !!

Haven't been up this early for years :p Just for Obama! #victoryspeech

#Obama to #Romney : ALL I DO IS WIN WIN WIN #4MoreYears hahaha

Everyone STFU ! Obama is speaking lol

#obama is keeping me up. Want to sleep, but have to watch

I wouldn't be so cynical and whiney if Romney had won. I promise you that.

Obviously, white people didn't all go vote for Romney. Everyone needs to relax on the snide white people remarks.

WATCH LIVE: Listen to President Barack Obama's speech and tell us what you think.  #NBCPolitics #De

thats my baby lol OBAMA!!!!!!

YEA SIGN SEAL DELIVER WE ON #OBAMA  THE TRUE SUPPORTERS! 2012

We will see who he blames for this next 4 yrs!!! Our military found  brought him down, not Obama, just said ok 2 kill him!

Obama coming out to address the masses #TeamObama

Obama SOO damn Good Looking for his age

Ah, the great orator is back. Lovely #Obama

Obama comes on stage to 'Signed, sealed, delivered I'm yours. Many people on Twitter this morning celebrating and breathing a sigh of relief

RT Obama and Michelle have such a beautiful family

The Obama family has allll the bait! They're all so beautiful and regal!

LOL.. The people are happy about Obama winning, is he coming to ur house??

I just love the Obama family.. they the American dream family..

Obama  Clinton are our best looking presidents . tooo handsome

Obama got a better hairline than Lebron

#scsu should have been in chicago while obama make his speech we would b live af

I sure am glad Obama won, because this sista got plans that must be accomplish in the next couple of yrs

I think Obama would speak well in a gospel church. #justsayin

Obama: Tonight, in this election, you, the American people reminded us that while our road has been long, we have picked ourselves up.

Obama win clears healthcare reform hurdle, challenges remain: WASHINGTON (Reuters) - President Barack Obama's re

Obama making false promises again.. ' The best is yet to come'

Lol Obama got a 2-0 record.

Obama Was Watching Michelle Ass When She Walked Away , He Gonna Wax That Ass Toniqht #PromiseYa lmfao

You watching Obama speech or Nah

very long time. (By the way we have to fix that!). Whether you held an Obama sign or a Romney sign  you made your voice heard.

For the United States of America the best is yet to come ~Barack Obama

#Obama: I congratulated #Romney  Paul on a well fought campaign #khq

Obama: Whether you held an Obama sign or a Romney sign you made a difference

Obama's Headquarters fake cheer was louder than Romney's fake cheer! #election2012

MJFCWorldwide Fam!!President Barack Obama SPEAKS!!!Congratulations once again!

Den he wanna work with Romney shid Romney to punk ass betta take dat

I'm gonna work with Governor Romney and see how we can move forward -POTUS. BOOM.

22 min after posting the most popular tweet of all time Barack  Michelle Obama #President  #FirstLady

Anyone else see that crazy lady with the flag in her hair behind Obama? #OprahLookAlike

awwwwwwwwwwwwww obama is so cute sdhfiushdfiusd

Need a woman like Michella Obama in my life

Poor Obama! Just look at the miserable economy he just inherited from the guy we elected in 2008! #tcot

Obama: I thanked Romney for making an absolute fool of himself in the campaign and making it much easier to win.

Dammit Obama you are a Great Man!!!! Family Mannnn

Lovin Obama's speech (and the dog job was priceless)

obama to his kids.. one dog is probably enough for now haha

Its hard to pay attention to Obama with this girl with the flag in her hair though smh

Obama is a great husband! He does not stunt on his lady at all!

Awwww what obama said about his wife  daughters 3

Congrats to my favorite entertainer but why are you so pro Obama. I hope he does better second term

President Obama is the BEST role-model for African Americanswell 4 any1 at that #salute

Ok ok I'll admit Obama got that 007 swag

Michelle OBAMA is the EPITOME of what a partner should be!!!

Obama rolls to re-election, stubborn Mitt Romney waits and waits to finally concede: In the end, the only thing Mitt

the way you screamin Obama name like dat Tighten up pimp lol

Because Clinton Well. This about Obama.

Obama better do this damn speech.lol

OK OBAMA LETS MAKE THIS SPEECH I GOT CLASS TOMORROW.

I am so excited to have four more years of First Lady Michelle Obama.

#nw Obama acceptance speech..if this guy gave Kutbah at Khalid Bin Al-Walid mosque I don't think I'd ever miss 1 p

Thank you to all the volunteers. The best in the history of politics - President Obama #LiveFromChicago #Election2012

Obama cried yesterday. This man is history it don get no better

Yes, thank you obama for mentioning electoral reform. Now I wanna see some legislation on that

Day 2 of 21day #meditation challenge was another success! Looks like I will be sleeping well again! Yay for #Obama

I guess that's just how I see him.. sooo strong and powerful just like #Obama I love you bae..

I can't at that girl behind Obama with the flag in her hair!

I'm snapping pictures of Obama as if I'm actually there lol.

So many tears as Obama talks about perfecting our union. Clear eyes, full hearts, REALLY can't lose.

Happy to hear Obama did it again :D

Maya: Obama Is A Lil Fine Celeste Me: He Is That Maya: I Bet He Don't Know How To Lay The Pipe Tho lmao The Stuff Maya Let Fly Out Her Mouth

OBAMA IS GIVING THESE LONELY BITCHES HOPE LOL.

The lady behind Obama prob looking for her flag too

Acknowledgement from #Obama  to all citizens who volunteered on any side. That's #democracy Competition can be healthy, Italian politicians!

President Obama came out at 1:35 our time.

Anyone have the Twitter name of the girl with the flag in her hair behind Obama? I bet  she has a lot of good stuff

obama you don't get it campaign is over, get over it. you won go ahead with your life

Too tired right now. Goodnight wonderful people! :) and remember, Romney sucks monkey butt! :D

President Obama and I have a lot in common. Guapo Capo

this girl behind Obama is triflin.. get that flag out of your damn hair

hell yeah, singemiss iyo speech ya #obama

Obama ol' sexy will smith looking ass

Obama / Baldwin victory party!!!!  C- Monona Terrace)

Regardless of President Obama or Governor Romneymy destiny has always been in the hands of Jesus. #JesusJuke #Rea

if we did then we'll be voting for Romney.

Obama finna beat that pussy up from now til inauguration.

niall is so obsessed with Obama it's the cutest thing ever

I'm glad other people also noticed the Oprah look-alike behind Obama

But Seriously, forget Sentiment, Obama dey yarn, he is just to Modest it takes a lot Wisdom to achieve this Height

Why does Obama get the world vote?

Obama could talk the Queen of England out her panties this nigga is good with words lol

I was in the Inaugural Parade when Obama was first elected. #justsaying

I am concerned about Obama HQ -- how fast can you whip your little American Flag before it SPONTANEOUSLY COMBUSTS???

Obama so calm and relax. He G.T.D before he walked on staged.

HILLARY CLINTONMICHELLE OBAMA 2016Here for the all female ticket!!!!

Obama mama must put it down in the bedroom cuz he loves the fuck out of his wife!

Another thing. Why does everyone who supports Romney think that all Obama supporters are broke asses who sit around and d

Obama so smooth! Swagg for days!

#Obama we want our children to live in a nation that is respected in the world and defended by the best troops #4moreyears

Meanwhile OSEIWUS PRODUCTIONS prepping a new blockbuster OBAMA NKUNIM part 1 and 2

You know Obama's getting it tonight.

ain't a real Nigga..! She voted for Romney..!

ummm Sorry? I promise I didn't plagiarize I was just reading all the Obama hate tweets *whisper* some white ppl scare me!

Guys that are editing Obama's words to his wife to suit and send to your gal friends #GodiswatchingYou

Obama gotta quit using these forsyth tech stories in his speeches

pple 4get obama is not Nigeria president.. so he can't help.. :-P=-O

Climate silence finally broken in Obama's victory speech.

It took the Obama-cam to pan on two pasty fellas' halfhearted flag wave to understand why they keep showing sisters dancing to Stevie. #aahh

I wonder if Michelle and Obama gone have casual sex tonight or STR8 pressure from his win Lol

barack obama is trying to sound like bill clinton

This bitch behind Obama has her flag resting in her nappy head ass wig.

..all those sat behind #Obama now on live speech for last ten minutes.. And no product placement?! It is a new dawn!

Very relieved to wake up and find that Obama is still president :)

Obama got swag man! That Michelle segment was too Trill

OBAMA YES WE CAN, YES WE DID, YES WE WILL KEEP GOING FORWARD!!!!

Damn, Obama. Youse gon make me cry w/ your speech. Who wouldn't want to vote for you w/ those speaking skills?

Obama makes every other husband in the US look like shit.

The fight is not over. Dont put it all on Obama to make a better you. Do your part. Make your own!

Congratulations to Barrack Obama for his re-election..wish u best of luck!

COME ON AMERICA. VOTE OBAMA. BECAUSE I CAN'T.

#Forward That's where we Need to Go - Obama

Obama so fukin confidenthe's eatin this speech up!

'Our economy is recovering and a decade of war is ending.' ~Barack Obama

The love Obama has for his wife is beautiful.

President #Obama: Progress will come with fits and starts, its not always a smooth road

dreaming kuma?..wait and see. malia obama? Keep dreaming boy!

Obama look like curious George with them big ol ears so cute lol

oh bruh Obama gotta do some real epic shit at the end of this

Obama: (To his team) You lifted me up the whole way. I will always be grateful for everything that you've done and all

You voted for action.Am looking forward to working together with all political leaders says Obama

Hopefully Obama can actually bring change but I doubt it, oh well can't do anything but trust him now.

Truth is that the candidates will say ANYTHING to get some votes. Romney MIGHT or MIGHT NOT have helped the coal mines.

Obama: Whether I earned your vote or not, I have learned from you and you have made me a better President. #Election2012

I can't even listen to Obama u got me laughing so hard

I am so happy. Thank God President Obama won! We did it! #Forward

So glad Obama won, what an amazing speech. #Obama

It's a good thing Obama is an awesome president because I'd probably vote for him based on sex appeal alone.  #justsayin

Obama is the next Bill Clinton I swear!

Barack Obama is president for another four years. I can sleep now knowing that all is right with the Universe.

Obama said we are the wealthiest country..the hell we are ! Js.

before going to sleep I was scared cos Romney was leading!

Just woke up. Phew, just phew #Obama

India welcomes the re-election of President Obama:

Romney would have said the same shit do you really think he would have made it happen either?

Now watching Obama's winning speech.

AND THAT'S. WHAT MAKES. AMERICA. GREAT! *rips off suit* #obama

Will live off of food stamps and Obama care. Our nation is slowly but surely going down and I am honestly upset and worried. #praying4USA

Obama should of rapped his whole speech #Elections2012

What would it be like if president Obama was single?

#india #latest news Mitt Romney concedes US presidential election to Obama

Yes   Obama need to do something bout Cheif Keef

*Tonight you voted for action; not politics as usual - Barack Obama* .Could an Indian leader ever speak like dis and inspire millions!!

I guarantee Obama daughters will not be on a reality show #fact

President Obama, women, marijuana, LGBT all had major wins today. America has spoken we will go forward into a new and brighter future.

She said would that make Obama the 45th president ?

You are woman and act like a hoe, then u expect ur man to praise you like Obama praised Michelle! #youareonalongthing

As I predicted, months ago, Mitt Romney is now the Republican Walter Mondale. Barack Obama is the Democratic Ronald

I see a president. I don't see a race. I see a man. I don't see a politician. I see Obama. I don't see Romney.

smh bout this Obama  Romney shit?

Skip to my lou  flex  As Obama exits he needs to hit the

Hell of a speech by Obama. Finally time for bed. #goodnight

Will y'all still be excited if Obama turns out to be the antichrist?

She was so forreal on smiling the whole time during obama's speech lol

don't worry. Its only politics. He won't do it, can't do it. #Obama

Congrats Mr Obama and Amurica! Now lets keep it movin forward!!!

ahah! Im glad someone acknowledges me and my baby obama lolol :}

some 1 had the nerve to call Obama a coward!!! baby it takes courage to be a black man and run for Pesident!! not once but TWICE!!!

Hope, Passion, Courage, Honesty, Optimism, Perspective, Meaningful, Memorable, Thoughtful and Love is how I describe this speech!!! #Obama

I can't hear anything Obama is saying with #youngoprah behind him. All I can hear is YOU GET A FLAG! YOU GET A FLAG!

Inside the Obama Campaign's Hard Drive  via

I love Obama. Wish I had the stats like beyonce to be upraised by the president and wife and kids

How come the words love and charity, part of the Christian virtues, were so rarely used by church-going electors who voted against Obama?

Why is Niall watching this IM crying NIALL FEELS OBAMA FEELS

This chick behind Obama is gonna be famous in the morning.. #ObamaSpeech #flaghead

Okay Obama Now I remember why I be turning you lol I'm sleepy now and I have class tomorrow morning!

GO OBAMA WE DID IT BABY #2 TERMS

GO SUCK A BIG FAT BLACK DICK ALL YOU OBAMA HATERS!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

Obama is going to get impeach or can't  do much this term anyway #Benghazi

And that was purely down to Mr Romney being Mr Romney, the things he said/suggested were just . Well wow O.o

I love Obama's embrace of equality!!! God bless this phenomenal man

Obama is my idol with this speech. Really how I see a man is suppose to be. Real solid, honest, and hold down his f

not bad Obama, now that's a speech and a half

Woah! I can't see anyone spit like Obama just did. #fiyah

Obama can really talk like it's crazy

obama is feelin himself tonight wit this speech

Obama is so inspirational. He gives me hope :)

Obama, Obama everywhere! Guess I know who won

Thank you America for moving forward and thank Obama for continuing to serve our nation

Obama's speech is givin me goose bumps.

Wow this guy gives a hell of a speech #Obama

Obama's speech is literally making me tear up. #GooseBumps #SuchBliss #Hope #Equality #America #LetsMoveForward

ONLY THRU GOD'S GRACE CAN WE DO IT! OBAMA!!!

Love him or hate him, the man can deliver a speech. #Obama

Obama ended his speech strong and powerful! #greatness

Not gonna lie, Obama just blew some minds with that speech.

That was one of his best speeches. I'm crying--we're up to 4..5 times? I've lost count. #FORWARD #YourVote I'm so proud. #onenation #obama

X_X i cant  Obama's new mixtape!!!!

Barack Obama speaking - arrived on stage with his family to 'Signed, Sealed, Delivered I'm Yours'  shouts from th

I'm crying Obama's speech was so good.

No matter what anyone says, Obama can give a speech like no one I've ever seen..

obama should of threw da mic..like lil  bitch..

Good luck tryin to marry an Obama daughter u guys! Lol

Mitt Romney Concession Speech: 2012 Presidential Election GOP Candidate Delivers Remarks from Boston great speech mitt

Obama and Biden about to do the Lebron and Jay Z handshake backstage

And Just Like That Obama My New Nigga

Mitt Romney should take notes! That's how u do speech!! #Obama

Obama's speech was AMAZING!!! 3 I hope I'm good as of a speaker as him one day!

Obama gives better speeches than Mays did thoBernie Mac was the OG VP tho

Great speech from Obama. So glad America saw sense again.

A Legacy President; Not an Accidental President, Obama 2012

Kinda wanna wear a Obama shirt on the set

I have 4 more years to meet now. hope it happened #Obama #Election2012 #FourMoreYears

If Obama stays true to his word then America can look forward to a prosperous and successful future. #ChangeTakesTime

President Obama's words always manage to bring tears of joy and inspiration to my eyes.

obama is the only good thing goin on in chicago now

Obama has a dog in the White House, but hold on. WHERE TF THE KITTIES ATT?!?! -.- Time to fix that

dat obama speech was such an inspirationope kenyan leaders wameona hiyoits rily awesom

If Obama was at a concert he'd have all the panties on stagesome dry some moist. ha

Obama you lack ability to work w/Congress, or even meet w/them. YOU change and America will prosper. Humble yourself. #breitbart

Thank you president Obama for a great speech. Signing off from my bed in Arizona. Goodnight everyone

People talking like they know about politics, you know nothing. You just like Obama because you have heard nothing about Romney. #shutup

Is that maskandi group gonna release another Obama song?

OBAMA IS THE FCKIN TRUTH!!!! That was the best speech I've ever heard!!!!!!

My grandma is so excited for Obama!

RT President Obama is preaching! Preaching the gospel of inclusion!  | Can I get a witness?

Obama is the modern day Martin Luther king jr.

Only a matter of time before Junot Diaz took credit for Obama's win followed by a wave of threats . #don'tquestionjunotdiaz

I think it's funny that when someone asks Harvard for transcripts, they can't provide them.. Really? #obama #notmypresident

Worst Job in America: Obama Victory Speech Confetti Sweep-Up Dude.  #OneManOneBroom

Where did this talk about Obama not believing in God come from? Our president just said God Bless us and America 3 times hmmmm

GEJ can also give a Dope Speech like dis one obama Jus Droppd.. Let him first remove that his Hat.. Shii is blockin his

Nigga Obama got my aas believing I can b the president

Don't forget, Obama's tour music was Bruce Springsteen. Romney's tour music was Kid Rock

Ok, Obama that was some real cute shit. You get mad brownie points

Obama should do the Dougie on stage fucc all lat lol

If obama dnt talk abt nigeria, wud b unfair cuz the've bin voting 4 him on here even if their votes didnt count! Wasted e

sounded like a truce was called based on Romney's speech.

1:03am and thanks to you Obama im tired as fuck.

Ok so Obama and Biden abt to roll up and then Michelle giving up the cheeks.

Obama now you can sleep tonite.

I like how the Obama girls are throwing confetti at each other.

President Obama should crowd surf, its only right

I betcha Obama is gonna put Romney to workhe gave Hillary a joblol

Don't know why you're so angry about Obama being president. Lol. Give the man a chance like you did George Bush.

I cant be the only one who caught Obama put his hand on Michele's hip and then slide it across her ass as he put is hand down

Obama became singularly more inspiring than I've ever heard him with the last few lines of that speech. Amazed. #election2012

Nicely done Obama.  You go girlfriend!

Obama: 'We are not as divided as our politics suggest. We are not as cynical as the pundits believe'//- I hope so, sir, I know I've tried

Reality has a well known liberal bias. That's why the GOP and Romney lost, not for any fault of their own.

same haha omg u saw obama win (y) lol

I see Obama in his off time wearing cargos and polo. I kinda wanna think he has some biggie tucked away some where in the Oval Office.

Congratulations Obama, However I wanted Romney to win to accelerate the Fall of the US.;D

Romney threatened women's freedoms, so we took over Congress. And that's how that's done.

Honestly is there anything that says Go America better than Bruce Springsteen and Barack Obama??

Y shld I vote u neva voted in d Nigerian elections nd u ar here talking about Obama then Nigeria deserves to be Ashamed of U

BREAKING NEWS: THE NEXT PRESIDENT OF THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA WILL BE BARACK OBAMA

I love how Obama thinks Gay's are greats and deserve to be heard and Romney doesn't believe in gay Marriages. So happy Obama won.

Nobody NOBODY can deliver a  speech better than Obama can! Dude I'm kenyan but I'm filled with soo much American spirit

Whether Obama or Romney could've won, dictator policies on poor African policies will never change..

I'm always going to love Barack Obama always

Everybody sayin they want a marrage like obama  michelle. Um dese niggas is commited yall hoes aint even loyal!

Been at the office all night. Catching up on all these folks who are bashing Obama. Don't understand why ppl would do that to any president

the fact that Obama is for abortion  gay rights is MOSTLY what discusses me.. don't like what ur readin, CLOSE

Obama: coolest president since Teddy Roosevelt?

What a perfect way to end the speech. Obama really knows how to connect with the people. Amazing!!!

If people forgot, unemployment has fallen 2% under Obama and likely will continue to fall. Trust the economics degree student on this one

I truly believe that Obama is genuinely a good person who cares, doesn't just pretend to!

Expect Obama to win a 2nd term.What I didn't knew was the richer states  gave him the support while the less well-off 1s gave Romney theirs.

cant wait to see the obama explanation on the 200K unemployment in the defense industry in the next 60 days

Obama speech - Affirmed  his inclusive  approach to national, international and global development YES!

BLAME GAME is now over President Obama. This is now all yours to handle.

Vote Obama! Before you fuck around with them fuck arounds,  fuck around and be BROKE!

Well done mr obama :D

Since I voted for Obama, I think that you should reward me with a follow. :)

Text of Mitt Romney's concession speech: Text of Mitt Romney's concession speech 8 minutes ago Romney concedes,

So glad Obama won the election, even if I'm not American!

Ok so Obama won but I need my sleep so I didn't see. I was going in and out of sleep and it's 2 AM right now

Just imagine If Obama was a rapper he would eat niggas

haaa Romney was the Republican candidate! good morning Marshaller! #imknackered

wondering if Romney's gna fight it  hoping that concession was for show!!

Just a magnificent speech. It makes me proud to be a citizen of the USA. I have hope! Thank you President Obama.

Thank you for joining #GEGNews for #AmericaDecides: The US Presidential Polls 2012! Congratulations, President Obama. #FourMoreYears

Amazing speech words can't describe it our president did his thing tonight a long hard battle #Obama #4moreyears

Do you think that the Republicans really believed they were going to defeat President Obama? #GOP #Obama #Romney

Never in doubt El Presidente #Obama was never losing. Now all the hicks can complain about the United Socialiststates

While Obama makes 2nd term, America b partying lyk its da 4th of July. In S.A we gona b fighting lyk da 16th of June wen Zuma makes 2nd term

What's there to be passionate bout?  So sad that we're more passionate abt Barack Obama than we are with our o

At work still , omg mad ppl was blowing up my phone about Obama lol

Is it a bird, is it a plane? No, its Barack Obama winning again! #wecandoit

Just realized when my children wake up, I'll be able to tell them that Barack Obama will be our President for #4MoreYe

-- I started this Twitter account to help Barack Obama be reelected. Hopefully we all helped a little bit.

Letting the.housemates know who won #obama

#Obama wins second term as I expected  via

OMG look what hearing Obama's voice has lead me too!!!!!!  I need another beer or 20 #FreakedOutDis

you have tweeted so many pro-Obama tweets I'm contemplating disowning you.

Obama has done it again!!!Yeepppp

It's a good day because Obama won but this means my politics lesson won't be cancelled

Barack Obama took to social media to share his victory - and now has his most popular tweet of all time!

I bet Romney's punching himself in the face right now haha.

Obama 08 speech was better but this 1 was good 2

Idgaf how close it was  Obama still won!

So happy I woke up to find Obama has won!

Let the record reflect: Mitt Romney won only 1 of the states considered to be battleground states. That's an epic failure for Romney.

Obama you are truly the man!You've worked so hard fighting for this country you deserved all the votes you got amen! :D

The best band from Pres Obama's ancestral homeland of Kenya, has a hot new album out -

VIDEO: Romney concession speech: Republican challenger former Massachusetts Gov. Mitt Romney conceded the election

Cehhh-lebrate good Obama come on! WOOOO Obama! Here comes the CHANGE everybody! WOOO!

Had to unfollow a person I respected because they began to spew hate/filth after Obama victory. Was that necessary? #Election2012

right but it was funny seeing how salty they was when they announced that Obama won Ohio

No longer waiting for President Obama, this second term, we're marching forward with President Obama.

Obama's probably going to win the electoral college by nearly 130 votes  the popular vote by 2 million or so. I call that a mandate.

Obama KNOWS the struggle .. He's been there.. He understands.

@highlight

New York's Republican Mayor Bloomberg endorses President Obama for re-election.

@highlight

Reports--8 States Will Decide! Daily Presidential Tracking Poll: Romney 49%, Obama 48%

@highlight

Obama and Clinton at Saturday night rally in Virginia

@highlight

Latest Angus Reid Wisconsin State Poll has Obama at 53 % and Romney at 46 %

@highlight

A tie for Obama and Romney in first results.

@highlight

Here's Tomorrow's New York Times Front Page Announcing Obama's Win